Table of Contents    
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended March 31, 2020
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period fr om             to            
Commission File Number: 1-13252
McKESSON CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delawar e  94-3207296
(State or  other  jurisdiction of incorporation or  organization)  (I.R.S. Employer  Identification No.)
6555 State Hwy 161,
Irving, TX 75039
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(972) 446-4800
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including ar ea code)
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
(Title of each class) (Trading Symbol) (Name of each exchange on which registered)
Common stock, $0.01 par value MCK New York Stock Exchange
0.625% Notes due 2021 MCK21A New York Stock Exchange
1.500% Notes due 2025 MCK25 New York Stock Exchange
1.625% Notes due 2026 MCK26 New York Stock Exchange
3.125% Notes due 2029 MCK29 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.   Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act.   Yes  ☐    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required  to file such reports), and (2) has been
subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically , every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorte r period that the registrant was required
to submit such files).   Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company , or an emer ging growth company . See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and
“emer ging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):
Large accelerated filer  ☒   Accelerated filer  ☐
Non-accelerated filer  ☐   Smaller reporting company  ☐
  Emer ging growth company ☐
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extend ed transition period for complying
with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’ s assessment of the effectiveness of its
internal contr ol over financial reporting under Sectio n 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting
firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).   Yes  ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-af filiates of the registrant, computed by reference to
the closing price as of the last business day of the registrant’ s most recently completed second fiscal quarter , September 30, 2019 , was
approximately $25 billion .
Number of shares of common stock outstanding on April 30, 2020 : 161,853,218
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’ s Proxy Statement for its 2020  Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into Part III of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
 Item Page
 PART I
1. Business 3
1A. Risk Factors 10
1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 19
2. Properties 19
3. Legal Proceedings 19
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 19
 Executive Officers of the Registrant 20
 PART II
5. Market for the Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 21
6. Selected Financial Data 23
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 25
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 49
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 50
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 126
9A. Controls and Procedures 126
9B. Other Information 126
 PART III
10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 127
11. Executive Compensation 127
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 127
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 129
14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 129
 PART IV
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule 130
16. Form 10-K Summary 130
 Signatures 136
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART I
Item 1. Business.
General
McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” the “Company,” or “we” and other similar pronouns), originally founded in 1833, is a
global leader in healthcare supply chain management solutions, retail pharmacy, community oncology and specialty care, and
healthcare information technology. McKesson partners with life sciences companies, manufacturers, providers, pharmacies,
governments and other healthcare organizations to help provide the right medicines, medical products and healthcare services to the
right patients at the right time, safely and cost-effectively.
The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references in this document to
a particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year. The Company was incorporated on July 7, 1994 in the State of Delaware.
Our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those
reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
Act,”) are available free of charge on the Company’s website (www.mckesson.com under the “Investors — Financials — SEC
Filings” caption) as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with, or furnished to, the Securities and
Exchange Commission (“SEC” or the “Commission”). The content on any website referred to in this Annual Report on Form 10-K
is not incorporated by reference into this report, unless expressly noted otherwise. The SEC maintains a website that contains
reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers, including the Company, that file electronically
with the SEC. The address of the website is www.sec.gov.
Business Segments
The Company operates its business through three reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European
Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that are not
significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are referred to and included in Other.
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment distributes branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar and over-the-
counter (“OTC”) pharmaceutical drugs and other healthcare-related products. This segment provides practice management,
technology, clinical support and business solutions to community-based oncology and other specialty practices. This segment also
provides solutions for life sciences companies including offering multiple distribution channels and clinical trial access to specific
patient populations through our network of oncology physicians. In addition, the segment sells financial, operational and clinical
solutions to pharmacies (retail, hospital, alternate site) and provides consulting, outsourcing and other services.
Our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and retail
customers in 13 European countries where we own, partner or franchise with retail pharmacies, as further described below.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment distributes medical-surgical supplies and provides logistics and other services to
healthcare providers in the United States.
Other primarily consists of the following:
•McKesson Canada which provides better, safer care by delivering vital medicines, supplies and information technologies
throughout Canada and operates Rexall Health retail pharmacies;
•McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions (“MRxTS”) which provides innovative technological and connectivity
solutions to pharmaceutical companies, retail pharmacies, health systems, clinics and payers across the healthcare
industry; and
•Our investment in the Change Healthcare joint venture, which was separated from the Company in the fourth quarter of
2020 as discussed in more detail below.
3
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions Segment:
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment provides distribution and logistics services for branded, generic,
specialty, biosimilar and OTC pharmaceutical drugs along with other healthcare-related products to customers. This business
provides solutions and services to pharmacies, hospitals, pharmaceutical manufacturers, physicians, payers and patients throughout
the United States and Puerto Rico. We also source generic pharmaceutical drugs through our joint sourcing entity, ClarusONE
Sourcing Services LLP (“ClarusONE”).
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment operates and serves customers through a network of 30 distribution
centers, as well as a primary redistribution center and a strategic redistribution center, along with four third-party logistics sites
within our McKesson Life Sciences business. We invest in technology and other systems at all of our distribution centers to
enhance safety, reliability and product availability. For example, we offer McKesson ConnectSM, an internet-based ordering system
that provides item look-up and real-time inventory availability as well as ordering, purchasing, third-party reconciliation and
account management functionality. We make extensive use of technology as an enabler to ensure customers have the right products
at the right time in the right place.
To maximize distribution efficiency and effectiveness, we follow the Six Sigma methodology, which is an analytical approach
that emphasizes setting high-quality objectives, collecting data and analyzing results to a fine degree in order to improve processes,
reduce costs and enhance service accuracy and safety. We provide solutions to our customers including supply management
technology, world-class marketing programs, managed care, repackaging products and services to help them meet their business
and quality goals. We continue to implement information systems to help achieve greater consistency and accuracy both internally
and for our customers.
We have three primary customer pharmaceutical distribution channels: (i) retail national accounts which include national and
regional chains, food and drug combinations, mail order pharmacies and mass merchandisers, (ii) independent, small and medium
chain retail pharmacies, and (iii) institutional healthcare providers such as hospitals, health systems, integrated delivery networks
and long-term care providers.
Retail National Accounts: We provide business solutions that help retail national account customers increase revenues and
profitability. Solutions include:
•Central FillSM - Prescription refill service that enables pharmacies to more quickly refill prescriptions remotely, more
accurately and at a lower cost, while reducing inventory levels and improving customer service.
•Redistribution Centers - Two facilities totaling over 830,000 square feet that offer access to inventory for single source
warehouse purchasing, including pharmaceuticals and biologics. These distribution centers also provide the foundation for
a two-tiered distribution network that supports best-in-class direct store delivery.
•McKesson SynerGx® - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program and inventory management that helps pharmacies
maximize their cost savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing and one-stop shopping.
•Inventory Management - An integrated solution comprising forecasting software and automated replenishment
technologies that reduce inventory-carrying costs.
•ExpressRx Track™ - Pharmacy automation solution featuring state-of-the-art robotics, upgraded imaging and expanded
vial capabilities, and industry-leading speed and accuracy in a small footprint.
Independent, Small and Medium Chain Retail Pharmacies: We provide managed care contracting, branding and advertising,
merchandising, purchasing, operational efficiency and automation that help independent pharmacists focus on patient care while
improving profitability. Solutions include:
•Health Mart® - Health Mart® is a national network of more than 5,000 independently-owned pharmacies and is one of the
industry’s most comprehensive pharmacy franchise programs. Health Mart® provides franchisees support for managed
care contracting, branding and local marketing solutions, the Health Mart private label line of products, merchandising
solutions and programs for enhanced patient support.
4
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
•Health Mart Atlas® - Comprehensive managed care and reconciliation assistance services that help independent
pharmacies save time, access competitive reimbursement rates and improve cash flow.
•McKesson Reimbursement AdvantageSM (“MRA”) - MRA is one of the industry’s most comprehensive reimbursement
optimization packages, comprising financial services (automated claim resubmission), analytic services and customer care.
•McKesson OneStop Generics® - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program that helps pharmacies maximize their cost
savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing and one-stop shopping.
•Sunmark® - Complete line of more than 600 products that provide retail independent pharmacies with value-priced
alternatives to national brands.
•FrontEdge™ - Strategic planning, merchandising and price maintenance program that helps independent pharmacies
maximize store profitability.
•McKesson Sponsored Clinical Services (SCS) Network - Access to patient-support services that allow pharmacists to earn
service fees and to develop stronger patient relationships.
•McKesson RxOwnership Program - Assist independent pharmacist owners with the opportunity to remain independent via
succession planning and business operation loans.
Institutional Healthcare Providers: We provide electronic ordering/purchasing and supply chain management systems that help
customers improve financial performance, increase operational efficiencies and deliver better patient care. Solutions include:
•Fulfill-RxSM - Ordering and inventory management system that empowers hospitals to optimize the often complicated
processes related to unit-based cabinet replenishment and inventory management.
•Asset Management - Award-winning inventory optimization and purchasing management program that helps institutional
providers lower costs while ensuring product availability.
•SKY Packaging - Blister, Unit of Use and Unit dose packaging containing the most widely prescribed dosages and
strengths in generic oral-solid medications. SKY Packaging enables acute care, long-term care and institutional
pharmacies to provide cost-effective, uniform packaging.
•McKesson Plasma and Biologics - A full portfolio of plasma-derivatives and biologic products.
•McKesson OneStop Generics® - Described above.
This segment also provides a range of solutions to oncology and other specialty practices operating in communities across the
country, to pharmaceutical and biotechnology suppliers who manufacture specialty drugs and vaccines, and to payers and hospitals.
We have two core specialty business lines: Specialty Provider Organization and McKesson Life Sciences.
Specialty Provider Organization: This business offers community specialists (oncologists, rheumatologists, ophthalmologists,
urologists, neurologists and other specialists) an extensive set of customizable products and services designed to strengthen core
practice operations, enhance value-based care delivery and expand their service offering to patients. These services include
specialty drug distribution, group purchasing organizations (“GPO”) like Onmark®, technology solutions, practice consulting
services and vaccine distribution, including our exclusive distributor relationship with the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s (“CDC”) Vaccines for Children program. Community-based physicians in this business have broad flexibility and
discretion to select the products and commitment levels that best meet their practice needs. This business also provides a variety of
solutions, including practice operations, healthcare information technology, revenue cycle management and managed care
contracting solutions, evidence-based guidelines and quality measurements to support U.S. Oncology Network, one of the nation’s
largest networks of physician-led, integrated, community-based oncology practices dedicated to advancing high-quality, evidence-
based cancer care. We also support U.S. Oncology Research, one of the nation’s largest research networks, specializing in oncology
clinical trials.
5
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
McKesson Life Sciences: This business helps life sciences companies drive faster and greater market access, optimize patient
experiences and deliver better business results with a comprehensive suite of solutions for biopharmaceutical products.
RxCrossroads provides a comprehensive suite of solutions for life sciences companies including program pharmacy services, third-
party logistics (“3PL”), clinical trial support, patient assistance programs, access and adherence solutions, and other tailored
services for pharmaceutical manufacturers. In addition, we help life sciences companies minimize reimbursement challenges while
offering affordable, safe access to therapies through Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategies (“REMS”) programs. Biologics by
McKesson specialty pharmacy solutions help pharmaceutical and biotech partners to effectively distribute oral and self-
administered specialty products to patients across the country.
When we discuss specialty products or services, we consider the following factors: diseases requiring complex treatment
regimens such as cancer and rheumatoid arthritis; plasma and biologics products; ongoing clinical monitoring requirements, high-
cost, special handling, storage and delivery requirements and, in some cases, exclusive distribution arrangements. Our use of the
term “specialty” may not be comparable to that used by other industry participants, including our competitors.
European Pharmaceutical Solutions Segment:
Our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and retail
customers in 13 European countries where we own, partner or franchise with retail pharmacies, as further described below. The
segment consists of two businesses: Pharmaceutical Distribution and Retail Pharmacy.
Our Pharmaceutical Distribution business delivers pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products to pharmacies across
Europe. This business functions as a vital link connecting manufacturers to retail pharmacies, supplying medicines and other
products sold in pharmacies. Pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products are stored at regional wholesale branches using
technology-enabled management systems. Our European business leverages its scale and provides innovative and effective medical
care services to create enhanced customer value.
Our Retail Pharmacy business serves patients and consumers in European countries directly through approximately 2,200 of
our own pharmacies and 7,900 participant pharmacies operating under brand partnership arrangements. In addition, this business
includes outpatient dispensing and homecare arrangements mainly in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”) and provides traditional
prescription pharmaceuticals, non-prescription products and medical services and operates under the Lloyds Pharmacy brand in
Belgium, Ireland, Italy, Sweden and the U.K. In addition, we partner with independent pharmacies under our franchise program.
Medical-Surgical Solutions Segment:
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment delivers medical-supply distribution, logistics, biomedical and other services to
healthcare providers across the alternate-site spectrum. Our more than 200,000 customers include physicians’ offices, surgery
centers, post-acute care facilities, hospital reference labs, home health agencies, and occupational and alternative health sites. To
support the country’s efforts to fight the coronavirus disease 2019 (“COVID-19”) pandemic, in the fourth quarter of 2020
McKesson began working closely with government agencies such as the U.S. Federal Emergency Management Agency and the
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (“HHS”) to get critical supplies to healthcare providers who need them. We
distribute medical-surgical supplies (such as gloves, needles, syringes and wound care products), infusion pumps, laboratory
equipment and pharmaceuticals. Through a network of distribution centers within the U.S., we offer more than 275,000 products
from national brand manufacturers and McKesson’s own high-quality product line. Through the right mix of products and services,
we help improve efficiencies, profitability and compliance. We also never lose focus on helping customers improve patient and
business outcomes. We develop customized plans to address the product, operational and clinical support needs of our customers,
including tackling inventory management, reducing administrative burdens, and training and educating clinical staff. We care for
our customers, so they can care for their patients.
Other:
Other primarily consists of the following operating segments and business activities: McKesson Canada, MRxTS and our
investment in the Change Healthcare LLC joint venture.
6
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
McKesson Canada: This business is one of the largest pharmaceutical wholesale and retail distributors in Canada. The
wholesale business delivers their products to retail pharmacies, hospitals, long-term care centers, clinics and institutions in Canada
through a network of 15 distribution centers and provides logistics and distribution services for manufacturers. Beyond wholesale
pharmaceutical logistics and distribution, McKesson Canada provides automation solutions to its retail and hospital customers.
McKesson Canada also provides health information exchange solutions that streamline clinical and administrative communication.
The retail business operates more than 400 owned pharmacies under the Rexall Health brand in Canada where we provide patients
with greater choice and access, integrated pharmacy care and industry-leading service levels.
MRxTS: This business provides innovative technologies that support retail pharmacies and manufacturers that ultimately
enable patients to fulfill their prescriptions. This business supports our customers, with a comprehensive, expanded portfolio of
solutions designed to help them drive business growth, realize greater business efficiencies, deliver high-quality care, enhance
medication adherence and safety, and more effectively connect with other players in the pharmaceutical supply chain.
Change Healthcare: Our equity ownership interest in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change Healthcare JV”), a joint venture, has
been accounted for using the equity method of accounting. Change Healthcare LLC provides software and analytics, network
solutions and technology-enabled services that deliver wide-ranging financial, operational and clinical benefits to payers, providers
and consumers. On March 10, 2020, we completed the separation of our interest in the Change Healthcare JV through a split-off
transaction. This transaction reduced our investment in the Change Healthcare JV to zero. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Investment in
Change Healthcare Joint Venture,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for
additional information related to this transaction.
Restructuring, Business Combinations, Investments and Divestitures
We have undertaken additional strategic initiatives in recent years designed to further focus on our core healthcare businesses
and enhance our competitive position. These initiatives are detailed in Financial Notes 2, 3, 4 and 5, “Investment in Change
Healthcare Joint Venture,” “Held for Sale,” “Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges,” and “Business Acquisitions and
Divestitures” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Competition
We face highly competitive global environments. Additionally, in recent years the healthcare industry has been subject to
increasing consolidation. In the pharmaceutical distribution environment in which our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
and European Pharmaceutical Solutions segments and McKesson Canada business operate, we face strong competition from
international, national, regional and local full-line, short-line and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing
chain drug stores, manufacturers engaged in direct distribution, third-party logistics companies and large payer organizations. Our
retail businesses, which primarily operate in our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and McKesson Canada business, face
competition from various local, regional, national and global retailers, including chain and independent pharmacies. We consider
our largest competitors in distribution, wholesaling and logistics to be AmerisourceBergen Corporation and Cardinal Health, Inc.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment operates primarily in providing distribution and logistics services to physicians’
offices, surgery centers, post-acute care facilities, hospital reference labs, home health agencies, and occupational and alternative
health sites and faces competition from a wide range of medical and surgical supply and equipment distributors throughout the
United States.
Our MRxTS business experiences substantial competition from many companies, including other software services firms,
consulting firms, shared service vendors and internet-based companies with technology applicable to the healthcare industry.
Competition in this business varies in size from small to large companies, in geographical coverage and in scope and breadth of
products and services offered.
In addition, we compete with other service providers, pharmaceutical and other healthcare manufacturers as well as other
potential customers of our businesses, which may from time-to-time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply
management capabilities that might otherwise be provided by our businesses. We believe that our scale and diversity of product and
service offerings are our primary competitive advantages. In all areas, key competitive factors include price, quality of service,
breadth of product lines, innovation and, in some cases, convenience to the customer.
7
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights and Licenses
McKesson and its subsidiaries hold patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade secrets related to McKesson products and
services. We pursue patent protection for our innovations and obtain copyright protection for our original works of authorship,
when such protection is advantageous. Through these efforts, we have developed a portfolio of patents and copyrights in the U.S.
and worldwide. In addition, we have registered or applied to register certain trademarks and service marks in the U.S. and in
foreign countries.
We believe that, in the aggregate, McKesson’s confidential information, patents, copyrights, trademarks and intellectual
property licenses are important to its operations and market position, but we do not consider any of our businesses to be dependent
upon any one patent, copyright, trademark, or trade secret, or any family or families of the same. We cannot guarantee that our
intellectual property portfolio will be sufficient to deter misappropriation, theft, or misuse of our technology, nor that we can
successfully enjoin infringers. We periodically receive notices alleging that our products or services infringe on third party patents
and other intellectual property rights. These claims may result in McKesson entering settlement agreements, paying damages,
discontinuing use or sale of accused products, or ceasing other activities. While the outcome of any litigation or dispute is
inherently uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any of these infringement notices would have a material adverse
impact on our results of operation.
We hold inbound licenses for certain intellectual property that is used internally, and in some cases, utilized in McKesson’s
products or services. While it may be necessary in the future to seek or renew licenses relating to various aspects of our products
and services, we believe, based upon past experience and industry practice, such licenses generally can be obtained on
commercially reasonable terms. We believe our operations and products and services are not materially dependent on any single
license or other agreement with any third party.
Other Information about the Business
Customers: During 2020, sales to our ten largest customers, including GPOs accounted for approximately 51% of our total
consolidated revenues. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 20% of our
total consolidated revenues in 2020. In May 2019, we extended our pharmaceutical distribution relationship with CVS to June
2023. Our ten largest customers comprised approximately 37%, and CVS was approximately 20%, of total trade accounts
receivable at March 31, 2020. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of
member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts
receivable balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists.
Substantially all of these revenues and accounts receivable are included in our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment.
Suppliers: We obtain pharmaceutical and other products from manufacturers, none of which accounted for more than 6% of
our purchases in 2020. The loss of a supplier could adversely affect our business if alternate sources of supply are unavailable. We
believe that our relationships with our suppliers are generally sound. The ten largest suppliers in 2020 accounted for approximately
44% of our purchases.
Some of our distribution arrangements with the manufacturers provides us compensation based on a percentage of our
purchases. In addition, we have certain distribution arrangements with pharmaceutical manufacturers that include an inflation-based
compensation component whereby we benefit when the manufacturers increase their prices as we sell our existing inventory at the
new higher prices. For these manufacturers, a reduction in the frequency and magnitude of price increases, as well as restrictions in
the amount of inventory available to us, could have an adverse impact on our gross profit margin.
Research and Development: Research and development (“R&D”) expenses were $96 million, $71 million and $125 million
during 2020, 2019 and 2018. R&D costs were higher in 2018 prior to the sale of our Enterprise Information Solutions (“EIS”)
business.
Environmental Regulation: Our operations are subject to regulations under various federal, state, local and foreign laws
concerning the environment, including laws addressing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water, the management and
disposal of hazardous substances and wastes, and the cleanup of contaminated sites. We could incur substantial costs, including
cleanup costs, fines and civil or criminal sanctions and third-party damage or personal injury claims, if in the future we were to
violate or become liable under environmental laws.
8
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We are committed to maintaining compliance with all environmental laws applicable to our operations, products and services
and to reducing our environmental impact across all aspects of our business. We meet this commitment through an environmental
strategy and sustainability program.
We sold our chemical distribution operations in 1987 and retained responsibility for certain environmental obligations.
Agreements with the Environmental Protection Agency and certain states may require environmental assessments and cleanups at
several closed sites. These matters are described further in Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The liability for environmental remediation and other environmental costs is accrued when the Company considers it probable
and can reasonably estimate the costs. Environmental costs and accruals, including that related to our legacy chemical distribution
operations, presently are not material to our operations or financial position. Although there is no assurance that existing or future
environmental laws applicable to our operations or products will not have a material adverse impact on our operations or financial
condition, we do not currently anticipate material capital expenditures for environmental matters. Other than the expected
expenditures that may be required in connection with our legacy chemical distribution operations, we do not anticipate making
substantial capital expenditures either for environmental issues, or to comply with environmental laws and regulations in the future.
The amount of our capital expenditures for environmental compliance was not material in 2020 and is not expected to be material
in the next year.
Employees: On March 31, 2020, we employed approximately 80,000 employees, including approximately 20,000 part-time
employees.
Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Operations: Certain financial information relating to foreign and domestic
operations is included in Financial Note 24, “Segments of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. See “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I below for information regarding risks associated with our
foreign operations.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annual Report on Form 10-K, including “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations” in Item 7 of Part II of this report and the “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I of this report, contains forward-looking
statements within the meaning of section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended and section 21E of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended. Some of these statements can be identified by use of forward-looking words such as “believes,”
“expects,” “anticipates,” “may,” “will,” “should,” “seeks,” “approximately,” “intends,” “plans” or “estimates,” or the negative of
these words, or other comparable terminology. The discussion of financial trends, strategy, plans or intentions may also include
forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those projected, anticipated, or implied. Although it is not possible to predict or identify all such risks and
uncertainties, they may include, but are not limited to, the factors discussed in Item 1A of Part I of this report under “Risk Factors.”
These and other risks and uncertainties are described herein and in other information contained in our publicly available SEC
filings and press releases. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only
as of the date such statements were first made. Except to the extent required by federal securities laws, we undertake no obligation
to publicly release the result of any revisions to these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date
hereof, or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
9
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 1A. Risk Factors
The discussion below identifies certain representative risks that might cause our actual business results to materially differ
from our estimates. It is not practical to identify or describe all risks and uncertainties that might materially impact our business
operations, reputation, financial position or results of operations. Our business could be materially affected by risks that we have
not yet identified or that we currently consider to be immaterial. This is not a complete statement of all potential risks and
uncertainties.
Litigation and Regulatory Risks
We experience costly and disruptive legal disputes.
We are routinely named as a defendant in litigation or regulatory proceedings and other legal disputes, which may include
asserted class action litigation, such as those described in Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
consolidated financial statements in this report. Regulatory proceedings might involve allegations such as false claims, healthcare
fraud and abuse, and antitrust violations. Civil litigation proceedings might involve commercial, employment, environmental,
intellectual property, tort and other claims. Despite valid defenses that we assert, legal disputes are often costly, time-consuming,
distracting to management and disruptive to normal business operations. The outcome of legal disputes is difficult to predict.
Outcomes can occur that are not justified by the evidence or existing law. The uncertainty and expense associated with unresolved
legal disputes might harm our business and reputation even if the matter is favorably resolved. Accordingly, any legal dispute might
have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might experience losses not covered by insurance.
Our business exposes us to risks that are inherent in the distribution, manufacturing, dispensing and administration of
pharmaceuticals and medical-surgical supplies, the provision of ancillary services, the conduct of our payer businesses and the
provision of products that assist clinical decision-making and relate to patient medical histories and treatment plans. For example,
pharmacy operations are exposed to risks such as improper filling of prescriptions, mislabeling of prescriptions, inadequacy of
warnings, unintentional distribution of counterfeit drugs and expiration of drugs. Although we seek to maintain adequate insurance
coverage, such as property insurance for inventory and professional and general liability insurance, coverages on acceptable terms
might be unavailable, or coverages might not cover our losses. We generally seek to limit our contractual exposure, but limitations
of liability or indemnity provisions in our contracts may not be enforceable or adequately protect us from liability. Uninsured losses
might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We experience costly legal disputes, government actions and adverse publicity regarding our role in distributing controlled
substances such as opioids.
The Company is a defendant in over 3,000 cases alleging claims related to the distribution of controlled substances (opioids),
as described in Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements in this
report. We regularly are named as a defendant in similar, new cases. The plaintiffs in those cases include governmental entities
(such as states, provinces, counties and municipalities) as well as businesses, groups and individuals. The cases allege violations of
controlled substance laws and other laws, and they make common law claims such as negligence and public nuisance. Many of
these cases raise novel theories of liability. Any proceedings can have unexpected outcomes that are not justified by evidence or
existing law. All proceedings involve significant expense, management time and distraction, and risk of loss that can be difficult to
predict or quantify. It is not uncommon for claims to be resolved over many years. Proceedings can result in monetary damages,
penalties and fines, and injunctive or other relief. Although the Company has valid defenses and is vigorously defending itself,
some proceedings are resolved by negotiated outcome. Our reputation is impacted by publicity regarding the impacts of opioid use.
The adverse outcome of legal proceedings might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might experience increased costs to distribute controlled substances such as opioids.
Legislative, regulatory or industry measures related to the distribution of controlled substances such as prescription opioids
could affect our business in ways that we may not be able to predict. For example, some states have passed legislation that could
require us to pay taxes or assessments on the distribution of opioid medications in those states and other states have considered
similar legislation. Liabilities for taxes or assessments or other costs of compliance under any such laws might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
10
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We are subject to extensive, complex and challenging healthcare and other laws.
Our industry is highly regulated, and further regulation of our distribution businesses and technology products and services
could impose increased costs, negatively impact our profit margins and the profit margins of our customers, delay the introduction
or implementation of our new products, or otherwise negatively impact our business and expose the Company to litigation and
regulatory investigations. For example, we are subject to many environmental and hazardous materials regulations, including those
relating to radiation-emitting equipment operated at U.S. Oncology Network practices. Any noncompliance by us with applicable
laws or the failure to maintain, renew or obtain necessary permits and licenses could lead to litigation and might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We are subject to extensive and frequently changing local, state and federal laws and regulations relating to healthcare fraud,
waste and abuse.
Local, state and federal governments continue to strengthen their position and scrutiny over practices involving fraud, waste
and abuse affecting Medicare, Medicaid and other government healthcare programs. Our relationships with pharmaceutical and
medical surgical product manufacturers and healthcare providers, as well as our provision of products and services to government
entities, subject our business to laws and regulations on fraud and abuse, which among other things: (1) prohibit persons from
soliciting, offering, receiving or paying any remuneration in order to induce the referral of a patient for treatment or to induce the
ordering or purchasing of items or services that are in any way paid for by Medicare, Medicaid or other government-sponsored
healthcare programs; (2) impose many restrictions upon referring physicians and providers of designated health services under
Medicare and Medicaid programs; and (3) prohibit the knowing submission of a false or fraudulent claim for payment to, and
knowing retention of an overpayment by, a federal healthcare program such as Medicare and Medicaid. Many of these laws,
including those relating to marketing incentives, are vague or indefinite and have not been interpreted by the courts. The laws may
be interpreted or applied by a prosecutorial, regulatory, or judicial authority in a manner that could require us to make changes in
our operations. Failures to comply with applicable laws subject us to federal or state government investigations or qui tam actions,
and to liability for damages and civil and criminal penalties, including the loss of licenses or our ability to participate in Medicare,
Medicaid and other federal and state healthcare programs. These sanctions might have a materially adverse impact on our business
operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might lose our ability to purchase, compound, store or distribute pharmaceuticals and controlled substances.
We are subject to the operating and security standards of the Drug Enforcement Administration (“DEA”), the U.S. Food and
Drug Administration (“FDA”), various state boards of pharmacy, state health departments, HHS, the Centers for Medicare &
Medicaid Services (“CMS”) and other comparable agencies. Certain of our businesses may be required to register for permits
and/or licenses with, and comply with operating and security standards of, the DEA, FDA, HHS, CMS, various state boards of
pharmacy, state health departments and/or comparable state agencies as well as foreign agencies and certain accrediting bodies,
depending upon the type of operations and location of product development, manufacture, distribution, and sale. For example, we
are required to hold valid DEA and state-level registrations and licenses, meet various security and operating standards and comply
with the Controlled Substances Act and its accompanying regulations governing the sale, marketing, packaging, holding,
distribution, and disposal of controlled substances. Noncompliance with these requirements has resulted in monetary penalties
and/or licensing sanctions. For example, under a January 2017 agreement with the DEA and Department of Justice we paid $150
million to settle potential administrative and civil claims about our practices for reporting suspicious orders of controlled
substances and the DEA suspended, on a staggered basis for limited periods of time, our registrations to distribute certain controlled
substances from four distribution centers. As of March 31, 2020, one DEA registration was in suspension, and three were expired.
If we are not able to obtain, maintain or renew permits, licenses or other regulatory approvals needed for the operation of our
businesses, it might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Pedigree tracking laws increase our compliance burden and our pharmaceutical distribution costs.
There have been increasing efforts by governments to regulate the pharmaceutical distribution system in order to prevent the
introduction of counterfeit, adulterated and/or mislabeled drugs into the pharmaceutical distribution system, otherwise known as
pedigree tracking. For example, the U.S. Drug Quality and Security Act of 2013 (“DQSA”) requires us to participate in a federal
prescription drug track and trace system that preempts state drug pedigree requirements, and the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration Amendments Act of 2007 requires the FDA to establish standards and identify and validate effective technologies,
such as track and trace or authentication technologies, to secure the pharmaceutical supply chain against counterfeit drugs. We also
have record-keeping and other obligations under the E.U. Falsified Medicines Directive. Pedigree tracking laws such as these
increase our compliance burden and our pharmaceutical distribution costs, and they might have a materially adverse impact on our
business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
11
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Privacy and data protection laws increase our compliance burden.
We are subject to a variety of privacy and data protection laws that change frequently and have requirements that vary from
jurisdiction to jurisdiction. For example, under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (“HIPAA”) we
must maintain administrative, physical and technological safeguards to protect individually identifiable health information
(“protected health information”) and ensure the confidentiality, integrity and availability of electronic protected health information.
We are subject to significant compliance obligations under privacy laws such as the General Data Protection Regulation in the
European Union (“GDPR”), the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”) in Canada, and the
California Consumer Protection Act (“CCPA”). Some privacy laws prohibit the transfer of personal information to certain other
jurisdictions. We are subject to privacy and data protection compliance audits or investigations by various government agencies.
Failure to comply with these laws subjects us to potential regulatory enforcement activity, fines, private litigation including class
actions, and other costs. We also have contractual obligations to customers that might be breached if we fail to comply with privacy
laws. Our efforts to comply with privacy laws complicates our operations and adds to our compliance costs. A significant privacy
breach or failure to comply with privacy laws might have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, business operations and
our financial position or results of operations.
Anti-bribery and anti-corruption laws increase our compliance burden.
We are subject to laws prohibiting improper payments and bribery, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U.K.
Bribery Act and similar regulations in foreign jurisdictions. The U.K. Bribery Act, for example, prohibits both domestic and
international bribery, as well as bribery across both private and public sectors. An organization that fails to prevent bribery
committed by anyone associated with the organization can be charged under the U.K. Bribery Act unless the organization can
establish the defense of having implemented adequate procedures to prevent bribery. Our failure to comply with these laws might
subject us to civil and criminal penalties that might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
Company and Operational Risks
We might record significant charges from impairment to goodwill, intangibles and other assets or investments.
We are required under U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (“GAAP”) to test our goodwill for impairment annually
or more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist. Indicators that are considered include significant changes in
performance relative to expected operating results, significant changes in the use of the assets, significant negative industry or
economic trends or a significant decline in the Company’s stock price and/or market capitalization for a sustained period of time. In
addition, we periodically review our intangible and other long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances, such as a divestiture, indicate the carrying value may not be recoverable. Factors that may be considered a change in
circumstances indicating that the carrying value of our intangible and other long-lived assets may not be recoverable include slower
growth rates, the loss of a significant customer, burdensome new laws or divestiture of a business or asset for less than its carrying
value. There are inherent uncertainties in management’s estimates, judgments and assumptions used in assessing recoverability of
goodwill, intangible and other long-lived assets. Any material changes in key assumptions, including failure to meet business plans,
negative changes in government reimbursement rates, a deterioration in the U.S. and global financial markets, an increase in
interest rate or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the industry or other unanticipated events
and circumstances, may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and could potentially result in an
impairment charge. For example, the COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted the global economy and exacerbated uncertainties
inherent in estimates, judgments and assumptions used in our forecasts and impairment assessments. We may be required to record
a significant charge to earnings in our consolidated financial statements during the period in which any impairment of our goodwill
or intangible and other long-lived assets is determined, which might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations
and our financial position or results of operations.
12
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We experience cybersecurity incidents and might experience significant computer system compromises or data breaches.
We and our external service providers use sophisticated computer systems to perform our business operations, such as the
secure electronic transmission, processing, storage and hosting of sensitive information, including protected health information and
other types of personal information, confidential financial information, proprietary information, and other sensitive information
relating to our customers, company and workforce. Many of these systems have experienced and are subject to cybersecurity
incidents, despite physical, technical and administrative security measures. Cyber incidents include actual or attempted
unauthorized access, tampering, malware insertion, ransomware attacks or other system integrity events. The risk of cyber incidents
may be increased while many of our personnel are working remotely due to the COVID-19 pandemic. A cybersecurity incident
might involve a material data breach or other material impact to the integrity and operations of these computer systems, which
might result in litigation or regulatory action, loss of customers or revenue, increased expense, any of which might have a
materially adverse impact on our business operations, reputation and our financial position or results of operations.
We might experience significant problems with information systems or networks.
We rely on sophisticated information systems and networks to perform our business operations, such as to obtain, rapidly
process, analyze and manage data that facilitate the purchase and distribution of thousands of inventory items from distribution
centers. Our dependence on network availability is increased while many of our personnel are working remotely due to the
COVID-19 pandemic. If those information systems are unsuccessfully implemented, fail, suffer errors or interruptions, or become
unavailable, it might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Our products or services might not conform to specifications or perform as we intend.
We sell and provide services involving complex software and technology that may contain errors, especially when first
introduced to market. Healthcare professionals delivering patient care tend to have heightened sensitivity to system and software
errors. If our software and technology services are alleged to have contributed to faulty clinical decisions or injury to patients, we
might be subject to claims or litigation by users of or software or services or their patients. Errors or failures might damage our
reputation and negatively affect future sales. A failure of a system or software to conform to specifications might constitute a
breach of warranty that could result in repair costs, contract termination, refunds of amounts previously paid or claims for damages.
Any of these types of errors or failures might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might be impeded in providing customers online services and data access.
We provide remote services that involve hosting customer data and operating software on our own or third party systems. Our
customers rely on their ability to access the systems and their data as needed. The networks and hosting systems are vulnerable to
interruption or damage from sources beyond our control, such as power loss, telecommunications failures, fire, natural disasters,
software and hardware failures and cyberattacks. If the timely delivery of medical care or other customer business requirements are
impaired by data access, network or systems problems, we could be exposed to significant claims and reputational harm. Any such
problems might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might not realize expected benefits from business process initiatives.
We may implement restructuring, cost reduction or other business process initiatives that might result in extraordinary charges
and expenses, failures to achieve our desired objectives, or unintended consequences such as distraction of our management and
employees, business disruption, attrition beyond any planned reduction in workforce, inability to attract or retain key personnel and
reduced employee productivity. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
13
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be unable to successfully complete or integrate acquisitions or other business combinations.
Our growth strategy includes consummating acquisitions or other business combinations that either expand or complement our
business. To fund acquisitions, we may require financing that may not be available on acceptable terms. We may not receive
regulatory approvals needed to complete proposed transactions, or such approvals may be subject to delays or conditions that
reduce transaction benefits. Achieving the desired outcomes of business combinations involves significant risks including: diverting
management’s attention from other business operations; challenges with assimilating the acquired businesses, such as integration of
operations and systems; failure or delay in realizing operating synergies; difficulty retaining key acquired company personnel;
unanticipated accounting or financial systems issues with the acquired business, which might affect our internal controls over
financial reporting; unanticipated compliance issues in the acquired business; challenges retaining customers of the acquired
business; unanticipated expenses or charges to earnings, including depreciation and amortization or potential impairment charges;
and risks of known and unknown assumed liabilities in the acquired business. Any of these risks could adversely affect our ability
to achieve the anticipated benefits of an acquisition and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by delays or other difficulties with divestitures.
When we decide to sell assets or a business, we may encounter difficulty in finding buyers or exit strategies on acceptable
terms or in a timely manner, which could delay the achievement of our strategic objectives. After the disposition, we might
experience greater dissynergies than expected, and the impact of the divestiture on our revenue or profit might be larger than we
expected. We might have difficulties with pre-closing conditions such as regulatory and governmental approvals, which could delay
or prevent the divestiture. We might have financial exposure in a divested business, such as through minority equity ownership,
financial or performance guarantees, indemnities or other obligations, such that conditions outside of our control might negate the
expected benefits of the disposition. Any of these risks could adversely affect our ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of a
divestiture and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
We might not realize the expected tax treatment from our split-off of Change Healthcare.
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed a separation of its interest in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change Healthcare JV”).
The divestiture was effected through the split-off of PF2 SpinCo, Inc. (“SpinCo”), a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company that
held all of the Company’s interest in the Change Healthcare JV, to certain of the Company’s stockholders through an exchange offer
(the “Exchange Offer”), followed by a merger of SpinCo with and into Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”), with Change surviving
the merger (the “Merger” and, together with the Exchange Offer, the “Transactions”). The Company received an opinion from
outside legal counsel to the effect that the Transactions qualified as generally tax-free transactions to the Company and its
shareholders for U.S. federal income tax purposes. An opinion of legal counsel is not binding on the Internal Revenue Service (the
“IRS”) or the courts, and the IRS or the courts may not agree with the intended tax-free treatment of the Transactions. In addition,
the opinion could not be relied upon if certain assumptions, representations and undertakings upon which the opinion was based are
materially inaccurate or incomplete, or are violated in any material respect. If the intended tax-free treatment of the Transactions is
not sustained, the Company and its stockholders who participated in the Transactions may be required to pay substantial U.S.
federal income taxes. In connection with the Transactions, the Company, SpinCo, Change and the Change Healthcare JV entered
into the Tax Matters Agreement, which governs their respective rights, responsibilities and obligations with respect to tax liabilities
and benefits, tax attributes, tax contests and other tax sharing regarding U.S. federal, state and local, and non-U.S. taxes, other tax
matters and related tax returns. Under the Tax Matters Agreement, Change is required to indemnify the Company if the
Transactions become taxable as a result of certain actions by Change or SpinCo, or as a result of certain changes in ownership of
the stock of Change after the Merger. If Change does not honor its obligations to indemnify the Company, or if the Transactions fail
to qualify for the intended tax-free treatment for reasons not related to a disqualifying action by Change or SpinCo, the resulting tax
to the Company could have a significant adverse effect on our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by outsourcing or similar third-party relationships.
We rely on third parties to perform certain business and administrative functions for us. We might not adequately develop,
implement and monitor these outsourced service providers, and we might not realize expected cost savings or other benefits. Third-
party services providers might fail to perform as anticipated, or we might experience unanticipated operational difficulties,
compliance requirements or increased costs related to outsourced services. For example, our ability to use outsourcing resources in
certain jurisdictions might be limited by legislative action or customer contracts, with the result that the work must be performed at
greater expense or we may be subject to sanctions for non-compliance. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact
on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
14
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We may be unsuccessful in retail pharmacy operations or maintaining profitability.
Our business strategy included expanding our retail pharmacy operations. Our retail pharmacy operations involve numerous
risks, such as the following ones. We might encounter difficulties attracting and retaining customers to our retail locations due to
their unfamiliarity with our brands or our inexperience with local market preferences. Competition from our retail pharmacy
operations might strain relationships with our retail pharmacy customers. Consolidation of retail pharmacies with third party
payers, expansion of large retail pharmacy networks, reductions in reimbursement rates, shifts in the mix of branded and generic
pharmaceutical sales, and exclusion from preferred pharmacy networks can impair our retail pharmacy sales and profitability.
Failure to maintain profitable retail pharmacy operations may result in significant costs, including those associated with site
closures and reductions in workforce. If our retail pharmacy operations fail to achieve, or are unable to sustain, acceptable net sales
and profitability levels, it might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
We might be harmed by large customer purchase reductions, payment defaults or contract non-renewal.
We derive a significant portion of our revenue from, and have a significant portion of our accounts receivable with, a small
number of customers. At March 31, 2020, sales to our largest customer represented approximately 20% of our consolidated
revenues and approximately 20% of our trade receivables, and those of our ten largest customers combined accounted for
approximately 51% of our consolidated revenues and approximately 37% of our trade receivables. A material default in payment,
reduction in purchases, or the loss of business from a large customer might have a materially adverse impact on our business
operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Our contracts with government entities involve future funding and compliance risks.
Our contracts with government entities are subject to risks such as lack of funding and legal compliance. For example,
government contract purchase obligations are typically subject to the availability of funding, which may be eliminated. Our
government contracts might not be renewed or might be terminated for convenience with little or no prior notice. Government
contracts typically expose us to higher potential liability than do other types of contracts. In addition, government contracts
typically are subject to procurement laws that include socio-economic, employment practices, environmental protection,
recordkeeping and accounting and other requirements. For example, our contracts with the U.S. government generally require us to
comply with the Federal Acquisition Regulations, U.S. False Claims Act, Procurement Integrity Act, Buy American Act and Trade
Agreements Act. We are subject to government audits, investigations and oversight proceedings. Government agencies routinely
review and audit government contractors to determine whether they are complying with contractual and legal requirements. If we
fail to comply with these requirements, or we fail an audit, we are subject to various sanctions such as monetary damages, criminal
and civil penalties, termination of contracts and suspension or debarment from government contract work. These requirements
complicate our business and increase our compliance burden. The occurrence of any of these risks could harm our reputation and
might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be harmed by changes in our relationships or contracts with suppliers.
We attempt to structure our pharmaceutical distribution agreements with manufacturers to ensure that we are appropriately and
predictably compensated for the services we provide. Certain distribution agreements with manufacturers include pharmaceutical
price inflation as a component of our compensation, and we cannot control the frequency or magnitude of pharmaceutical price
changes. We might be unable to renew pharmaceutical distribution agreements with manufacturers in a timely and favorable
manner. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results
of operations.
15
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might infringe intellectual property rights or our intellectual property protections might be inadequate.
We believe that our products and services do not infringe the proprietary rights of third parties, but third parties have asserted
infringement claims against us and may do so in the future. If a court were to hold that we infringed other’s rights, we might be
required to pay substantial damages, develop non-infringing products or services, obtain a license, stop selling or using the
infringing products or services, or incur other sanctions. We rely on trade secret, patent, copyright and trademark laws,
nondisclosure obligations and other contractual provisions and technical measures to protect our proprietary rights in our products
and solutions. We might initiate costly and time-consuming litigation to protect our trade secrets, to enforce our patent, copyright
and trademark rights and to determine the scope and validity of the proprietary rights of others. Our intellectual property protection
efforts might be inadequate to protect our rights. Our competitors might develop non-infringing products or services equivalent or
superior to ours. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or
results of operations.
We might be unable to successfully recruit and retain qualified employees.
Our ability to attract, engage, develop and retain qualified and experienced employees, including key executives and other
talent, is essential for us to meet our objectives. We compete with many other businesses to attract and retain employees.
Competition among potential employers might result in increased salaries, benefits or other employee-related costs, or in our failure
to recruit and retain employees. We may experience sudden loss of key personnel due to a variety of causes, such as illness, and
must adequately plan for succession of key management roles. Employees might not successfully transition into new roles. Any of
these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Industry and Economic Risks
We might be adversely impacted by healthcare reform such as changes in pricing and reimbursement models.
Many of our products and services are designed and intended to function within the structure of current healthcare financing
and reimbursement systems. The healthcare industry and related government programs are changing significantly as they seek to
increase efficiencies, reduce costs and improve patient outcomes. These changes increase our risks and create uncertainties for our
business.
For example, reimbursement methodologies (including government rates) for pharmaceuticals, medical treatments and related
services reduce profit margins for us and our customers and impose new legal requirements on healthcare providers. Changes have
included cuts in Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement levels, changes in the basis for payments, shifting away from fee-for-
service and towards value-based payments and risk-sharing models, and increases in the use of managed care.
In the U.S., the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (“ACA”) significantly expanded health insurance coverage to
uninsured Americans and changed the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and private payers. There are continued
efforts to challenge the ACA. There are also efforts to broaden healthcare coverage. U.S. lawmakers also have explored proposals
to reduce drug prices, including requiring price transparency and drug importation measures. These proposals might result in
significant changes in the pharmaceutical value chain as manufacturers, PBM, managed care organizations and other industry
stakeholders look to implement new transactional flows and adapt their business models.
Provincial governments in Canada that provide partial funding for the purchase of pharmaceuticals and independently regulate
the sale and reimbursement of drugs have sought to reduce the costs of publicly funded health programs. For example, provincial
governments have taken steps to reduce consumer prices for generic pharmaceuticals and, in some provinces, change professional
allowances paid to pharmacists by generic manufacturers.
Many European governments provide or subsidize healthcare to consumers and regulate pharmaceutical prices, patient
eligibility and reimbursement levels in order to control government healthcare system costs. Some European governments have
implemented or are considering austerity measures to reduce healthcare spending. These measures exert pressure on the pricing and
reimbursement timelines for pharmaceuticals and may cause our customers to purchase fewer of our products and services or
influence us to reduce prices.
Although there is substantial uncertainty about the likelihood, timing and results of these health reform efforts, their
implementation might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
16
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be adversely impacted by competition and industry consolidation.
Our businesses face a highly competitive global environment with strong competition from international, national, regional and
local full-line, short-line and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing chain drug stores, manufacturers
engaged in direct distribution, third-party logistics companies and large payer organizations. In addition, our businesses face
competition from various other service providers and from pharmaceutical and other healthcare manufacturers as well as other
potential customers, which may from time-to-time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply management capabilities
that might otherwise be provided by our businesses. Due to consolidation, a few large suppliers control a significant share of the
pharmaceuticals market. This concentration reduces our ability to negotiate favorable terms with suppliers and causes us to depend
on a smaller number of suppliers. Many of our customers, including healthcare organizations, have consolidated and have greater
power to negotiate favorable prices. Consolidation by our customers, suppliers and competitors might reduce the number of market
participants and give the remaining enterprises greater bargaining power, which might lead to erosion in our profit margin.
Consolidation might increase counter-party credit risk because credit purchases increase for fewer market participants. These
competitive pressures and industry consolidation might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by changes or disruptions in product supply.
Our supply arrangements might be interrupted or adversely affected by a variety of causes over which we have no control, such
as export controls or trade sanctions, labor disputes, unavailability of key manufacturing sites, inability to procure raw materials,
quality control concerns, ethical sourcing issues, supplier’s financial distress, natural disasters, civil unrest or acts of war. Our
inventory might be requisitioned, diverted or allocated by government order such as under emergency, disaster and civil defense
declarations. For example, government actions in response to the COVID-19 pandemic affect our supply allocation, and those and
our own allocation decisions can impact our customer relationships. Changes in the healthcare industry’s or our suppliers’ pricing,
selling, inventory, distribution or supply policies or practices could significantly reduce our revenues and net income. We might
experience disruptions in our supply of higher margin pharmaceuticals, including generic pharmaceuticals. Any of these changes or
disruptions might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted as a result of our distribution of generic pharmaceuticals.
Our generic pharmaceuticals distribution business is subject to pricing risks. We might be adversely impacted if our
ClarusONE generic pharmaceutical sourcing joint venture with Walmart, Inc. is unsuccessful or experiences margins declines.
Generic drug manufacturers often offer a generic version of branded pharmaceuticals while they challenge the validity or
enforceability branded pharmaceutical patents. The patent holder might assert infringement claims against us for distributing those
generic versions and the generic drug manufactures may not fully indemnify us against such claims. These risks, as well as changes
in the availability, pricing volatility, reimbursement rates for generic drugs, or significant changes in the nature, frequency or
magnitude of generic pharmaceutical launches, might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by an economic slowdown or recession.
An economic slowdown or recession affecting our businesses in one or more regions could reduce the prices our customers are
able or willing to pay for our products and services and the volume of their purchases. This risk is increased by the COVID-19
pandemic. Any economic slowdown or recession might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
17
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Disruption or other changes in capital and credit markets might impede access to credit and increase borrowing costs for us and
our customers and suppliers and might impair the financial soundness of our customers and suppliers.
Volatility and disruption in global capital and credit markets, including the bankruptcy or restructuring of certain financial
institutions, reduced lending activity by financial institutions, or decreased liquidity and increased costs in the commercial paper
market, might adversely affect our borrowing ability and cost of borrowing. We generally sell our products and services under
short-term unsecured credit arrangements. An adverse change in general economic conditions or access to capital might cause our
customers to reduce their purchases from us, or delay or fail paying amounts owed to us. Suppliers might increase their prices,
reduce their output or change their terms of sale due to limited availability of credit. Suppliers might be unable to make payments
due to us for fees, returned products or incentives. These risks are increased by the COVID-19 pandemic. Interest rate increases or
changes in capital market conditions might impede our or our customers’ or suppliers’ ability or cost to obtain credit. For example,
interest rate costs on types of borrowings that have historically been linked to the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) may
increase when LIBOR is replaced by reference rates such as the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”). Any of these risks
might have a material adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We may have difficulties in sourcing or selling products due to a variety of causes.
We might experience difficulties and delays in sourcing and selling products due to a variety of causes, such as: difficulties in
complying with the legal requirements for export or import of pharmaceuticals or components; suppliers’ failure to satisfy
production demand; manufacturing or supply problems such as inadequate resources; and real or perceived quality issues.
Difficulties in product manufacturing or access to raw materials could result in supplier production shutdowns, product shortages
and other supply disruptions. The FDA banned certain manufacturers from selling raw materials and drug ingredients in the U.S.
due to quality issues. The COVID-19 pandemic adversely affects the availability of some products, resulting in product allocation
and delivery delays. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by tax legislation or challenges to our tax positions.
We are subject to the tax laws in the United States at the federal, state and local government levels and to the tax laws of many
other jurisdictions in which we operate or sell products or services. Tax laws might change in ways that adversely affect our tax
positions, effective tax rate and cash flow. The tax laws are extremely complex and subject to varying interpretations. We are
subject to tax examinations in various jurisdictions that might assess additional tax liabilities against us. Our tax reporting positions
might be challenged by relevant tax authorities, we might incur significant expense in our efforts to defend those challenges, and
we might be unsuccessful those efforts. Developments in examinations and challenges might materially change our provision for
taxes in the affected periods and might differ materially from our historical tax accruals. Any of these risks might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations, our cash flows and our financial position or results of operations
We might be adversely impacted by the Brexit withdrawal of the United Kingdom from the European Union.
We have operations in the U.K. and the European Union (“E.U.”) and face risks associated with the uncertainty and potential
disruptions that might follow the United Kingdom withdrawing from the European Union (“Brexit”). Brexit could adversely affect
political, regulatory, economic or market conditions and contribute to instability in global political institutions, regulatory agencies
and financial markets. For example, we might experience volatility in exchange rates and interest rates and changes in laws
regulating our U.K. operations. Customers might reduce purchases due to the uncertainty caused by Brexit. Any of these risks
might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates.
We conduct our business in various currencies, including the U.S. dollar, euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar.
Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could reduce our revenues, increase our costs or otherwise adversely affect our
financial results reported in U.S. dollars. For example, we are exposed to transactional currency exchange risk due to our import
and export of products that are purchased or sold in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. We also have currency exchange risk due
to intercompany loans denominated in various currencies. The COVID-19 pandemic has affected and might increase currency
exchange rate volatility. We may from time to time enter into foreign currency contracts, foreign currency borrowings or other
techniques intended to hedge a portion of our foreign currency exchange rate risks. These hedging activities may not completely
offset the adverse financial effects of unfavorable movements in foreign currency exchange rates during the time the hedges are in
place. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
18
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Other Risks
We might be adversely impacted by events outside of our control, such as widespread public health issues, natural disasters,
political events and other catastrophic events.
We might be adversely affected by events outside of our control, including: widespread public health issues, such as epidemic
or pandemic infectious diseases; natural disasters such as earthquakes, hurricanes or floods; political events such as terrorism,
military conflicts and trade wars; and other catastrophic events. These events might disrupt operations for us, our suppliers and our
customers. They might affect consumer confidence levels and spending. In response to these events, we might suspend operations,
implement extraordinary procedures, seek alternate sources for product supply, or suffer consequences that are unexpected and
difficult to mitigate. In particular, the rapid and widespread transmission of the SARS-CoV-2 novel coronavirus beginning in late
2019 impacts us in significant ways. For example, to mitigate the spread of the COVID-19 disease caused by SARS-CoV-2, we
implemented travel restrictions and remote working arrangements for most of our employees in order to minimize physical contact,
and we implemented additional sanitation and personal protection measures in our warehouse, retail pharmacy and delivery
operations. These measures might not fully mitigate COVID-19 risks to our workforce and we could experience unusual levels of
absenteeism that might impair operations and delay delivery of products. The COVID-19 pandemic affects product manufacturing,
supply and transport availability and cost. The pandemic reduces demand for some products due to delays or cancellations of
elective medical procedures, consumer self-isolation and business closures, among other reasons. The COVID-19 pandemic
influences shortages of some products, with product allocation resulting in delivery delays for customers. The ongoing impacts of
the pandemic might cause a general economic slowdown or recession in one or more markets, disruptions and volatility in global
capital markets and other broad and adverse effects on the economy, business conditions, commercial activity and the healthcare
industry. The pandemic might impact our business operation, financial position and results of operation in unpredictable ways that
depend on highly-uncertain future developments, such as determining the effectiveness of current or future government actions to
address the public health or economic impacts of the pandemic. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our
business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by changes in accounting standards.
Our consolidated financial statements are subject to the application of U.S. GAAP, which periodically is revised or
reinterpreted. From time to time, we are required to adopt new or revised accounting standards issued by recognized authoritative
bodies, including the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) and the SEC. It is possible that future accounting standards
may require changes to the accounting treatment in our consolidated financial statements and may require us to make significant
changes to our financial systems. Such changes might have a materially adverse impact on our financial position or results of
operations.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
None.
Item 2. Properties.
Because of the nature of our principal businesses, our plant, warehousing, retail pharmacies, office and other facilities are
operated in widely dispersed locations, primarily throughout North America and Europe. The warehouses and retail pharmacies are
typically owned or leased on a long-term basis. We consider our operating properties to be in satisfactory condition and adequate to
meet our needs for the next several years without making capital expenditures materially higher than historical levels. Information
as to material lease commitments is included in Financial Note 13, “Leases,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
Certain legal proceedings in which we are involved are discussed in Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent
Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
19
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth information regarding the executive officers of the Company, including their principal
occupations during the past five years. The number of years of service with the Company includes service with predecessor
companies.
There are no family relationships between any of the executive officers or directors of the Company. The executive officers are
elected on an annual basis generally and their term expires at the first meeting of the Board of Directors (“Board”) following the
annual meeting of stockholders, or until their successors are elected and have qualified, or until death, resignation or removal,
whichever is sooner.
Name  Age Position with Registrant and Business Experience
  
Brian S. Tyler
 53 Chief Executive Officer since April 2019; President and Chief
Operating Officer from August 2018 to March 2019; Chairman of the
Management Board of McKesson Europe AG from 2017 to 2018;
President and Chief Operating Officer, McKesson Europe from 2016
to 2017; President of North America Distribution and Services from
2015 to 2016; Executive Vice President, Corporate Strategy and
Business Development from 2012 to 2015; and a director since April
2019. Service with the Company - 23 years.
Britt J. Vitalone
 51 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since January
2018; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S.
Pharmaceutical from July 2014 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S. Pharmaceutical and
Specialty Health from October 2017 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President of Corporate Finance and M&A Finance from March 2012
to June 2014. Service with the Company - 14 years.
Tracy Faber
 50 Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer since
October 2019. Previously, Senior Vice President of Human
Resources. Service with the Company - 9 years.
Nancy Flores
 53 Executive Vice President, Chief Information Officer and Chief
Technology Officer since January 2020; Chief Information Officer,
Johnson Controls from 2018 to July 2019. Corporate Officer and Vice
President of Business and Technology Services, Abbott Laboratories
from 1996 to 2018. Service with the Company - less than 1 year.
Lori A. Schechter
 58 Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and General Counsel
since June 2014; Associate General Counsel from January 2012 to
June 2014; Litigation Partner, Morrison & Foerster LLP from 1995 to
December 2011. Service with the Company - 8 years.
20
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART II
Item 5. Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities.
(a)Market Information: The principal market on which our common stock is traded is the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”)
under the trading symbol of “MCK”.
(b)Holders: The number of record holders of our common stock at March 31, 2020 was approximately 5,034.
(c)Dividends: In July 2019, our quarterly dividend was raised from $0.39 to $0.41 per common share for dividends declared on or
after such date by the Board. We declared regular cash dividends of $1.62 and $1.51 per share in the years ended March 31,
2020 and 2019.
We anticipate that we will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future
dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon our future earnings, financial condition, capital
requirements and other factors.
(d)Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans: Information relating to this item is provided under Part
III, Item 12, to this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(e)Share Repurchase Plans: Stock repurchases may be made from time to time in open market transactions, privately negotiated
transactions, through accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by any combination of such methods. The timing of
any repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including our stock price,
corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations and other market and economic conditions.
During the last three years, our share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions and ASR programs
with third-party financial institutions.
In 2018, we repurchased 3.5 million shares for $500 million through open market transactions at an average price per share of
$144.43. In June 2017, August 2017 and March 2018, we entered into three separate ASR programs with third-party financial
institutions to repurchase $250 million, $400 million and $500 million of our common stock. As of March 31, 2018, we completed
and received a total of 1.5 million shares under the June 2017 ASR program and a total of 2.7 million shares under the August 2017
ASR program. In addition, we received 2.5 million shares representing the initial number of shares due in March 2018 and an
additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019. The March 2018 ASR program was completed at an average price per
share of $143.66 during the first quarter of 2019. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of our common stock was $1.1
billion at March 31, 2018.
In May 2018, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of our common stock. The total authorization
outstanding for repurchases of our common stock was increased to $5.1 billion at that time. During 2019, we repurchased 10.4
million shares for $1.4 billion through open market transactions at an average price per share of $132.14. In December 2018, we
entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $250 million of our common stock. The total
number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 2.1 million shares at an average price per share of $117.98. The total
authorization outstanding for repurchase of our common stock was $3.5 billion at March 31, 2019.
In 2019, we retired 5.0 million or $542 million of our treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable state law,
these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with our accounting policy, we
allocate any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained earnings. Accordingly,
our retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during 2019.
In 2020, we repurchased 9.2 million shares for $1.3 billion through open market transactions at an average price per share of
$144.68. In May 2019, we entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $600 million of our
common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 4.7 million shares at an average price per
share of $127.68. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of our common stock was $1.5 billion at March 31, 2020.
21
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
The following table provides information on our share repurchases during the fourth quarter of 2020:
 Share Repurchases (1)
(In millions, except price per shar e)Total
Number of Shares
Purchased (2) Average Price Paid
per Share  Total Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced
Programs (2)Approximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased Under
the Programs
January 1, 2020 - January 31, 2020 — $ — — $ 1,535
February 1, 2020 - February 29, 2020 — — — 1,535
March 1, 2020 - March 31, 2020 15.4 — 15.4 1,535
Total 15.4  15.4
(1)This table does not include shares tendered to satisfy the exercise price in connection with cashless exercises of employee stock options or shares tendered to
satisfy tax-withholding obligations in connection with employee equity awards.
(2)On March 9, 2020, we completed the previously announced separation (“Split-off”) of our interest in the Change Healthcare JV. In connection with the Split-
off, we distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of common stock of our wholly owned subsidiary, PF2 SpinCo, Inc. (“SpinCo”), which held all of
McKesson’s interests in the Change Healthcare JV, to participating holders of our common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares of McKesson stock which
now are held as treasury stock on our consolidated balance sheet. Refer to Financial Note 22, “Stockholders' Equity,” to the accompanying consolidated
financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information.
(f)Stock Price Performance Graph*: The following graph compares the cumulative total stockholder return on our common stock
for the periods indicated with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index and the S&P 500 Health Care Index. The S&P 500 Health Care
Index was selected as a comparator because it is generally available to investors and broadly used by other companies in the
same industry.
 March 31,
 2015  2016  2017 2018 2019 2020
McKesson Corporation $ 100.00 $ 69.92 $ 66.37 $ 63.06 $ 52.40 $ 60.55
S&P 500 Index $ 100.00 $ 101.78 $ 119.26 $ 135.95 $ 148.86 $ 138.47
S&P 500 Health Care Index $ 100.00 $ 94.82 $ 105.81 $ 117.74 $ 135.27 $ 133.90
* Assumes $100 invested in McKesson Common Stock and in each index on March 31, 2015 and that all dividends are reinvested.
22
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
FIVE-YEAR HIGHLIGHTS
 As of and for  the Years Ended Mar ch 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data and ratios) 2020  2019 2018  2017 2016
Operating Results      
Revenues $231,051  $214,319 $208,357  $198,533 $190,884
Percent change 7.8% 2.9% 4.9 % 4.0 % 6.6%
Gross profit $ 12,023  $ 11,754 $ 11,184  $ 11,271 $ 11,416
Percent change 2.3% 5.1% (0.8)% (1.3)% —%
Income from continuing operations before income
taxes (1)$ 1,144  $ 610 $ 239  $ 6,861 $ 3,250
Income (Loss) after income taxes      
Continuing operations (1)1,126  254 292  5,277 2,342
Discontinued operations (6) 1 5 (124) (32)
Net income 1,120  255 297  5,153 2,310
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests
(2) (220) (221) (230) (83) (52)
Net income attributable to McKesson Corporation
(1) 900  34 67  5,070 2,258
      
Financial Position      
Working capital $ (402) $ 839 $ 451  $ 1,336 $ 3,366
Days sales outstanding for: (3)     
Customer receivables 26  26 25  27 28
Inventories 27  31 30  30 32
Drafts and accounts payable 61  62 60  61 59
Total assets $ 61,247  $ 59,672 $ 60,381  $ 60,969 $ 56,523
Total debt, including finance lease obligations (4)7,387  7,595 7,880  8,545 8,114
Total McKesson stockholders’  equity (5)5,092  8,094 9,804  11,095 8,924
Payments for property , plant and equipment 362  426 405  404 488
Acquisitions, net of cash, cash equivalents and
restricted cash acquired 133  905 2,893  4,212 40
      
Common Shar e Information      
Common shares outstanding at year -end 162  190 202  211 225
Shares on which earnings per common share were
based      
Diluted 182  197 209  223 233
Basic 181  196 208  221 230
Diluted earnings (loss) per common share attributable
to McKesson Corporation (5)     
Continuing operations $ 4.99  $ 0.17 $ 0.30  $ 23.28 $ 9.84
Discontinued operations (0.04 ) — 0.02  (0.55 ) (0.14 )
Total 4.95  0.17 0.32  22.73 9.70
Cash dividends declared 294  298 270  249 249
Cash dividends declared per common share 1.62  1.51 1.30  1.12 1.08
Book value per common share (6) (7)31.43  42.60 48.53  52.58 39.66
Market value per common share - year -end 135.26  117.06 140.87  148.26 157.25
      
Supplemental Data      
Debt to capital ratio (8)52.1% 43.3% 40.6 % 39.2 % 43.6%
Average McKesson stockholders’  equity (9)$ 6,743  $ 9,163 $ 11,016  $ 9,282 $ 8,688
Return on McKesson stockholders’  equity (10)13.3% 0.4% 0.6 % 54.6 % 26.0%
23
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Footnotes to Five-Y ear Highlights:
(1) 2020 includes  a pre-tax other-than-temporary impairment charge of $1.2 billion  ($864 million  after-tax) and a pre-tax dilution loss of $246
million  ($184 million  after-tax) related to our investment in the Change Healthcare Joint Venture, charges of $275 million  (pre-ta x and after-
tax) to remeasure to fair value the assets and liabilities of the Company’ s German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture and
an estimated gain of $414 million  relating to the split-of f of its investment in the Change Healthcare Joint Venture. 2019 includes pre-tax
goodwill impairment charges of $1.8 billion (pre-ta x and after-tax) primarily for our two reporting units within our European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment. 2018 includes total goodwill impairment charges of $1.7 billion (pre-tax and after-tax) for our European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment and Other . The goodwill impairment charges are generally not deductible for income tax purposes. 2020, 2019 and 2018
also include asset impairm ent charges of $82 million  ($66 million  after tax), $210 million  ($172 million  after-tax) and $446 million  ($410
million  after-tax) primarily for our U.K. retail businesses. 2017 includes a pre-tax gain of $3.9 billion  ($3.0 billion  after-tax) from the
contribution of the majority of our Core MTS Business in connection with the Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange as discussed in
Financial Note 2 , “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture .”
(2) Includes annual recurring compensation McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe. 2020, 2019,
2018 and 2017 include net income attributable to third-party equity interests in our consolidated entities including Vantage Oncology
Holdings, LLC and ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP , which was formed in 2017.
(3) Based on year -end balances and sales or cost of sales for the last 90 days of the year .
(4) Total debt includes finance lease obligations for 2020. Prior to the adoption of the amended lease guidanc e in 2020, these were capital lease
obligations. Refer to Financial Note 1  , “Significant Accounting Policies ,” for additional information.
(5) Excludes noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
(6) Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(7) Represents McKesson stockholders’  equity divided by year -end common shares outstanding.
(8) Ratio is computed as total debt divided by the sum of total debt and McKesson stockholders’  equity excluding accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss).
(9) Represents a five-quarter average of McKesson stockholders’  equity .
(10) Ratio is computed as net income (loss) attributable to McKesson Corporation for the last four quarters, divided by a five-quarter average of
McKesson stockholders’  equity .
24
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
GENERAL
Management’s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, referred to as the “Financial Review,” is
intended to assist the reader in the understanding and assessment of significant changes and trends related to the results of
operations and financial position of McKesson Corporation together with its subsidiaries (collectively, the “Company,” “we,”
“our,” or “us” and other similar pronouns). This discussion and analysis should be read in conjunction with the consolidated
financial statements and accompanying financial notes in Item 8 of Part II of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our fiscal year
begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a particular year shall mean our fiscal year.
Certain statements in this report constitute forward-looking statements. See Item 1 - Business - Forward-Looking Statements in
Part I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional factors relating to these statements; also see Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part
I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for a list of certain risk factors applicable to our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
Overview of Our Business:
We are a global leader in healthcare supply chain management solutions, retail pharmacy, community oncology and specialty
care, and healthcare technology. We partner with life sciences companies, manufacturers, providers, pharmacies, governments and
other healthcare organizations to help provide the right medicines, medical products and healthcare services to the right patients at
the right time, safely and cost-effectively.
We conduct our business through three reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European
Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that are not
significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are included in Other, which primarily consists of McKesson
Canada, McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions (“MRxTS”) and our investment in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change
Healthcare JV”), which was split-off from the Company in the fourth quarter of 2020 as further discussed in this Financial Review.
Our organizational structure also includes Corporate, which consists of income and expenses associated with administrative
functions and projects, and the results of certain investments. The factors for determining the reportable segments include the
manner in which management evaluates the performance of the Company combined with the nature of the individual business
activities. We evaluate the performance of our operating segments on a number of measures, including revenues and operating
profit before interest expense and income taxes. Refer to Financial Note 24, “Segments of Business,” to the accompanying
consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for a description of these segments.
25
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Executive Summary:
The following executive summary provides highlights and key factors that impacted our business, operating results and
liquidity for the year ended March 31, 2020. The coronavirus disease 2019 (“COVID-19”) did not significantly impact our financial
condition, results of operations or liquidity in 2020. For a more in-depth discussion of how COVID-19 impacted our business,
operations, and outlook, see the COVID-19 section of "Trends and Uncertainties" included below.
•Revenues of $231.1 billion, reflecting an 8% increase from the prior year driven primarily by market growth in our U.S.
Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment, including branded pharmaceutical price increases and higher volumes
from retail national account customers;
•Gross profit increased 2% from the prior year primarily driven by market growth in our Medical-Surgical Solutions
segment;
•On October 21, 2019, we disclosed an opioid-related litigation settlement with two Ohio counties and recorded a related
charge of $82 million in total operating expenses;
•On December 12, 2019, McKesson and Walgreens Boots Alliance announced an agreement to create a joint venture that is
expected to combine their respective pharmaceutical wholesale businesses in Germany. As a result of this agreement, we
recognized fair value remeasurement charges of $275 million in total operating expenses within our European
Pharmaceutical Solutions segment;
•On March 10, 2020, we completed the previously announced separation of our investment in Change Healthcare JV and
recognized an estimated gain of $414 million related to this transaction. We no longer hold an interest in any securities of
Change Healthcare JV or Change Healthcare, Inc. (“Change”) following the separation. During the second quarter of
2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary-impairment (“OTTI”) charge of $1.2 billion and a dilution loss of $246
million related to our investment in Change Healthcare JV;
•Diluted earnings per common share from continuing operations attributable to McKesson Corporation in 2020 of $4.99
reflects the aforementioned items and a lower share count compared to the prior year driven largely by share repurchases;
and
•We returned $2.2 billion of cash to shareholders through $1.9 billion of common stock repurchases and $294 million of
dividend payments.
Trends and Uncertainties:
COVID-19
In December 2019, a novel strain of coronavirus, which causes the infectious disease known as COVID-19, was reported in
Wuhan, China. The World Health Organization declared COVID-19 a “Public Health Emergency of International Concern” on
January 30, 2020 and a global pandemic on March 11, 2020.
We continue to evaluate the nature and extent COVID-19 may have to our business and operations. The pandemic is
developing rapidly and the full extent to which COVID-19 will impact us depends on future developments, including the duration
and spread of the virus, as well as potential seasonality of new outbreaks.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, federal, state, and local government directives and policies have been put in place in
the United States to enhance availability of medications and supplies to meet the increased demand, assist front-line healthcare
providers, manage public health concerns by creating social distancing, and address the economic impacts, including sharply
reduced business activity, increased unemployment, and overall uncertainty presented by this new healthcare challenge. Similar
governmental actions have occurred in Canada and Europe.
As a global leader in healthcare supply chain management solutions, retail pharmacy, community oncology and specialty care,
and healthcare information technology, we are uniquely positioned to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic in the United States,
Canada, and Europe. We are working closely with national and local governments, agencies, and industry partners to ensure
supplies, including personal protective equipment, and medicine reach our customers and patients when they need them.
26
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We have taken the necessary steps to ensure that we continue to supply our customers and protect the safety of our employees.
The various responses we put in place to mitigate the impact of COVID-19 on our business operations, including telecommuting
and work-from-home policies, restricted travel requirements, employee support programs, and enhanced safety measures are
intended to limit exposure to COVID-19. These successful steps in our fourth quarter of 2020 have resulted in limited disruption of
our normal business operations, productivity trends, and slightly compressed operating margins due to increased operating
expenses.
The financial impact to the year ended March 31, 2020 is muted due to the timing of the COVID-19 pandemic late in our
fourth quarter. We experienced higher pharmaceutical distribution volumes in March, however, these increases were partially offset
by decreases in specialty drug volumes and decreased demand within primary care medical-surgical supplies. Specialty drug
volumes were negatively impacted by lower demand for infusions, elective specialty drugs, oncology, and dermatology practice
sales. Demand for primary care medical-surgical supplies were negatively impacted by deferrals in elective procedures in hospitals
and surgery centers as well as decreased traffic or closures in doctor’s offices. These positive and negative COVID-19 impacts
drove increased consolidated revenues by less than 1% in 2020.
The increased volumes and revenue due to COVID-19 favorably impacted income from continuing operations before income
taxes, but were mostly offset by increased variable labor costs, enhanced sterilization procedures to sanitize operating facilities,
costs of personal protection equipment for our employees, and increased costs of transport as well as increased other operating
expenses. Additionally, as previously mentioned, decreased specialty drug volumes and demand challenges for primary care
medical-surgical supplies weighed negatively on income from continuing operations before income taxes. We also expanded
temporary employee benefits and incentives targeted for our front-line employees to not only protect their safety, but to provide
further support including additional medical benefits, emergency leave as well as added compensation. The overall impact to
income from continuing operations before income taxes from the favorable and unfavorable items mentioned above largely offset
each other, however, impacts to future periods due to COVID-19 may differ based on future developments, including the duration
and spread of the virus as well as potential seasonality of new outbreaks. Overall operating margins were compressed due to higher
pharmaceutical distribution volumes, shifts in product mix, higher demand by retail national accounts and increased operating
expenses.
Our consolidated balance sheets and ability to maintain financial liquidity remains strong. We have experienced no material
impacts to our liquidity or net working capital. With many of our customers anticipating extended declines in their businesses due
to the COVID-19 pandemic, we are monitoring closely for trends that may impact their timing or ability to pay amounts owed to
us. We remain well-capitalized with access to liquidity from our revolving credit facility. Long-term debt markets and commercial
paper markets, our primary sources of capital after cash flow from operations, have remained open during the COVID-19
pandemic. While there are signs of stress in both markets, we do not have an immediate need to access these markets and could use
our revolving credit facility to meet any near-term liquidity needs. We have seen some improvement in conditions in the debt
markets and commercial paper markets as the Federal Reserve has taken steps to stabilize the markets. We believe we have the
ability to meet the covenants of our credit agreements.
We continue to monitor the COVID-19 pandemic impact on our supply chain. We were able to maintain appropriate labor and
overall vendor supply levels under the circumstances in the fourth quarter, despite challenges including higher sickness rates and
service level issues with suppliers. Supplier shortages and stock-outs for certain products have occurred in specific instances as
demand in excess of supply escalated for certain items tied to the COVID-19 pandemic response, such as personal protective
equipment and other preventive products. Our inventory levels have fluctuated in response to these supply dynamics and increased
concentrated customer orders for certain products, with varying inventory level impacts depending on the specific product within
our portfolio of offerings.
Although the availability of various products is dependent on our suppliers, their location and the extent to which they are
impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, we are proactively working with manufacturers, industry partners, and government agencies
to meet the needs of our customers during the pandemic. We have assembled a Critical Care Drug Task Force, made up of our
procurement specialists, clinical health systems pharmacists, and supply chain professionals, focused on securing additional
product where available, sourcing back-up products, adjusting allocations to ensure equitable distribution and to protect our
operations across all locations and facilities. We have a robust Business Continuity and Disaster Recovery Program (“BCRP”) and
we have proactively enhanced our BCRP in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
27
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
The COVID-19 pandemic impacted our business operations and financial results beginning in the fourth quarter of 2020.
Although the financial impact on our overall 2020 results is limited due to the timing of the outbreak, we face numerous
uncertainties in estimating the direct and indirect effects on our future business operations, financial condition, results of
operations, and liquidity. Additionally, responses from authorities and regulators at all levels of government may materially impact
us in future periods. Due to several rapidly changing variables related to the COVID-19 pandemic, we cannot reasonably estimate
future economic trends and the timing of when stability will return. Refer to Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part I of this Annual Report
on Form 10-K for a disclosure of risk factors related to COVID-19.
Opioid-Related Litigation and Claims
We are a defendant in over 3,000 legal proceedings asserting claims related to distribution of controlled substances (opioids) in
federal and state courts throughout the United States, and in Puerto Rico and Canada. We are vigorously defending ourselves
against such claims and proceedings and are a party to discussions with the objective of achieving broad resolution of the remaining
claims. Because of the large number of parties involved, together with the novelty and complexity of the issues, for which there
may be different considerations among the parties, we cannot predict the successful resolution through a negotiated settlement. An
adverse judgment or negotiated resolution in any of these matters could have a material adverse impact on our financial position,
cash flows or liquidity, or results of operations. Refer to Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for more information.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Overview of Consolidated Results:
(Dollars in millions, except per share data and ratios)Years Ended March 31, Change
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
Revenues $231,051 $214,319 $208,357 8% 3%
Gross Profit 12,023 11,754 11,184 2 5
Gross Profit Margin 5.20% 5.48% 5.37% (28)bp 11bp
Total Operating Expenses $(9,534) $(10,868) $(10,422) (12)% 4%
Total Operating Expenses as a Percentage of Revenues 4.13% 5.07% 5.00% (94)bp 7bp
Other Income, Net $ 12 $ 182 $ 130 (93)% 40%
Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change
Healthcare Joint Venture (1,108) (194) (248) 471 (22)
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — — (122) NM (100)
Interest Expense (249) (264) (283) (6) (7)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 1,144 610 239 88 155
Income Tax (Expense) Benefit (18) (356) 53 (95) (772)
Income from Continuing Operations 1,126 254 292 343 (13)
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax (6) 1 5 (700) (80)
Net Income 1,120 255 297 339 (14)
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (220) (221) (230) - (4)
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 900 $ 34 $ 67 NM (49)%
  
Diluted Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share Attributable
to McKesson Corporation  
Continuing operations $ 4.99 $ 0.17 $ 0.30 NM (43)%
Discontinued operations (0.04) — 0.02 NM (100)
Total $ 4.95 $ 0.17 $ 0.32 NM (47)%
  
Weighted Average Diluted Common Shares 182 197 209 (8)% (6)%
bp - basis points
NM - not meaningful
28
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Revenues
Revenues increased for the years ended March 31, 2020 and 2019 compared to the respective prior years primarily due to
market growth, including expanded business with existing customers within our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment. Market growth includes growing drug utilization, price increases and newly launched products, partially offset by price
deflation associated with brand to generic drug conversion. The increase in revenues for 2019 was also due to our 2019 first quarter
acquisition of Medical Specialties Distributors LLC (“MSD”), partially offset by loss of customers within our U.S. Pharmaceutical
and Specialty Solutions segment. The impact from COVID-19 increased revenues by less than 1% for the year ended March 31,
2020 and was primarily attributable to our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions and European Pharmaceutical Solutions
segments.
Gross Profit
Gross profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year primarily due to market growth in our
Medical-Surgical Solutions segment, partially offset by unfavorable effects of foreign currency exchange fluctuations. Gross profit
and gross profit margin for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year were unfavorably impacted by a decrease in
net cash proceeds received of $22 million in 2020 compared to $202 million in 2019 representing our share of antitrust legal
settlements, partially offset by higher last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) credits in 2020 due to higher generic deflation. The impact from
COVID-19 increased gross profit by less than 1% and decreased gross profit margin by less than 10 basis points for the year ended
March 31, 2020.
Gross profit and gross profit margin increased for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year. Gross profit
increased due to market growth, partially offset by loss of customers. The increase in gross profit and gross profit margin for 2019
was also due to the receipt of net cash proceeds representing our share of antitrust legal settlements of $202 million, higher LIFO
credits and our business acquisitions. These increases in 2019 were partially offset by the incremental government reimbursement
reductions in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”), government imposed generic price cuts in Canada and the 2018 third quarter sale of
our Enterprise Information Solutions (“EIS”) business.
Gross profit for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 included LIFO inventory credits of $252 million, $210
million and $99 million. Refer to the “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates” section included in this Financial Review for
further information.
Total Operating Expenses    
A summary of the components of our total operating expenses for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is as
follows:
 Years Ended March 31, Change
(Dollars in millions, except ratios) 2020  2019 2018 2020 2019
Selling, distribution and administrative expenses $ 9,168 $ 8,403 $ 8,138 9% 3%
Research and development 96 71 125 35 (43)
Goodwill impairment charges 2 1,797 1,738 (100) 3
Restructuring, impairment and related charges 268 597 567 (55) 5
Gain from sale of business — — (109) NM (100)
Gain on healthcare technology net asset exchange, net — — (37) NM (100)
Total Operating Expenses $ 9,534 $10,868 $10,422 (12)% 4%
Percent of Revenues 4.13% 5.07% 5.00% (94)bp 7bp
Total operating expenses and total operating expenses as a percentage of revenues decreased for the year ended March 31,
2020 compared to the prior year and increased for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year.
29
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Total operating expenses for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 were affected by the following significant items:
2020
•Selling, distribution and administrative expenses (“SD&A”) includes charges of $275 million to remeasure assets and
liabilities held for sale to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell related to the expected contribution of
the majority of our German wholesale business to create a joint venture in which McKesson will have a non-controlling
interest within our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Held for Sale,” to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information;
•SD&A includes opioid-related expenses of $232 million, primarily litigation and related expenses, including the second
quarter settlement charge of $82 million recorded in connection with an agreement executed in December 2019 to settle all
opioid-related claims filed by two Ohio counties;
•Restructuring, impairment and related charges includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $112 million, primarily for
our U.K. business (mainly pharmacy licenses) and Rexall Health retail business (“Rexall Health”) in Other (mainly
customer relationships), and the remaining $156 million primarily represents employee severance and exit-related costs
related to our 2019 restructuring initiatives, as further discussed below; and
•Total operating expenses includes higher SD&A due to our business acquisitions and to support business growth, as well
as our technology initiatives, partially offset by favorable effects of foreign currency exchange fluctuations.
2019
•Goodwill impairment charges of $1.8 billion in our Retail Pharmacy (“RP”, formerly “Consumer Solutions”) and
Pharmaceutical Distribution (“PD”, formerly “Pharmacy Solutions”) reporting units within the European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment. Of these impairment charges, $238 million was recognized upon the 2019 first quarter segment
changes, which resulted in two new reporting units. The remaining charges primarily were due to declines in the reporting
units’ estimated future cash flows and the selection of higher discount rates. These impairment charges generally were not
deductible for income tax purposes. The declines in estimated future cash flows primarily were attributed to additional
government reimbursement reductions and competitive pressures within the U.K. The risk of successfully achieving
certain business initiatives was the primary factor in the use of a higher discount rate. At March 31, 2019, both RP and PD
reporting units had no remaining goodwill balances;
•Restructuring, impairment and related charges primarily includes employee severance and exit-related costs of $331
million for our 2019 restructuring initiatives, as further discussed below and long-lived asset impairment charges of $245
million primarily for our U.K. business (mainly pharmacy licenses) driven by additional government reimbursement
reductions and competitive pressures in the U.K.; and
•SD&A includes opioid-related costs of $151 million primarily related to litigation expenses and increased expenses due to
our business acquisitions and to support growth, partially offset by a gain from an escrow settlement of $97 million
representing certain indemnity and other claims related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health and a credit of $90
million for the derecognition of a liability related to the tax receivable agreement (“TRA”) payable to the shareholders of
Change.
2018
•Goodwill impairment charges of $1.3 billion for the European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and $455 million for
Rexall Health. There were no tax benefits associated with these goodwill impairment charges. The impairments for Europe
were triggered primarily by government reimbursement reductions in our retail business in the U.K. and a more
competitive environment in France. The impairments for Rexall Health were primarily driven by significant generics
reimbursement reductions across Canada and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces. At March 31, 2018, Rexall
Health had no remaining goodwill related to our acquisition of Rexall Health;
30
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
•Restructuring, impairment and related charges primarily includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $446 million due
to the declines in estimated future cash flows in our European business including those declines in our U.K. retail business
driven by government reimbursement reductions. In addition, we recorded employee severance and lease exit costs of $74
million for our 2018 restructuring plan in our McKesson Europe business. The plan was substantially completed in 2020;
•SD&A includes a charitable contribution expense of $100 million to a public benefit California foundation (the
“Foundation”);
•SD&A includes increased expenses due to our business acquisitions, partially offset by a gain from sale of business of
$109 million related to the sale of our EIS business within Other.
Goodwill Impairments
The impairment testing performed in 2020 did not indicate any material impairment of goodwill. As of the testing date, other
risks, expenses and future developments, such as additional government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty and material
changes in key market assumptions limit our ability to estimate projected cash flows, which could adversely affect the fair value of
various reporting units in future periods, including our McKesson Canada reporting unit in Other where the risk of a material
goodwill impairment is higher than other reporting units. Refer to “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates” included in this
Financial Review for further information.
On October 1, 2019, we voluntarily changed our annual goodwill impairment testing date from January 1 to October 1 to better
align with the timing of our annual long-term planning process. This change was not material to our consolidated financial
statements as it did not delay, accelerate, or avoid any potential goodwill impairment charge. Refer to Note 14, “Goodwill and
Intangible Assets, Net,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for
further information.
2019 Restructuring Initiatives
On April 25, 2018, we announced a strategic growth initiative intended to drive long-term incremental profit growth and
increase operational efficiency. The initiative consists of multiple growth priorities and plans to optimize our operating models and
cost structures primarily through the centralization, cost management and outsourcing of certain administrative functions. As part of
the growth initiative, we committed to implement certain actions including a reduction in workforce, facility consolidation and
store closures. This set of the initiatives was substantially complete by the end of 2020 and we recorded charges of $15 million and
$135 million in 2020 and 2019 primarily representing employee severance, exit-related costs and asset impairment charges. Any
remaining charges primarily consist of exit-related costs.
As previously announced on November 30, 2018, we relocated our corporate headquarters from San Francisco, California to
Irving, Texas to improve efficiency, collaboration and cost competitiveness, effective April 1, 2019. We anticipate that the
relocation will be complete by January 2021. We expect to incur total charges of approximately $80 million to $130 million, of
which charges of $44 million and $33 million were recorded in 2020 and 2019 primarily representing employee retention expenses,
asset impairments and accelerated depreciation. The estimated remaining charges primarily consist of lease and other exit-related
costs, and employee-related expenses including retention.
During the fourth quarter of 2019, we committed to additional programs to continue our operating model and cost optimization
efforts. We continue to implement centralization of certain functions and outsourcing through the expanded arrangement with a
third-party vendor to achieve operational efficiency. The programs also include reorganization and consolidation of our business
operations and related headcount reductions, closures of retail pharmacy stores in Europe and closures of other facilities. We
anticipate these additional programs will be substantially complete by the end of 2021. We expect to incur total charges of
approximately $300 million to $350 million for these programs, of which charges of $72 million and $163 million were recorded in
2020 and 2019 primarily representing employee severance, accelerated depreciation expense and project consulting fees. The
estimated remaining charges primarily consist of facility and other exit costs and employee-related costs.
Refer to Financial Note 4, “Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges,” to the accompanying consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information.
31
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Other Income, Net
Other income, net, for the year ended March 31, 2020 decreased compared to the prior year primarily due to the 2020 pension
settlement charges of $122 million related to our previously approved termination of the frozen U.S. defined benefit pension plan
and higher gains recognized from the sale of investments in 2019, partially offset by higher settlement gains in 2020 from our
derivative contracts. In connection with the pension plan termination, we purchased annuity contracts from an insurer that will pay
and administer the future pension benefits of the remaining participants.
Other income, net for the year ended March 31, 2019 increased compared to the prior year primarily due to higher gains
recognized from the sales of investments.
Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture
Our investment in Change Healthcare JV is accounted for using the equity method of accounting. Excluding the impairment
and transaction-related items described below, our proportionate share of loss from our investment in Change Healthcare JV for the
years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $119 million, $194 million and $248 million, which primarily includes transaction
and integration expenses incurred by the joint venture and basis differences between the joint venture and McKesson including
amortization of fair value adjustments. 2018 also includes certain transaction expenses, partially offset by a tax benefit of $76
million primarily due to a reduction in the future applicable tax rate related to the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “2017 Tax Act”).
During the first quarter of 2020 and for the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018, we owned approximately 70% of this joint
venture.
On June 27, 2019, common stock and certain other securities of Change began trading on the NASDAQ (“IPO”). On July 1,
2019, upon the completion of its IPO, Change contributed net cash proceeds it received from its offering of common stock to
Change Healthcare JV in exchange for additional membership interests of Change Healthcare JV (“LLC Units”) at the equivalent
of its offering price of $13 per share. The proceeds from the concurrent offering of other securities were also used by Change to
acquire certain securities of Change Healthcare JV. As a result, McKesson’s equity interest in Change Healthcare JV was reduced to
approximately 58.5%, which was used to recognize our proportionate share in net loss from Change Healthcare JV, commencing
the second quarter of 2020. As a result of the ownership dilution to 58.5% from 70%, we recognized a dilution loss of
approximately $246 million in the second quarter of 2020. Additionally, our proportionate share of income or loss from this
investment was subsequently reduced as immaterial settlements of stock option exercises occurred after the IPO and further diluted
our ownership.
In the second quarter of 2020, we recorded an OTTI charge of $1.2 billion to our investment in Change Healthcare JV,
representing the difference between the carrying value of our investment and the fair value derived from the corresponding closing
price of Change’s common stock at September 30, 2019. This charge was included within equity earnings and charges from
investment in Change Healthcare joint venture in our consolidated statements of operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
On March 10, 2020, we completed the previously announced separation of our interest in Change Healthcare JV. The
separation was effected through the split-off of SpinCo, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company that held all of our interest in
Change Healthcare JV, to certain of our stockholders through an exchange offer (“Split-off”), followed by the merger of SpinCo
with and into Change, with Change surviving the merger (“Merger”).
In connection with the exchange offer, on March 9, 2020, we distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of common stock
of SpinCo to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares of McKesson common
stock. Following consummation of the exchange offer, on March 10, 2020, the Merger was consummated, with each share of
SpinCo common stock converted into one share of Change common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being paid in lieu
of fractional shares of Change common stock. The Split-off and Merger are intended to be generally tax-free transactions to
McKesson and its shareholders for U.S. federal income tax purposes. Following the Split-off, we do not beneficially own any of
Change’s outstanding securities. In connection with this transaction, we recognized an estimated gain for financial reporting
purposes of $414 million during the fourth quarter of 2020, which was largely driven by the reversal of a related deferred tax
liability.
32
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
After the separation, Change Healthcare JV is required under the TRA to pay McKesson 85% of the net cash tax savings
realized, or deemed to be realized, resulting from depreciation or amortization allocated to Change by McKesson. The receipt of
any payments under the TRA is dependent upon Change benefiting from this depreciation or amortization in future tax return
filings, which creates uncertainty over the amount, timing and probability of the gain recognized. As such, we account for the TRA
as a gain contingency, with no receivable recognized as of March 31, 2020.
Loss on Debt Extinguishment
In 2018, we recognized a loss on debt extinguishment of $122 million primarily representing premiums related to our February
2018 tender offers to redeem a portion of our existing outstanding long-term debt.
Interest Expense
Interest expense decreased in 2020 compared to the prior year primarily due to a decrease in the issuance of commercial paper,
partially offset by a decrease in interest income from our derivative contracts. Interest expense decreased in 2019 compared to the
prior year primarily due to the refinancing of debt at lower interest rates, partially offset by an increase in the issuance of
commercial paper. Interest expense fluctuates based on timing, amounts and interest rates of term debt repaid and new term debt
issued, as well as amounts incurred associated with financing fees.
Income Tax (Expense) Benefit
We recorded income tax expense of $18 million and $356 million and tax benefit of $53 million related to continuing
operations for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Our reported income tax expense rates were 1.6% and 58.4% in
2020 and 2019, and our income tax benefit rate was 22.2% in 2018.
Our reported income tax expense rate for 2020 was favorably impacted by an estimated gain on the Change Healthcare JV
divestiture of $414 million (pre-tax and after-tax), which was intended to generally be a tax-free split-off for U.S. federal income
tax purposes, and unfavorably impacted by charges of $275 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to remeasure the carrying value of assets
and liabilities held for sale related to the expected formation of a new German wholesale joint venture within our European
Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. Refer to Financial Note 2,“Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” and Note 3,“Held
for Sale,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for more
information.
Our reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was unfavorably impacted by charges of $1.8 billion (pre-tax and after-tax) to
impair the carrying value of goodwill for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, given that these charges are generally
not deductible for tax purposes. The reported income tax benefit rate for 2018 was unfavorably impacted by the goodwill
impairment charges of $1.7 billion (pre-tax and after-tax), given that these charges are generally not deductible for tax purposes.
Refer to Financial Note 14, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included
in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for additional information. As a result of the enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the 2018 income
tax benefit rate included a tax benefit of $1.3 billion from the remeasurement of certain deferred taxes to the lower U.S. federal tax
rate, partially offset by a tax expense of $457 million representing the one-time tax imposed on certain accumulated earnings and
profits of our foreign subsidiaries.
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and evaluating income
tax uncertainties. Although our major taxing jurisdictions include the U.S., Canada and the U.K., we are subject to income taxes in
numerous foreign jurisdictions. Our income tax expense, deferred tax assets and liabilities and uncertain tax liabilities reflect
management’s best assessment of estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We believe that we have made adequate provision
for all income tax uncertainties.
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax
Income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax, was a loss of $6 million for the year ended March 31, 2020 and income
of $1 million and $5 million for the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018.
33
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests primarily represents ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP, Vantage Oncology
Holdings, LLC and the accrual of the annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson
Europe”) share that McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under a domination and
profit and loss transfer agreement (the “Domination Agreement”). Noncontrolling interests with redemption features, such as put
rights, that are not solely within our control are considered redeemable noncontrolling interests. Redeemable noncontrolling
interests are presented outside of Stockholders’ Equity on our consolidated balance sheet. Refer to Financial Note 9, “Redeemable
Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation
Net income attributable to McKesson Corporation was $900 million, $34 million and $67 million for the years ended
March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Diluted earnings per common share attributable to McKesson Corporation was $4.95, $0.17 and
$0.32 for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Additionally, our 2020, 2019 and 2018 diluted earnings per share reflect
the cumulative effects of share repurchases.
Weighted Average Diluted Common Shares
Diluted earnings per common share was calculated based on a weighted average number of shares outstanding of 182 million,
197 million and 209 million for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Weighted average diluted common shares
outstanding is impacted by the exercise and settlement of share-based awards and the cumulative effect of share repurchases,
including the impact of shares exchanged as part of the split-off from our investment in Change Healthcare JV, as discussed above.
34
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Overview of Segment Results:
Revenues:
 Years Ended March 31,  Change
(Dollars in millions) 2020 2019  2018  2020 2019
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $183,341 $167,763 $162,587 9% 3%
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 27,390 27,242 27,320 1 —
Medical-Surgical Solutions 8,305 7,618 6,611 9 15
Other 12,015 11,696 11,839 3 (1)
Total Revenues $231,051 $214,319 $208,357 8% 3%
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2020 increased 9% compared to the prior
year primarily due to market growth, including branded pharmaceutical price increases, higher volumes from retail national account
customers and growth in specialty pharmaceuticals, partially offset by brand to generic drug conversions.
2019 vs. 2018
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2019 increased 3% compared to the prior
year primarily due to market growth, including expanded business with existing customers, growth of specialty pharmaceuticals
and our business acquisitions, partially offset by loss of customers.
European Pharmaceutical Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
European Pharmaceutical Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2020 increased 1% compared to the prior year.
Excluding the unfavorable effect of foreign currency exchange fluctuations, revenues for this segment increased 4% primarily due
to market growth in our pharmaceutical distribution business.
2019 vs. 2018
European Pharmaceutical Solutions revenues remained flat for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year.
Excluding the unfavorable effect of foreign currency exchange fluctuations, revenues for this segment increased 1% primarily due
to market growth, partially offset by the impact of retail pharmacy closures and additional government reimbursement reductions in
the U.K., and the competitive environment in France.
Medical-Surgical Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
Medical-Surgical Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2020 increased 9% compared to the prior year primarily due
to market growth in our primary care business.
2019 vs. 2018
Medical-Surgical Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2019 increased 15% compared to the prior year primarily
due to our 2019 first quarter acquisition of MSD and market growth.
Other
2020 vs. 2019
Revenues in Other for March 31, 2020 increased 3% compared to the prior year primarily due to market growth in our
Canadian and MRxTS businesses.
35
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
2019 vs. 2018
Revenues in Other for the year ended March 31, 2019 decreased 1% compared to the prior year primarily due to unfavorable
effects of foreign currency exchange fluctuations of 2% and the effect of government imposed generic price cuts and retail
pharmacy closures related to our Canadian business. In addition, revenues in Other for 2019 were negatively impacted by the 2018
sale of our EIS business. These decreases are partially offset by growth in our Canadian and MRxTS businesses and the effects of
acquisitions in Canada.
Segment Operating Profit and Corporate Expenses, Net:
 Years Ended March 31, Change
(Dollars in millions, except ratios) 2020  2019 2018 2020 2019
Segment Operating Profit (Loss) (1)  
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 2,767 $ 2,697 $ 2,535 3% 6%
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (2)(261) (1,978) (1,681) (87) 18
Medical-Surgical Solutions 499 455 461 10 (1)
Other (3) (595) 394 (107) (251) 468
Subtotal 2,410 1,568 1,208 54 30
Corporate Expenses, Net (4)(1,017) (694) (564) 47 23
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — — (122) NM (100)
Interest Expense (249) (264) (283) (6) (7)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes$ 1,144 $ 610 $ 239 88% 155%
   
Segment Operating Profit (Loss) Margin   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions 1.51% 1.61% 1.56% (10)bp 5bp
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (0.95) (7.26) (6.15) 631 (111)
Medical-Surgical Solutions 6.01 5.97 6.97 4 (100)
bp - basis points
NM - not meaningful
(1) Segment operating profit (loss) includes gross profit, net of operating expenses, as well as other income (expense), net, for our reportable
segments and Other .
(2) Operating loss of our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment for the year ended March 31, 2020  includ es charges of $275 million  to
remeasure to fair value the assets and liabilities of our German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture as well as long-lived
asset impairment charges of $82 million . This segme nt’s operating  loss for the years ended March 31, 2019  and 2018  includ e goodwill
impairment char ges of $1.8 billion  and $1.3 billion  as well as long-lived asset impairment char ges of $210 million  and $446 million .
(3) Operating loss for Other for the year ended March 31, 2020  includes an impairment charge of $1.2 billion  and a dilution loss of $246 million
related to our investment in Change Healthcare JV, partially offset by an estimated gain of $414 million  related  to the completed separation
of our interest in Change Healthcare JV  during the fourth quarter of 2020.
(4) Corporate expenses, net for the year ended March 31, 2020  includ es a pension settlement charge of $122 million  and a settlem ent charge of
$82 million  related to opioid claims.
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
Operating profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year primarily due to market growth in our
specialty business. Operating profit and operating profit margin were favorably impacted by a charge related to a customer
bankruptcy in 2019 and higher LIFO credits in 2020. Operating profit and operating profit margin were unfavorably impacted by
customer mix and lower net cash proceeds received of $22 million in 2020 compared to $202 million in 2019 representing our
share of antitrust legal settlements.
36
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
2019 vs. 2018
Operating profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year primarily due to market growth,
including growth in our specialty business, partially offset by loss of customers. Operating profit and operating profit margin for
2019 benefited from the net cash proceeds of $202 million representing our share of antitrust legal settlements and higher LIFO
credits of $210 million in 2019 compared to $99 million in 2018, partially offset by a $61 million charge related to a customer
bankruptcy.
European Pharmaceutical Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
Operating loss and operating loss margin improved for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year primarily
due to 2019 goodwill impairment charges of $1.8 billion and decreased long-lived asset impairment charges of $82 million in 2020
compared to $210 million in 2019, partially offset by 2020 charges of $275 million for the fair value remeasurement related to our
German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture.
2019 vs. 2018
Operating loss and operating loss margin were negatively impacted for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior
year primarily due to goodwill impairment charges of $1.8 billion in 2019 compared to $1.3 billion in 2018, the effect of
government reimbursement reductions and lower sales volume in the U.K., and increased competition in France. This was partially
offset by market growth and long-lived asset impairment charges of $210 million in 2019 compared to $446 million in 2018.
Medical-Surgical Solutions
2020 vs. 2019
Operating profit and operating profit margin increased for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to prior year primarily due
to market growth in our primary care business and lower restructuring charges, partially offset by the remeasurement of assets and
liabilities to fair value related to a divestiture that was completed in the fourth quarter of 2020 and higher operating expenses,
including an increase in our provision for bad debts.
2019 vs. 2018
Operating profit decreased for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year primarily due to higher restructuring
charges, partially offset by market growth. Operating profit margin for 2019 decreased primarily due to higher restructuring charges
and changes in our mix of business, partially offset by ongoing cost management.
Other
Operating profit for Other decreased for 2020 and increased in 2019 compared to the respective prior years. Operating profit
for Other for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 were affected by the following significant items:
2020
•OTTI charge of $1.2 billion and the dilution loss of $246 million related to our investment in Change Healthcare JV both
recognized in the second quarter of 2020, partially offset by an estimated gain of $414 million related to the completed
separation of our interest in Change Healthcare JV during the fourth quarter of 2020;
•Long-lived asset impairment charges of $30 million recognized for Rexall Health; and
•Market growth in our MRxTS and Canadian businesses.
2019
•Market growth in our MRxTS business;
•Lower operating profit due to the 2018 sale of our EIS business;
•Gain from an escrow settlement of $97 million related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health;
•Credit of $90 million for the derecognition of a liability related to the TRA payable to the shareholders of Change;
37
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
•Higher restructuring and asset impairment charges related to closures of our retail pharmacy stores in Canada;
•Lower amount of our proportionate share of losses from our equity method investment in Change Healthcare JV during
2019;
•Goodwill and long-lived asset impairment charges of $56 million recognized for Rexall Health;
•Gain of $56 million from the divestiture of an equity investment; and
•Government imposed generic price cuts in Canada.
2018
•Lower operating profit due to the 2017 contribution of the Core MTS Business to the Change Healthcare JV;
•Goodwill charges of $455 million and long-lived asset impairment charges of $33 million recognized for Rexall Health;
•Market growth in our MRxTS business;
•Our proportionate share of losses from our equity method investment in Change Healthcare JV during 2018;
•$109 million gain from the sale of our EIS business in 2018;
•$46 million credit representing a reduction of our TRA liability related to the adoption of the 2017 Tax Act; and
•Gain of $37 million resulting from the finalization of net working capital and other adjustments related to the contribution
of the Core MTS Business to Change Healthcare JV.
Corporate
2020 vs. 2019
Corporate expenses, net, increased for the year ended March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year primarily due to a $122
million pension settlement charge, an $82 million opioid claim settlement charge and higher costs for technology initiatives,
partially offset by higher net settlement gains in 2020 from our derivative contracts. Corporate expenses, net, for 2020 also included
charitable contribution expenses of approximately $20 million primarily for the McKesson Foundation.
2019 vs. 2018
Corporate expenses, net, increased for the year ended March 31, 2019 compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase
in opioid-related costs, higher restructuring-related charges and costs for technology initiatives. Corporate expenses, net, for 2018
included a charitable contribution expense of $100 million for the Foundation.
Foreign Operations
Our foreign operations represented approximately 17% of our consolidated revenues in 2020 and approximately 18% in each
of 2019 and 2018. Foreign operations are subject to certain risks, including currency fluctuations. We monitor our operations and
adopt strategies responsive to changes in the economic and political environment in each of the countries in which we operate. We
conduct our business worldwide in local currencies including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar. As a result, the
comparability of our results reported in U.S. dollars can be affected by changes in foreign currency exchange rates. In discussing
our operating results, we may use the term “foreign currency effect”, which refers to the effect of changes in foreign currency
exchange rates used to convert the local currency results of foreign countries where the functional currency is not the U.S. dollar.
We present this information to provide a framework for assessing how our business performed excluding the effect of foreign
currency rate fluctuations. In computing foreign currency effect, we translate our current year results in local currencies into U.S
dollars by applying average foreign exchange rates of the corresponding prior year periods, and we subsequently compare those
results to the previously reported results of the comparable prior year periods in U.S. dollars. Additional information regarding our
foreign operations is included in Financial Note 24, “Segments of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Business Combinations
Refer to Financial Note 5, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
38
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Fiscal 2021 Outlook
Information regarding the Company’s fiscal 2021 outlook is contained in our Form 8-K dated May 20, 2020. That Form 8-K
should be read in conjunction with the forward-looking statements in Item 7 - Trends and Uncertainties, and the cautionary
statements in Item 1 - Business - Forward-Looking Statements and Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part I of this Annual Report on Form
10-K.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
We consider an accounting estimate to be critical if the estimate requires us to make assumptions about matters that were
uncertain at the time the accounting estimate was made and if different estimates that we reasonably could have used in the current
period, or changes in the accounting estimate that are reasonably likely to occur from period to period, could have a material impact
on our financial condition or results from operations. Below are the estimates that we believe are critical to the understanding of our
operating results and financial condition. Other accounting policies are described in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting
Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Because of the uncertainty
inherent in such estimates, actual results may differ from these estimates.
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts: We provide short-term credit and other customer financing arrangements to customers who
purchase our products and services. Other customer financing primarily relates to guarantees provided to our customers, or their
creditors, regarding the repurchase of inventories. We also provide financing to certain customers related to the purchase of
pharmacies, which serve as collateral for the loans. We estimate the receivables for which we do not expect full collection based on
historical collection rates and specific knowledge regarding the current creditworthiness of our customers and record an allowance
in our consolidated financial statements for these amounts.
In determining the appropriate allowance for doubtful accounts, which includes general and specific reserves, the Company
reviews accounts receivable aging, industry trends, customer financial strength, credit standing, historical write-off trends and
payment history to assess the probability of collection. If the frequency and severity of customer defaults due to our customers’
financial condition or general economic conditions change, our allowance for uncollectible accounts may require adjustment. As a
result, we continuously monitor outstanding receivables and other customer financing and adjust allowances for accounts where
collection may be in doubt.
Sales to the Company’s ten largest customers, including GPOs, accounted for approximately 51% of total consolidated
revenues in 2020 and comprised approximately 37% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2020. Sales to our largest
customer, CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 20% of our total consolidated revenues in 2020 and
comprised approximately 20% of total trade accounts receivable March 31, 2020. As a result, our sales and credit concentration is
significant. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of member hospitals,
pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts receivables balances are
with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. A material default in
payment, a material reduction in purchases from these or any other large customers, or the loss of a large customer or GPO could
have a material adverse impact on our financial position, results of operations and liquidity.
Reserve methodologies are assessed annually based on historical losses and economic, business and market trends. In addition,
reserves are reviewed quarterly and updated if unusual circumstances or trends are present. With many of our customers
anticipating extended declines in their businesses due to COVID-19, we are monitoring closely for trends that may impact their
timing or ability to pay amounts owed to us. We believe the reserves maintained and expenses recorded in 2020 are appropriate and
consistent in the context of historical methodologies employed, as well as assessment of trends currently available.
At March 31, 2020, trade and notes receivables were $17.6 billion prior to allowances of $252 million. In 2020, 2019 and
2018, our provision for bad debts was $91 million, $132 million and $44 million. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the allowance as a
percentage of trade and notes receivables was 1.4% and 1.8%. An increase or decrease of a hypothetical 0.1% in the 2020
allowance as a percentage of trade and notes receivables would result in an increase or decrease in the provision for bad debts of
approximately $18 million. The selected 0.1% hypothetical change does not reflect what could be considered the best or worst-case
scenarios. Additional information concerning our allowance for doubtful accounts may be found in Schedule II included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
39
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. Prior to 2018, we reported inventories at the lower of cost or
market (“LCM”). Effective in the first quarter of 2018, we report inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable value, except for
inventories determined using the last-in, last-out (“LIFO”) method which are valued at the lower of LIFO cost or market. LIFO
method presumes that the most recent inventory purchases are the first items sold and the inventory cost under LIFO approximates
market. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined using the LIFO method. The majority of the cost of
inventories held in foreign and certain domestic locations is based on first-in, first-out (“FIFO”) method and weighted average
purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts and other incentives received from vendors relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory are considered as product discounts and are accounted for as a reduction in the cost of inventory and are recognized when
the inventory is sold.
At March 31, 2020 and 2019, total inventories, net were $16.7 billion on our consolidated balance sheets. The LIFO method
was used to value approximately 60% and 62% of our inventories at March 31, 2020 and 2019. If we had used the moving average
method of inventory valuation, inventories would have been approximately $444 million and $696 million higher than the amounts
reported at March 31, 2020 and 2019. These amounts are equivalent to our LIFO reserves. Our LIFO valuation amount includes
both pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products. We recognized LIFO credits of $252 million, $210 million and $99 million
in 2020, 2019 and 2018 in our consolidated statements of operations. A LIFO charge is recognized when the net effect of price
increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory exceeds the impact of price declines, including the
effect of branded pharmaceutical products that have lost market exclusivity. A LIFO credit is recognized when the net effect of
price declines exceeds the impact of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory.
We believe that moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost of replacing
inventory (i.e., “market”). As such, our LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO or market. As of March 31, 2020 and 2019,
inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
In determining whether an inventory valuation allowance is required, we consider various factors including estimated
quantities of slow-moving inventory by reviewing on-hand quantities, outstanding purchase obligations and forecasted sales. Shifts
in market trends and conditions, changes in customer preferences due to the introduction of generic drugs or new pharmaceutical
products or the loss of one or more significant customers are factors that could affect the value of our inventories. We write down
inventories which are considered excess and obsolete as a result of these reviews. These factors could make our estimates of
inventory valuation differ from actual results.
Business Combinations: The Company accounts for business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting
whereby the identifiable assets and liabilities of the acquired business, as well as any noncontrolling interest in the acquired
business, are recorded at their estimated fair values as of the date that the Company obtains control of the acquired business. Any
purchase consideration in excess of the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related
expenses and related restructuring costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed. For intangible
assets, we typically use a method that is a form or variation of the income approach, whereby a forecast of future cash flows
attributable to the asset are discounted to present value using a risk-adjusted discount rate. Some of the more significant estimates
and assumptions inherent in the income approach include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows, the discount rate
selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows and the assessment of the asset’s expected useful life. Refer to
Financial Note 5, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report
on Form 10-K for additional information regarding our acquisitions.
Goodwill and Long-Lived Assets: As a result of acquiring businesses, we have $9.4 billion of goodwill at March 31, 2020 and
2019, and $3.2 billion and $3.7 billion of intangible assets, net at March 31, 2020 and 2019. On October 1, 2019, we voluntarily
changed our annual goodwill impairment testing date from January 1 to October 1 to better align with the timing of our annual
long-term planning process. This change was not material to our consolidated financial statements as it did not delay, accelerate, or
avoid any potential goodwill impairment charge. Refer to Note 14, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” to the consolidated
financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for further information.
We perform an impairment test on goodwill balances annually or more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist.
Indicators that are considered include significant declines in performance relative to expected operating results, significant changes
in the use of the assets, significant negative industry or economic trends, or a significant decline in the Company’s stock price
and/or market capitalization for a sustained period of time.
40
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating segment or a
component, one level below our operating segments, for which discrete financial information is available and segment management
regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
In 2018, we elected to early adopt, on a prospective basis, the amended guidance that simplifies goodwill impairment testing
by eliminating the second step of the impairment test. The one-step impairment test under the amended guidance requires an entity
to compare the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount and recognize an impairment charge for the amount by which
the carrying amount exceeds the reporting unit’s fair value, if any, up to the amount of goodwill the entity has recorded.
To estimate the fair value of our reporting units, we generally use a combination of the market approach and the income
approach. Under the market approach, we estimate fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses, or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, we use a discounted cash flow
(“DCF”) model in which cash flows anticipated over several periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are
discounted to their present value using an appropriate rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within the reporting unit. In
addition, we compare the aggregate of the reporting units’ fair values to our market capitalization as further corroboration of the
fair values.
Estimates of fair value result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on
estimates and assumptions at a point in time. Judgments made in determining an estimate of fair value may materially impact our
results of operations. The valuations are based on information available as of the impairment testing date and are based on
expectations and assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management. Any material changes in key assumptions,
including failure to meet business plans, negative changes in government reimbursement rates, deterioration in the U.S. and global
financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the
industry or other unanticipated events and circumstances, may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and
could potentially result in an impairment charge. Under the market approach, significant estimates and assumptions also include the
selection of appropriate guideline companies and the determination of appropriate valuation multiples to apply to the reporting unit.
Under the income approach, significant estimates and assumptions also includes the determination of discount rates. The discount
rates represent the weighted average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing, which are
weighted by the percentage of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital structure. Included in the estimate of the
weighted average cost of capital is the assumption of an unsystematic risk premium to address incremental uncertainty related to
the reporting units’ future cash flow projections. An increase in the unsystematic risk premium increases the discount rate.
Based on the 2019 annual goodwill impairment tests, the estimated fair values of our reporting units excluding the Retail
Pharmacy (formerly, Consumer Solutions) and Pharmaceutical Distribution (formerly, Pharmacy Solutions) reporting units in our
European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment exceeded their carrying values. However, other risks, expenses and future
developments, such as additional government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty and material changes in key market
assumptions that we were unable to anticipate as of the testing date may require us to further revise the projected cash flows, which
could adversely affect the fair value of our other reporting units in future periods. The estimated fair value of our McKesson
Canada reporting unit within Other exceeded the carrying value of this reporting unit by 11% in 2020. The goodwill balance of this
reporting unit was $1.4 billion at March 31, 2020 or approximately 15% of the consolidated goodwill balance. Generally, a decline
in estimated future cash flows in excess of 12% or an increase in the discount rate in excess of 1% could result in an indication of
goodwill impairment for this reporting unit in future reporting periods. Refer to Financial Note 14, “Goodwill and Intangible
Assets, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Currently, all of our intangible and other long-lived assets are amortized or depreciated based on the pattern of their economic
consumption or on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 38 years. We review intangible assets
for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets
may not be recoverable. Determination of recoverability of intangible assets is based on the lowest level of identifiable estimated
future undiscounted cash flows resulting from use of the asset and its eventual disposition. Measurement of any impairment loss is
based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its fair value. Assumptions and estimates about future values and
remaining useful lives of our purchased intangible assets are complex and subjective. They can be affected by a variety of factors,
including external factors such as industry and economic trends, and internal factors such as changes in our business strategy and
our internal forecasts.
41
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Our ongoing consideration of all the factors described previously could result in further impairment charges in the future,
which could adversely affect our net income. Refer to Financial Note 4, “Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges” to the
consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Equity Method Investments: We evaluate our investments for other-than-temporary impairments when circumstances indicate
those assets may be impaired. When the decline in value is deemed to be other than temporary, an impairment is recognized to the
extent that the fair value is less than the carrying value of the investment. We consider various factors in determining whether a loss
in value of an investment is other than temporary including: the length of time and the extent to which the fair value has been below
cost; the financial condition of the investees, and our intent and ability to retain the investment for a period of time sufficient to
allow for recovery of value. Management makes certain judgments and estimates in its assessment including but not limited to:
identifying if circumstances indicate a decline in value is other than temporary, expectations about the business operations of
investees, as well as industry, financial and market factors. Any significant changes in assumptions or judgments in assessing
impairments could result in an impairment charge.
Restructuring Charges: We have certain restructuring reserves which require significant estimates related to the timing and
amount of future employee severance and other exit-related costs to be incurred when the restructuring actions take place. We
generally recognize employee severance costs when payments are probable and amounts are estimable. Costs related to contracts
without future benefit or contract termination are recognized at the earlier of the contract termination or the cease-use dates. Other
exit-related costs are recognized as incurred. In connection with these restructuring actions, we also assess the recoverability of
long-lived assets used in the business, and as a result, we may recognize accelerated depreciation reflecting shortened useful lives
of the underlying assets.
Income Taxes: Our income tax expense and deferred tax assets and liabilities reflect management’s best assessment of
estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We are subject to income taxes in the U.S. and numerous foreign jurisdictions.
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and in evaluating income
tax uncertainties and include those used to conclude on the tax-free nature of the separation of the Change Healthcare JV. We
review our tax positions at the end of each quarter and adjust the balances as new information becomes available.
Deferred income taxes arise from temporary differences between the tax and financial statement recognition of revenue and
expense. In evaluating our ability to recover our deferred tax assets, we consider all available positive and negative evidence
including our past operating results, the existence of cumulative net operating losses in the most recent years and our forecast of
future taxable income. In estimating future taxable income, we develop assumptions including the amount of future federal, state
and foreign pre-tax operating income, the reversal of temporary differences and the implementation of feasible and prudent tax
planning strategies. These assumptions require significant judgment about the forecasts of future taxable income and are consistent
with the plans and estimates we use to manage the underlying businesses.
Changes in tax laws and rates could also affect recorded deferred tax assets and liabilities in the future. Should tax laws
change, our tax expense and cash flows could be materially impacted.
In addition, the calculation of our tax liabilities includes estimates for uncertainties in the application of complex new tax
regulations across multiple global jurisdictions where we conduct our operations.
We recognize liabilities for tax and related interest for issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on our estimate of
whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes and related interest will be due. If our current estimate of tax and interest
liabilities is less than the ultimate settlement, an additional charge to income tax expense may result. If our current estimate of tax
and interest liabilities is more than the ultimate settlement, a reduction to income tax expense may be recognized.
42
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Loss Contingencies: We are subject to various claims, including claims with customers and vendors, pending and potential
legal actions for damages, investigations relating to governmental laws and regulations and other matters arising out of the normal
conduct of our business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, we record a liability in the amount of our
best estimate for the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to a particular contingency is often difficult to
predict and determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be practicable based on the information
available and the potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will determine the ultimate resolution of the
contingency. Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many years, during which time relevant
developments and new information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the likelihood of potential loss and
whether it is possible to reasonably estimate a range of possible loss. When a material loss is reasonably possible or probable but a
reasonable estimate cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided. Legal fees are recognized as incurred when the legal
services are provided.
We review all contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess whether a
reasonable estimate of the potential loss or range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a meaningful
estimate of loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on negotiations with or decisions by
third parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system and other interested parties. In conjunction with the preparation of the
accompanying financial statements, we considered matters related to ongoing controlled substances claims to which we are a party.
While we are not able to predict the outcome or reasonably estimate a range of possible losses in these matters, an adverse
judgment or negotiated resolution in any of these matters could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations,
consolidated financial position, cash flows or liquidity. Refer to Financial Note 21, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to
the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
FINANCIAL CONDITION, LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
We expect our available cash generated from operations and our short-term investment portfolio, together with our existing
sources of liquidity from our credit facilities and commercial paper program, will be sufficient to fund our long-term and short-term
capital expenditures, working capital and other cash requirements. As described within “Trends and Uncertainties” above, the
COVID-19 pandemic is developing rapidly. We continue to monitor its impact on demand within parts of our business, as well as
trends potentially impacting the timing or ability for some of our customers to pay amounts owed to us. We remain well-capitalized
with access to liquidity from our revolving credit facility. Additionally, long-term debt markets and commercial paper markets, our
primary sources of capital after cash flow from operations, have remained open during the COVID-19 pandemic. While there are
signs of stress in both markets, we do not have an immediate need to access these markets and could use our revolving credit
facility to meet any near-term liquidity needs. We have seen some improvement in conditions in the debt markets and commercial
paper markets as the Federal Reserve has taken steps to stabilize the markets. We believe we have the ability to meet the covenants
of our credit agreements.
43
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
The following table summarizes the net change in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash for the periods shown:
 Years Ended March 31, Change
(Dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020  2019
Net cash provided by (used in):     
Operating activities $ 4,374$ 4,036$ 4,345$ 338 $ (309)
Investing activities (579) (1,381) (2,993) 802 1,612
Financing activities (2,734) (2,227) (3,084) (507) 857
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and
restricted cash (19) (119) 150 100 (269)
Net change in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 1,042$ 309$(1,582)$ 733 $ 1,891
Operating Activities
Net cash provided from operating activities was $4.4 billion, $4.0 billion and $4.3 billion for the years ended March 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018. Cash flows from operations can be significantly impacted by factors such as the timing of receipts from customers
and payments to vendors. Additionally, working capital is primarily a function of sales and purchase volumes, inventory
requirements and vendor payment terms. Operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2020 were affected by increases in
drafts and accounts payable primarily associated with timing, replenishing inventory stocks and effective working capital
management, and an increase in receivables primarily due to revenue growth. Operating activities for the year ended March 31,
2019 were primarily affected by an increase in receivables due to the overall increase in sales volume and timing of receipts, and
increases in drafts and accounts payable, primarily due to increased inventory purchases and timing of payments. Operating
activities for the year ended March 31, 2018 were primarily affected by a decrease in receivables primarily due to timing of receipts
and loss of customers, and increases in drafts and accounts payable reflecting longer payment terms for certain purchases.
During the year ended March 31, 2020, we made a cash payment of $114 million from the executive benefit retirement plan.
Other non-cash items within operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2020 primarily includes fair value remeasurement
charges of $275 million related to our German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture, a pension settlement charge
of $122 million and stock-based compensation of $119 million.
Investing Activities
Net cash used in investing activities was $579 million, $1.4 billion and $3.0 billion for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018. Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2020 include $362 million and $144 million in capital expenditures for
property, plant and equipment, and capitalized software and $133 million of net cash payments for acquisitions.
Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2019 include $905 million of net cash payments for acquisitions, including
$784 million for our acquisition of MSD, $426 million and $131 million in capital expenditures for property, plant and equipment,
and capitalized software, and $101 million of net cash proceeds from sales of businesses and investments.
Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2018 include $2.9 billion of net cash payments for acquisitions, including
$1.3 billion and $720 million for our acquisitions of CoverMyMeds, LLC and RxCrossroads, $405 million and $175 million in
capital expenditures for property, plant and equipment, and capitalized software, $374 million of net cash proceeds from sales of
businesses and investments and $126 million cash payment received related to the Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange.
Financing Activities
Net cash used in financing activities was $2.7 billion, $2.2 billion and $3.1 billion for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2020 include cash receipts of $21.4 billion and payments of $21.4
billion from short-term borrowings, primarily commercial paper. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2020 also
include $2.0 billion of cash paid for stock repurchases, repayments of long-term debt of $298 million and $294 million of dividends
paid.
44
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2019 include cash receipts of $37.3 billion and payments of $37.3 billion
from short-term borrowings, primarily commercial paper. We received cash from long-term debt issuances of $1.1 billion and made
repayments on long-term debt of $1.1 billion in 2019. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2019 also include $1.6
billion of cash paid for stock repurchases and $292 million of dividends paid.
Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2018 include cash receipts of $20.5 billion and payments of $20.7 billion
from short-term borrowings, primarily commercial paper. We received cash from long-term debt issuances of $1.5 billion and made
repayments on long-term debt of $2.3 billion in 2018. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2018 also include $1.7
billion of cash paid for stock repurchases, $262 million of dividends paid and $112 million of payments for debt extinguishment.
Share Repurchase Plans
The Company’s Board has authorized the repurchase of McKesson’s common stock from time-to-time in open market
transactions, privately negotiated transactions, ASR programs, or by any combination of such methods. The timing of any
repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including our stock price, corporate
and regulatory requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations and other market and economic conditions.
In 2018, we repurchased 3.5 million of our shares through open market transactions and 6.7 million of our shares through ASR
programs. We received an additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019 under the March 2018 ASR program. In 2019,
we repurchased 10.4 million of our shares through open market transactions and 2.1 million of our shares through the December
2018 ASR program.
In 2019, we retired 5.0 million or $542 million of the Company’s treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable
state law, these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with our accounting
policy, we allocate any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained earnings.
Accordingly, our retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during 2019.
In 2020, we repurchased 9.2 million of the Company’s shares for $1.3 billion through open market transactions at an average
price per share of $144.68. We also entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $600 million
of the Company’s common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 4.7 million shares at an
average price per share of $127.68.
On March 9, 2020, we completed the Split-off of our interest in the Change Healthcare JV. In connection with the Split-off, we
distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of SpinCo common stock, which held all of the Company’s interests in the Change
Healthcare JV, to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares of McKesson stock,
which are now held as treasury stock on our consolidated balance sheet. Following consummation of the exchange offer, on March
10, 2020, SpinCo merged with and into Change with each share of SpinCo common stock converted into one share of Change
common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being paid in lieu of fractional shares of Change common stock. See Note 2,
“Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual
Report on Form 10-K for more information.
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data) 2020 2019  2018
Number of shares repurchased (1)13.9 13.5 10.5
Average price paid per share $ 138.94 $ 130.72 $ 151.06
Total value of shares repurchased (1)$ 1,934 $ 1,627 $ 1,650
(1) Excludes shares surrendered for tax withholding and shares related to the Company’ s Split-of f of the Change Healthcare JV  described above.
The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $1.5 billion at March 31, 2020.
45
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We believe that our operating cash flow, financial assets and current access to capital and credit markets, including our existing
credit facilities, will give us the ability to meet our financing needs for the foreseeable future. However, there can be no assurance
that continued or increased volatility and disruption in the global capital and credit markets will not impair our liquidity or increase
our costs of borrowing. As described within “Trends and Uncertainties” above, the COVID-19 pandemic is developing rapidly. We
continue to monitor its impact on demand within parts of our business, as well as trends potentially impacting the timing or ability
for some of our customers to pay amounts owed to us.
Selected Measures of Liquidity and Capital Resources:
 March 31,
(Dollars in millions, except ratios) 2020  2019 2018
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 4,023  $ 2,981 $ 2,672
Working capital (402) 839 451
Debt to capital ratio (1)52.1% 43.3% 40.6%
Return on McKesson stockholders’ equity (2)13.3% 0.4% 0.6%
(1) Ratio is computed as total debt divided by the sum of total debt and McKesson stockholders’  equity , which excludes noncontrolling and
redeemable noncontrolling interests and accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
(2) Ratio is computed as net income attributable to McKesson Corporation for the last four quarters, divided by a five-quarter average of
McKesson stockholders’  equity , which excludes noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
Cash equivalents, which are readily convertible to known amounts of cash, are carried at fair value. Cash equivalents are
primarily invested in AAA-rated U.S. government money market funds and overnight deposits with financial institutions. Deposits
with financial institutions are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign subsidiaries,
including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollars. We mitigate the risk of our short-term investment portfolio by
depositing funds with reputable financial institutions and monitoring risk profiles and investment strategies of money market funds.
Our cash and cash equivalents balance as of March 31, 2020 and 2019 included approximately $1.7 billion and $1.5 billion of
cash held by our subsidiaries outside of the United States. Our primary intent is to utilize this cash for foreign operations for an
indefinite period of time. Although the vast majority of cash held outside the United States is available for repatriation, doing so
could subject us to foreign withholding taxes and state income taxes. Following enactment of the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, the
repatriation of cash to the United States is generally no longer taxable for federal income tax purposes.
Working capital primarily includes cash and cash equivalents, receivables and inventories net of drafts and accounts payable,
short-term borrowings, current portion of long-term debt and other current liabilities. We require a substantial investment in
working capital that is susceptible to large variations during the year as a result of inventory purchase patterns and seasonal
demands. Inventory purchase activity is a function of sales activity and other requirements. The COVID-19 pandemic has potential
to increase the variations in our working capital, which we will continue to monitor closely.
Consolidated working capital decreased at March 31, 2020 compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in drafts
and accounts payable and an increase in the current portion of long-term debt for term notes due in 2021, partially offset by an
increase in receivables and cash and cash equivalents. Consolidated working capital increased at March 31, 2019 compared to the
prior year primarily due to an increase in the cash and cash equivalents, receivables, inventories and a decrease in current portion of
long-term debt, partially offset by an increase in drafts and accounts payable.
Our debt to capital ratio increased for 2020 primarily due to decrease in stockholders’ equity driven by the Split-off of our
interest in Change Healthcare JV and share repurchases. Our debt to capital ratio increased for 2019 primarily due to a decrease in
stockholder’s equity driven by share repurchases.
In July 2019, we raised our quarterly dividend from $0.39 to $0.41 per common share for dividends declared on or after such
date by the Board. Dividends were $1.62 per share in 2020, $1.51 per share in 2019 and $1.30 per share in 2018. We anticipate that
we will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future dividends remain within
the discretion of the Board and will depend upon our future earnings, financial condition, capital requirements and other factors. In
2020, 2019 and 2018, we paid total cash dividends of $294 million, $292 million and $262 million. Additionally, as required under
the Domination Agreement, we are obligated to pay an annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per McKesson Europe
share (effective January 1, 2015) to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe.
46
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Contractual Obligations:
The table and information below presents our significant financial obligations and commitments at March 31, 2020:
  Years
(In millions) Total Within 1 Over 1 to 3 Over 3 to 5 After 5
On balance sheet   
Long-term debt (1)$ 7,387 $ 1,052 $ 1,517 $ 1,128 $ 3,690
Operating lease obligations (2)2,274 398 681 465 730
Other (3)284 39 64 50 131
   
Off balance sheet   
Interest on borrowings (4)1,824 228 384 298 914
Purchase obligations (5)6,964 6,889 48 27 —
Other (6)403 222 30 42 109
Total $ 19,136 $ 8,828 $ 2,724 $ 2,010 $ 5,574
(1) Represents maturities of the Company’ s long-term obligations including an immaterial amount of finance lease obligations.
(2) Represents undiscounted minimum operating lease obligations under non-cancelable operating leases having an initial remaining term over
one year and is not adjuste d for imputed interest. Refer to Financial Note 13, “Leases ” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information.
(3) Includes our estimated benefit payments for the unfunded benefit plans and minimum funding requirements for the pension plans.
(4) Primarily represents interest that will become due on our fixed rate long-term debt obligations.
(5) A purchase obligation is defined as an arrangement to purchase goods or services that is enforceable and legally binding on the Company .
These obligations primarily relate to inventory purchases and capital commitments.
(6) Includes agreements under which we have guaranteed  the repurchase of our customers’  inventory and our customers’  debt in the event these
customers are unable to meet their obligations to those financial institutions.
The contractual obligations table above excludes the following obligations:
At March 31, 2020, the liability recorded for uncertain tax positions, excluding associated interest and penalties, was
approximately $784 million. The ultimate amount and timing of any related future cash settlements cannot be predicted with
reasonable certainty.
Our banks and insurance companies have issued $170 million of standby letters of credit and surety bonds at March 31, 2020.
These were issued on our behalf and are mostly related to our customer contracts and to meet the security requirements for
statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations and our workers’ compensation and automotive liability programs.
The carrying value of redeemable noncontrolling interests related to McKesson Europe was $1.4 billion at March 31, 2020,
which exceeded the maximum redemption value of $1.2 billion. The balance of redeemable noncontrolling interests is reported at
the greater of its carrying value or its maximum redemption value at each reporting date. Upon the effectiveness of the Domination
Agreement on December 2, 2014, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe received a put right that enables them to
put their McKesson Europe shares to McKesson at €22.99 per share, which price is increased annually for interest in the amount of
5 percentage points above a base rate published semiannually by the German Bundesbank, less any compensation amount or
guaranteed dividend already paid (“Put Amount”). The redemption value is the Put Amount adjusted for exchange rate fluctuations
each period. The ultimate amount and timing of any future cash payments related to the Put Amount are uncertain. Additionally, we
are obligated to pay an annual recurring compensation of €0.83 per McKesson Europe share (the “Compensation Amount”) to the
noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under the Domination Agreement. The Compensation Amount is recognized
ratably during the applicable annual period. The Domination Agreement does not expire, but it may be terminated at the end of any
fiscal year by giving at least six month’s advance notice.
Refer to Financial Note 9, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” to the consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
47
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Credit Resources:
We fund our working capital requirements primarily with cash and cash equivalents as well as short-term borrowings from our
credit facilities and commercial paper issuances. Funds necessary for future debt maturities and our other cash requirements are
expected to be met by existing cash balances, cash flow from operations, existing credit sources and other capital market
transactions. Detailed information regarding our debt and financing activities is included in Financial Note 15, “Debt and Financing
Activities,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
RELATED PARTY BALANCES AND TRANSACTIONS
Information regarding our related party balances and transactions is included in Financial Note 2, “Investment in Change
Healthcare Joint Venture,” and Financial Note 23, “Related Party Balances and Transactions,” to the consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
New accounting pronouncements that we have recently adopted, as well as those that have been recently issued but not yet
adopted by us, are included in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements
appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
48
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Concluded)
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
Interest rate risk: Our long-term debt bears interest predominately at fixed rates, whereas our short-term borrowings are at
variable interest rates.
Our cash and cash equivalents balances earn interest at variable rates. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, we had $4.0 billion and
$3.0 billion and in cash and cash equivalents. The effect of a hypothetical 50 bp increase in the underlying interest rate on our cash
and cash equivalents, net of short-term borrowings and variable rate debt, would have resulted in a favorable impact to earnings in
2020 and 2019 of approximately $6.0 million and $4.0 million.
Foreign exchange risk: We conduct our business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign
subsidiaries, including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a
material adverse impact on our financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. We are also exposed to foreign exchange rate risk
related to our foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies.
We have certain foreign exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps.
The forward contracts and cross-currency swaps are designated to reduce the income statement effects from fluctuations in foreign
exchange rates and have been designated as cash flow hedges. These programs reduce but do not entirely eliminate foreign
exchange risk.
As of March 31, 2020 and 2019, the effect of a hypothetical adverse 10% change in the underlying foreign currency exchange
rates would have impacted the fair value of our foreign exchange contracts by approximately $435 million and $581 million.
However, our risk management programs are designed such that the potential loss in value of these risk management portfolios
described above would be largely offset by changes in the value of the underlying exposure. Refer to Financial Note 18, “Hedging
Activities,” for more information on our foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps.
The selected hypothetical change in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates does not reflect what could be
considered the best or worst case scenarios.
49
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL INFORMATION
Page
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 51
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
Consolidated Financial Statements:  
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 57
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 58
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2020 and 2019 59
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 60
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 61
Financial Notes 62
50
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
MANAGEMENT’S ANNUAL REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
The management of McKesson Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal
control over financial reporting, as such term is defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). With the participation of
the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, our management conducted an assessment of the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting based on the framework and criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated
Framework (2013), issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment,
our management has concluded that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of March 31, 2020.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, audited the financial statements included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K and has also audited the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
March 31, 2020. This audit report appears on page 52 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
May 22, 2020
 
/s/ Brian S. Tyler
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
 
/s/ Britt J. Vitalone
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
51
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of McKesson Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of McKesson Corporation and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
March 31, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ equity, and cash
flows, for each of the three years in the period ended March 31, 2020, and the related notes and the schedule listed in the Index at
Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting as of March 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the
Company as of March 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended March 31, 2020, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also, in
our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of March 31,
2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 13 to the financial statements, effective April 1, 2019, the Company adopted the Financial Accounting
Standards Board’s (“FASB”) new standard related to leases using the modified retrospective basis.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these
financial statements and an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (“PCAOB”) and are required to
be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
52
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we
are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the
accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Contingent Liabilities - Litigation and Claims involving Distribution of Controlled Substances - Refer to Note 21 to the
financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company and its affiliates are defendants in many cases asserting claims related to distribution of controlled substances,
including opioids. The Company is named as a defendant along with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors, pharmaceutical
manufacturers and retail pharmacy chains. The plaintiffs in these actions include state attorneys general, county and municipal
governments, hospitals, Indian tribes, pension funds, third-party payors and individuals. When a loss is considered probable and
reasonably estimable, the Company records a liability in the amount of its estimate for the ultimate loss. The Company reviews all
loss contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess whether a reasonable
estimate of the loss or range of loss can be made. The Company also performs an assessment of loss contingencies where a loss is
reasonably possible. If it is reasonably possible that a loss may have been incurred and the effect on the financial statements could
be material, the Company discloses the nature of the loss contingency and an estimate of the possible loss or range of loss or a
statement that such an estimate cannot be made within the notes to the financial statements. As of March 31, 2020, the Company
has determined that a liability associated with these claims, whether through settlement or litigation, is not probable and a loss or
range of loss is not reasonably estimable.
We identified litigation and claims involving the distribution of controlled substances as a critical audit matter because of the
challenges auditing management’s judgments applied in determining the likelihood of loss related to the resolution of such claims.
Specifically, auditing management’s determination of whether any contingent loss arising from the related litigation and claims is
probable, reasonably possible, or remote, and the related disclosures, is subjective and requires significant judgment due to the
large number of parties involved, together with the novelty and complexity of the issues.
53
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to litigation and claims involving distribution of controlled substances included the following, among
others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls related to management’s review of litigation and claims involving the
distribution of controlled substances, and approval of the accounting treatment and related disclosures based on the most recent
facts and circumstances.
•We inquired of the Company’s internal and external legal counsel to understand the basis for the Company’s conclusion that
any potential loss from the litigation and claims involving the distribution of controlled substances, including through broad
resolution via settlement, is neither probable nor reasonably estimable as of March 31, 2020. In addition, we requested and
received a written response from internal and external legal counsel as it relates to litigation and claims involving the
distribution of controlled substances.
•We evaluated management’s analysis of litigation and claims involving the distribution of controlled substances, read Board of
Directors meeting minutes, including relevant sub-committee meeting minutes, and compared to responses from internal and
external counsel. As part of our procedures, we also performed public domain searches for evidence contrary to management’s
analysis.
•We compared the Company's assessment of this matter to relevant history of similar legal contingencies that have been settled
or otherwise resolved to evaluate the consistency of the Company's assessment of litigation and claims involving the
distribution of controlled substances at March 31, 2020.
•We consulted with our auditing and accounting experts to assist in our evaluation of the case facts and the Company’s related
accounting treatment for the litigation and claims involving the distribution of controlled substances.
•We evaluated any events subsequent to March 31, 2020 that might impact our evaluation of litigation and claims involving the
distribution of controlled substances, including any related accrual or disclosure.
•We obtained written representations from executives and internal counsel of the Company.
•We read the Company’s related disclosures and evaluated them for consistency with our testing.
Goodwill - Refer to Note 14 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company’s evaluation of goodwill for impairment involves comparing the carrying amount of each reporting unit to its fair
value on the first day of the third fiscal quarter or whenever the Company believes a potential indicator of impairment requiring a
more frequent assessment has occurred. The Company uses a combination of the income and market approaches to estimate
reporting unit fair value. Under the market approach, fair value is estimated by comparing the business to similar businesses, or
guideline companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, the Company uses a
discounted cash flow (“DCF”) model where cash flows anticipated over future periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time
horizon, are discounted to their present value using an appropriate rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within the
reporting unit. The rate used to discount to present value includes an unsystematic risk premium, which is intended to address
uncertainty related to the reporting unit’s future cash flow projections. The goodwill balance was $9.4 billion as of March 31, 2020,
of which $1.4 billion was allocated to the McKesson Canada reporting unit. The fair value of all reporting units exceeded their
respective carrying amounts as of the measurement date and, therefore, no impairment was recognized.
We identified the estimation of the fair value of the McKesson Canada reporting unit used to evaluate the recoverability of goodwill
as a critical audit matter because of the challenges auditing significant judgments used in the selection of a discount rate, including
the unsystematic risk premium. In particular, the fair value estimate is sensitive to the unsystematic risk premium assumption,
which is affected by expected risk of changes in the Canadian business and regulatory environments. Auditing management’s
selected discount rate required a high degree of auditor judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve
more senior members of the team and our fair value specialists.
54
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the Company’s selection of a discount rate, including consideration of the unsystematic risk
premium, for the McKesson Canada reporting unit included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls related to management’s goodwill impairment evaluation, including those
related to the selection of a discount rate and consideration of an unsystematic risk premium.
•We evaluated management’s ability to accurately forecast operating results for the McKesson Canada reporting unit by
comparing actual results to management’s historical forecasts, in order to consider the reasonableness and adequacy of
management’s selected unsystematic risk premium.
•As part of our assessment of the unsystematic risk premium, we evaluated the reasonableness of strategic plans expected to be
implemented during the forecast period by comparing the forecasts to:
◦Actual results of historical strategic plans
◦Internal communications to management and the Board of Directors
•With the assistance of our fair value specialists, we evaluated the reasonableness of the discount rate, including the
unsystematic risk premium, by developing a range of independent estimates, testing the mathematical accuracy of the
calculation and comparing to the discount rate selected by management.
Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture - Tax-free Separation of Change Healthcare JV - Refer to Note 2 to the
financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed the previously announced separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare Joint
Venture (“Joint Venture”). The separation was effected through the split-off of a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company
(“SpinCo”) that held all of the Company’s interest in the Joint Venture, to certain of the Company’s stockholders through an
exchange offer (“Split-off”), followed by the merger of SpinCo with and into Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”), with Change
surviving the merger (“Merger”).
In connection with the Split-off, on March 9, 2020, the Company distributed all outstanding shares of common stock of SpinCo to
participating stockholders in exchange for shares of the Company common stock. Following consummation of the Split-off, on
March 10, 2020 the Merger was consummated. The Split-off and Merger are intended to be generally tax-free transactions for U.S.
Federal income tax purposes. Following the Split-off, the Company does not beneficially own any of Change’s outstanding
securities.
We identified the classification of the Split-off and Merger as a tax-free transaction for US Federal income tax purposes to be a
critical audit matter because of the complexity of the interpretation and application of the Internal Revenue Code (“Code”), the
materiality of the potential tax consequences, and the need to involve our income tax specialists when performing audit procedures
to evaluate the U.S. Federal taxability of the Split-Off and Merger.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the evaluation of the U.S Federal taxability of the Split-Off and Merger included the following,
among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s evaluation of the Split-Off and Merger as tax free for U.S. Federal
income tax.
•We inspected the opinion from the Company’s outside legal counsel and external tax advisor that management utilized in
forming their conclusions on U.S. Federal taxability of the Split-off and Merger, including certain interpretations of the Code
and related statutes.
•We inspected meeting minutes of the Board of Directors and its committees, income tax filings, support from external advisors,
historical financial results of the Company and the Joint Venture, and contracts associated with the Split-off and Merger for
corroborating or contradictory evidence.
55
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
•We obtained written representations from management concerning management’s intent associated with future transactions that
could affect U.S. Federal taxability and we obtained representations made by Change management that it does not intend to
cause any transactions that could affect the Company’s U.S. Federal taxability.
•We assessed the key facts in the opinion from the Company’s outside legal counsel and tax advisor detailing the requirements
under the Code and specifying how such requirements were met.
•With the assistance of our income tax specialists, we evaluated management’s conclusion that the requirements were met to
qualify the Split-Off and Merger as tax free for U.S. Federal income tax purposes.
 
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Dallas, Texas
May 22nd, 2020
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1968.
56
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended March 31,
 2020 2019  2018
Revenues $ 231,051 $ 214,319 $ 208,357
Cost of Sales (219,028) (202,565) (197,173)
Gross Profit 12,023 11,754 11,184
Operating Expenses   
Selling, distribution and administrative expenses (9,168) (8,403) (8,138)
Research and development (96) (71) (125)
Goodwill impairment charges (2) (1,797) (1,738)
Restructuring, impairment and related charges (268) (597) (567)
Gain from sale of business — — 109
Gain on healthcare technology net asset exchange, net — — 37
Total Operating Expenses (9,534) (10,868) (10,422)
Operating Income 2,489 886 762
Other Income, Net 12 182 130
Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint
Venture (1,108) (194) (248)
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — — (122)
Interest Expense (249) (264) (283)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 1,144 610 239
Income Tax (Expense) Benefit (18) (356) 53
Income from Continuing Operations 1,126 254 292
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax (6) 1 5
Net Income 1,120 255 297
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (220) (221) (230)
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 900 $ 34 $ 67
   
Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share Attributable to
McKesson Corporation   
Diluted   
Continuing operations $ 4.99 $ 0.17 $ 0.30
Discontinued operations (0.04) — 0.02
Total $ 4.95 $ 0.17 $ 0.32
Basic   
Continuing operations $ 5.01 $ 0.17 $ 0.30
Discontinued operations (0.03) — 0.02
Total $ 4.98 $ 0.17 $ 0.32
   
Weighted Average Common Shares   
Diluted 182 197 209
Basic 181 196 208
See Financial Notes
57
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In millions)
 
 Years Ended March 31,
 2020  2019 2018
Net Income $ 1,120 $ 255$ 297
    
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), Net of Tax    
Foreign currency translation adjustments (66) (190) 624
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges 86 24 (30)
Changes in retirement-related benefit plans 129 (32) 15
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), Net of Tax 149 (198) 609
    
Comprehensive Income 1,269 57 906
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (223) (155) (415)
Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 1,046 $ (98)$ 491
See Financial Notes
58
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
March 31,
2020 2019
ASSETS
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 4,015 $ 2,981
Receivables, net 19,950 18,246
Inventories, net 16,734 16,709
Assets held for sale 906 —
Prepaid expenses and other 617 529
Total Current Assets 42,222 38,465
Property, Plant and Equipment, Net 2,365 2,548
Operating Lease Right-of-Use Assets 1,886 —
Goodwill 9,360 9,358
Intangible Assets, Net 3,156 3,689
Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture — 3,513
Other Noncurrent Assets 2,258 2,099
Total Assets $ 61,247 $ 59,672
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Drafts and accounts payable $ 37,195 $ 33,853
Current portion of long-term debt 1,052 330
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 354 —
Liabilities held for sale 683 —
Other accrued liabilities 3,340 3,443
Total Current Liabilities 42,624 37,626
Long-Term Debt 6,335 7,265
Long-Term Deferred Tax Liabilities 2,255 2,998
Long-Term Operating Lease Liabilities 1,660 —
Other Noncurrent Liabilities 1,662 2,103
Commitments and Contingent Liabilities (Note 21)
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests 1,402 1,393
McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value, 100 shares authorized, no shares issued or outstanding — —
Common stock, $0.01 par value, 800 shares authorized at March 31, 2020 and 2019, 272
and 271 shares issued at March 31, 2020 and 2019 2 3
Additional Paid-in Capital 6,663 6,435
Retained Earnings 13,022 12,409
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss (1,703) (1,849)
Other — (2)
Treasury Stock, at Cost, 110 and 81 shares at March 31, 2020 and 2019 (12,892) (8,902)
Total McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity 5,092 8,094
Noncontrolling Interests 217 193
Total Equity 5,309 8,287
Total Liabilities, Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Equity $ 61,247 $ 59,672
See Financial Notes
59
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Years Ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity
 Common
Stock  Additional
Paid-in
CapitalOther
Capital Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Treasury
Noncontrolling
InterestsTotal
Equity  Shares Amount Common
Shares Amount
Balances, March 31, 2017 273 $ 3 $ 6,028 $ (2) $13,189 $ (2,141) (62)$(5,982)$ 178 $11,273
Issuance of shares under employee plans 2 — 126 — — — — (59) — 67
Share-based compensation — — 67 — — — — — — 67
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (98) (98)
Other comprehensive income — — — — — 424 — — — 424
Net income — — — — 67 — — — 187 254
Repurchase of common stock — — (36) — — — (11) (1,614) — (1,650)
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe — — 3 — — — — — — 3
Cash dividends declared, $1.30 per
common share — — — — (270) — — — — (270)
Other — — — 1 — — — — (14) (13)
Balances, March 31, 2018 275 3 6,188 (1) 12,986 (1,717) (73) (7,655) 253 10,057
Opening Retained Earnings Adjustments:
Adoption of New Accounting Standards — — — — 154 — — — — 154
Balances, April 1, 2018 275 3 6,188 (1) 13,140 (1,717) (73) (7,655) 253 10,211
Issuance of shares under employee plans 1 — 75 — — — — (12) — 63
Share-based compensation — — 92 — — — — — — 92
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (184) (184)
Other comprehensive loss — — — — — (132) — — — (132)
Net income — — — — 34 — — — 176 210
Repurchase of common stock — — 150 — — — (13) (1,777) — (1,627)
Retirement of common stock (5) — (70) — (472) — 5 542 — —
Cash dividends declared, $1.51 per
common share — — — — (298) — — — — (298)
Other — — — (1) 5 — — — (52) (48)
Balances, March 31, 2019 271 3 6,435 (2) 12,409 (1,849) (81) (8,902) 193 8,287
Opening Retained Earnings Adjustments:
Adoption of New Accounting Standards — — — — 11 — — — — 11
Balances, April 1, 2019 271 3 6,435 (2) 12,420 (1,849) (81) (8,902) 193 8,298
Issuance of shares under employee plans 1 — 113 — — — — (20) — 93
Share-based compensation — — 115 — — — — — — 115
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (154) (154)
Other comprehensive income — — — — — 146 — — — 146
Net income — — — — 900 — — — 178 1,078
Repurchase of common stock — — — — — — (14) (1,934) — (1,934)
Change Healthcare share exchange — — — — — — (15) (2,036) — (2,036)
Cash dividends declared, $1.62 per
common share — — — — (294) — — — — (294)
Other — (1) — 2 (4) — — — — (3)
Balances, March 31, 2020 272 $ 2 $ 6,663 $ — $13,022 $ (1,703) (110)$(12,892)$ 217 $5,309
See Financial Notes
60
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
 Years Ended March 31,
 2020 2019 2018
Operating Activities
Net income $ 1,120 $ 255 $ 297
Adjustments to reconcile to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation 321 317 303
Amortization 601 632 648
Gain on Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, net — — (37)
Goodwill and other asset impairment charges 139 2,079 2,217
Equity earnings and charges from investment in Change Healthcare Joint
Venture 1,084 194 248
Deferred taxes (342) 189 (868)
Credits associated with last-in, first-out inventory method (252) (210) (99)
Non-cash operating lease expense 366 — —
Loss (gain) from sales of businesses and investments 33 (86) (169)
Other non-cash items 615 52 67
Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:
Receivables (2,494) (967) 1,175
Inventories (376) (368) (458)
Drafts and accounts payable 3,952 1,976 271
Operating lease liabilities (377) — —
Taxes (8) (95) 671
Other (8) 68 79
Net cash provided by operating activities 4,374 4,036 4,345
 
Investing Activities
Payments for property, plant and equipment (362) (426) (405)
Capitalized software expenditures (144) (131) (175)
Acquisitions, net of cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash acquired (133) (905) (2,893)
Proceeds from sale of businesses and investments, net 37 101 374
Payments received on Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, net — — 126
Other 23 (20) (20)
Net cash used in investing activities (579) (1,381) (2,993)
 
Financing Activities
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 21,437 37,265 20,542
Repayments of short-term borrowings (21,437) (37,268) (20,725)
Proceeds from issuances of long-term debt — 1,099 1,522
Repayments of long-term debt (298) (1,112) (2,287)
Payments for debt extinguishments — — (112)
Common stock transactions:
Issuances 113 75 132
Share repurchases, including shares surrendered for tax withholding (1,954) (1,639) (1,709)
Dividends paid (294) (292) (262)
Other (301) (355) (185)
Net cash used in financing activities (2,734) (2,227) (3,084)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (19) (119) 150
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 1,042 309 (1,582)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 2,981 2,672 4,254
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 4,023 $ 2,981 $ 2,672
 
Supplemental Cash Flow Information
Cash paid for:
Interest, net $ 235 $ 383 $ 298
Income taxes, net of refunds $ 368 $ 262 $ 144
See Financial Notes
61
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES
1.Significant Accounting Policies
Nature of Operations: McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” or the “Company,”) is a global leader in healthcare supply chain
management solutions, retail pharmacy, community oncology and specialty care, and healthcare information technology. McKesson
partners with life sciences companies, manufacturers, providers, pharmacies, governments and other healthcare organizations to
help provide the right medicines, medical products and healthcare services to the right patients at the right time, safely and cost-
effectively. The Company reports its financial results in three reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions,
European Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that
are not significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are included in Other. Refer to Financial Note 24,
“Segments of Business,” for more information.
Basis of Presentation: The consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes are prepared in accordance with U.S.
generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). The consolidated financial statements of McKesson include the financial
statements of all wholly-owned subsidiaries and majority-owned or controlled companies. For those consolidated subsidiaries
where the Company’s ownership is less than 100%, the portion of the net income or loss allocable to the noncontrolling interests is
reported as “Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests” in the consolidated statements of operations. All significant
intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation, including the intercompany portion of transactions
with equity method investees.
The Company considers itself to control an entity if it is the majority owner of or has voting control over such entity. The
Company also assesses control through means other than voting rights (“variable interest entities” or “VIEs”) and determines which
business entity is the primary beneficiary of the VIE. The Company consolidates VIEs when it is determined that it is the primary
beneficiary of the VIE. Investments in business entities in which the Company does not have control but has the ability to exercise
significant influence over operating and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method. Refer to Financial Note 2,
“Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture,” for further information on the Company’s investment in Change Healthcare LLC
(“Change Healthcare JV”).
Fiscal Period: The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a
particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year.
Reclassifications: Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates: The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires that the Company make
estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts in the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes.
Actual amounts could differ from those estimated amounts. The severity, magnitude and duration, as well as the economic
consequences of the COVID-19 pandemic, are uncertain, rapidly changing and difficult to predict. Therefore, our accounting
estimates and assumptions may change over time in response to COVID-19 and may change materially in future periods.
Cash and Cash Equivalents: All highly liquid debt and money market instruments purchased with an original maturity of three
months or less at the date of acquisition are included in cash and cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at fair value. Cash
equivalents are primarily invested in AAA-rated U.S. government money market funds and overnight deposits with financial
institutions. Deposits with financial institutions are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our
foreign subsidiaries, including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Deposits may exceed the amounts insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the U.S. and similar deposit insurance programs in other jurisdictions. The Company
mitigates the risk of its short-term investment portfolio by depositing funds with reputable financial institutions and monitoring risk
profiles and investment strategies of money market funds.
Restricted Cash: Cash that is subject to legal restrictions or is unavailable for general operating purposes is classified as
restricted cash and is included in “Prepaid expenses and other” and “Other Noncurrent Assets” in the consolidated balance sheets.
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash in the Company’s consolidated statements of cash flows at March 31, 2020, includes
restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents of $8 million for 2020 and nil for 2019 and 2018.
62
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Marketable Securities Available-for-Sale: The Company’s marketable securities, which are available-for-sale, are carried at fair
value and are included in “Prepaid expenses and other” in the consolidated balance sheets. The unrealized gains and losses, net of
the related tax effect, computed in marking these securities to market have been reported in stockholders’ equity. At March 31, 2020
and 2019, marketable securities were not material. In determining whether an other-than-temporary decline in market value has
occurred, the Company considers the duration that, and extent to which, the fair value of the investment is below its cost, the
financial condition and future prospects of the issuer or underlying collateral of a security, and its intent and ability to retain the
security in order to allow for an anticipated recovery in fair value. Other-than-temporary declines in fair value from amortized cost
for available-for-sale equity securities that the Company intends to sell or would more likely than not be required to sell before the
expected recovery of the amortized cost basis are charged to other income (expense), net, in the period in which the loss occurs.
Equity Method Investments: Investments in business entities in which the Company does not have control, but has the ability to
exercise significant influence over operating and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method. The Company
evaluates its equity method investments for impairment whenever an event or change in circumstances occurs that may have a
significant adverse impact on the carrying value of the investment. If a loss in value has occurred that is deemed to be other-than-
temporary, an impairment loss is recorded. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture,” for further
information relating to the Company’s equity method investment in Change Healthcare which was split-off from McKesson in the
fourth quarter of 2020.
Concentrations of Credit Risk and Receivables: The Company’s trade accounts receivable are subject to concentrations of
credit risk with customers primarily in its U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment. During 2020, sales to the
Company’s ten largest customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”), accounted for approximately 51% of its
total consolidated revenues and approximately 37% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2020. Sales to the Company’s
largest customer, CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 20% of its total consolidated revenues in 2020
and comprised approximately 20% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2020. As a result, the Company’s sales and credit
concentration is significant. The Company has agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of
member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts
receivables balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. A
material default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from these or any other large customers, or the loss of a large
customer or customer groups could have a material adverse impact on the Company’s financial condition, results of operations and
liquidity. In addition, trade receivables are subject to concentrations of credit risk with customers in the institutional, retail and
healthcare provider sectors, which can be affected by a downturn in the economy and changes in reimbursement policies. This
credit risk is mitigated by the size and diversity of the Company’s customer base as well as its geographic dispersion. The Company
estimates the receivables for which it does not expect full collection based on historical collection rates and ongoing evaluations of
the creditworthiness of its customers. An allowance is recorded in the Company’s consolidated financial statements for these
estimated amounts.
Financing Receivables: The Company assesses and monitors credit risk associated with financing receivables, primarily notes
receivable, through regular review of its collections experience in determining its allowance for loan losses. On an ongoing basis,
the Company also evaluates credit quality of its financing receivables utilizing historical collection rates and write-offs, as well as
considering existing economic conditions, to determine if an allowance is required. Financing receivables are derecognized if legal
title to them has transferred and all related risks and rewards incidental to ownership have passed to the buyer. As of March 31,
2020 and 2019, financing receivables were not material to our consolidated financial statements. Financing receivables and the
related allowances are included in Receivables, net and Other Noncurrent Assets in the consolidated balance sheets.
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. The Company reports inventories at the lower of cost or net
realizable value, except for inventories determined using the last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) method which are valued at the lower of
LIFO cost or market. The LIFO method presumes that the most recent inventory purchases are the first items sold and the inventory
cost under LIFO approximates market. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined using the LIFO method. The
majority of the cost of inventories held in foreign and certain domestic locations is based on the first-in, first-out (“FIFO”) method
and weighted average purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts, and other incentives received from vendors are recognized in cost
of sales upon the sale of the related inventory.
63
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The LIFO method was used to value approximately 60% and 62% of the Company’s inventories at March 31, 2020 and 2019.
If the Company had used the moving average method of inventory valuation, inventories would have been approximately
$444 million and $696 million higher than the amounts reported at March 31, 2020 and 2019. These amounts are equivalent to the
Company’s LIFO reserves. The Company’s LIFO valuation amount includes both pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical
products. The Company recognized LIFO credits of $252 million, $210 million and $99 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018 in cost of
sales in its consolidated statements of operations. A LIFO charge is recognized when the net effect of price increases on
pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory exceeds the impact of price declines, including the effect of
branded pharmaceutical products that have lost market exclusivity. A LIFO credit is recognized when the net effect of price
declines exceeds the impact of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory.
The Company believes that the moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost
of replacing inventory (i.e., “market”). As such, its LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO cost or market. As of March 31,
2020 and 2019, inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
Shipping and Handling Costs: The Company includes costs to pack and deliver inventory to its customers in selling,
distribution and administrative expenses. Shipping and handling costs of $1.0 billion, $951 million, and $914 million were
recognized in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Held for Sale: Assets and liabilities to be disposed of by sale (“disposal groups”) are reclassified into “held for sale” if their
carrying amounts are principally expected to be recovered through a sale transaction rather than through continuing use. The
reclassification occurs when the disposal group is available for immediate sale and the sale is highly probable. These criteria are
generally met when an agreement to sell exists, or management has committed to a plan to sell the assets within one year. Disposal
groups are measured at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less costs to sell and are not depreciated or amortized. When the
net realizable value of a disposal group increases during a period, a gain can be recognized to the extent that it does not increase the
value of the disposal group beyond its original carrying value when the disposal group was reclassified as held for sale. The fair
value of a disposal group, less any costs to sell, is assessed each reporting period it remains classified as held for sale and any
remeasurement to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell is reported as an adjustment to the carrying value of the
disposal group. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Held for Sale,” for more information.
Property, Plant and Equipment: The Company states its property, plant and equipment (“PPE”) at cost and depreciates them
under the straight-line method at rates designed to distribute the cost of PPE over estimated service lives, not to exceed 30 years.
When certain events or changes in operating conditions occur, an impairment assessment may be performed on the recoverability of
the carrying amounts.
Goodwill: Goodwill is tested for impairment on an annual basis in the third quarter or more frequently if indicators of potential
impairment exist. Impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating segment or
one level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial information is available and
segment management regularly reviews the operating results.
The Company applies the goodwill impairment test by comparing the estimated fair value of a reporting unit to its carrying
value and recording an impairment charge equal to the amount of excess carrying value above estimated fair value, if any, but not
to exceed the amount of goodwill allocated to the reporting unit.
To estimate the fair value of its reporting units, the Company generally uses a combination of the market approach and the
income approach. Under the market approach, it estimates fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses, or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, it uses a discounted cash flow
(“DCF”) model in which cash flows anticipated over future periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are
discounted to their present value using an appropriate rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within the reporting unit.
Other estimates inherent in both the market and income approaches include long-term growth rates, projected revenues and
earnings and cash flow forecasts for the reporting units. In addition, the Company compares the aggregate of the reporting units’
fair values to the Company’s market capitalization as a further corroboration of the fair values. Goodwill testing requires a complex
series of assumptions and judgments by management in projecting future operating results, selecting guideline companies for
comparisons and assessing risks. The use of alternative assumptions and estimates could affect the fair values and change the
impairment determinations.
64
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Intangible Assets: Currently all of the Company’s intangible assets are subject to amortization and are amortized based on the
pattern of their economic consumption or on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 38 years.
The Company reviews intangible assets for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable. Determination of recoverability is based on the lowest level of
identifiable estimated future undiscounted cash flows resulting from use of the asset and its eventual disposition. Measurement of
any impairment loss is based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its estimated fair market value.
Capitalized Software Held for Internal Use: The Company capitalizes costs of software held for internal use during the
application development stage of a project and amortizes those costs over their estimated useful lives, not to exceed 10 years. As of
March 31, 2020 and 2019, capitalized software held for internal use was $400 million and $394 million, net of accumulated
amortization of $1.3 billion and $1.2 billion, and is included in other noncurrent assets in the consolidated balance sheets. Costs
incurred during the preliminary project and post-implementation stages are expensed as incurred.
Insurance Programs: Under its insurance programs, the Company obtains coverage for catastrophic exposures as well as those
risks required to be insured by law or contract. It is the Company’s policy to retain a significant portion of certain losses primarily
related to workers’ compensation and comprehensive general, product and vehicle liability. Provisions for losses expected under
these programs are recorded based on the Company’s estimate of the aggregate liability for claims incurred as well as for claims
incurred but not yet reported. Such estimates utilize certain actuarial assumptions followed in the insurance industry.
Revenue Recognition: Revenue is recognized when an entity satisfies a performance obligation by transferring control of a
promised good or service to a customer in an amount that reflects the consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled for
that good or service.
Revenues generated from the distribution of pharmaceutical and medical products represent the majority of the Company’s
revenues. The Company orders product from the manufacturer, receives and carries the product at its central distribution facilities
and delivers the product directly to its customers’ warehouses, hospitals or retail pharmacies. The distribution business primarily
generates revenue from a contract related to a confirmed purchase order with a customer in a distribution arrangement. Revenue is
recognized when control of goods is transferred to the customer which occurs upon the Company’s delivery to the customer or
upon customer pick-up. The Company also earns revenues from a variety of other sources including its retail, services and
technology businesses. Retail revenues are recognized at the point of sale. Service revenues, including technology service revenues,
are recognized when services are rendered. Revenues derived from distribution and retail business at the point of sale, and revenues
derived from services represent approximately 98% and 2% of total revenues for each of the years ended March 31, 2020 and
March 31, 2019.  
Revenues are recorded gross when the Company is the principal in the transaction, has the ability to direct the use of the goods
or services prior to transfer to a customer, is responsible for fulfilling the promise to its customer, has latitude in establishing prices,
and controls the relationship with the customer. The Company records its revenues net of sales taxes. Revenues are measured based
on the amount of consideration that the Company expects to receive, reduced by estimates for return allowances, discounts and
rebates using historical data. Sales returns from customers were approximately $3.1 billion in 2020, $2.9 billion in 2019 and $3.1
billion in 2018. Assets for the right to recover products from customers and the associated refund liabilities for return allowances
were not material as of March 31, 2020. Shipping and handling costs associated with outbound freight after control over a product
has transferred to a customer are accounted for as fulfillment costs. The Company records deferred revenues when payments are
received or due in advance of its performance. Deferred revenues are primarily from the Company’s services arrangements and are
recognized as revenues over the periods when services are performed.
The Company had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded on its consolidated
balance sheets as of March 31, 2020 and 2019. The Company generally expenses costs to obtain a contract as incurred when the
amortization period is less than one year.
Supplier Incentives: Fees for services and other incentives received from suppliers, relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory, are considered product discounts and are generally reported as a reduction to cost of sales.
65
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Supplier Reserves: The Company establishes reserves against amounts due from suppliers relating to various fees for services
and price and rebate incentives, including deductions taken against payments otherwise due to it. These reserve estimates are
established based on judgment after considering the status of current outstanding claims, historical experience with the suppliers,
the specific incentive programs and any other pertinent information available. The Company evaluates the amounts due from
suppliers on a continual basis and adjusts the reserve estimates when appropriate based on changes in facts and circumstances.
Adjustments to supplier reserves are generally included in cost of sales unless consideration from the vendor is in exchange for
distinct goods or services or for pass-through rebate purchases. The ultimate outcome of any outstanding claims may be different
than the Company’s estimate. The supplier reserves primarily pertain to the Company’s U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty
Solutions segment.
Income Taxes: The Company accounts for income taxes under the asset and liability method, which requires the recognition of
deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences of events that have been included in the financial
statements or the tax returns. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based on the difference between
the financial statements and the tax basis of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the
differences are expected to reverse. Tax benefits from uncertain tax positions are recognized when it is more likely than not that the
position will be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation processes, based on the
technical merits. The amount recognized is measured as the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of
being realized upon effective settlement.
Interest Expense: Interest expense primarily includes interest for the Company’s long-term debt obligations, commercial paper,
net interest settlements of interest rate swaps, and the amortization of deferred issuance costs and original issue discounts on debt.
Foreign Currency Translation: The reporting currency of the Company and its subsidiaries is the U.S. dollar. Its foreign
subsidiaries generally consider their local currency to be their functional currency. Foreign currency-denominated assets and
liabilities of these foreign subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars at period-end exchange rates, while revenues and expenses
are translated at average exchange rates during the corresponding period and stockholders’ equity accounts are primarily translated
at historical exchange rates. Foreign currency translation adjustments are included in other comprehensive income or loss in the
consolidated statements of comprehensive income, and the cumulative effect is included in the stockholders’ equity section of the
consolidated balance sheets. Realized gains and losses from currency exchange transactions are recorded in operating expenses in
the consolidated statements of operations and were not material to the Company’s consolidated results of operations in 2020, 2019
or 2018. The Company releases cumulative translation adjustments from stockholders’ equity into earnings as a gain or loss only
upon a complete or substantially complete liquidation of a controlling interest in a subsidiary or a group of assets within a foreign
entity. It also releases all or a pro rata portion of the cumulative translation adjustments into earnings upon the sale of an equity
method investment that is a foreign entity or has a foreign component. 
Derivative Financial Instruments: Derivative financial instruments are used principally in the management of foreign currency
exchange and interest rate exposures and are recorded in the consolidated balance sheets at fair value. If a derivative is designated
as a fair value hedge, the changes in the fair value of the derivative and of the hedged item attributable to the hedged risk are
recognized in earnings. The Company uses foreign currency-denominated notes and cross-currency swaps to hedge a portion of its
net investment in its foreign subsidiaries. It uses cash flow hedges primarily to reduce the effects of foreign currency exchange rate
risk related to intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies. If the financial instrument is designated as a cash flow
hedge or net investment hedge, the effective portions of changes in the fair value of the derivative are included in other
comprehensive income or loss in the consolidated statements of comprehensive income, and the cumulative effect is included in the
stockholders’ equity section of the consolidated balance sheets. The cumulative changes in fair value are reclassified to the same
line as the hedged item in the consolidated statements of operations when the hedged item affects earnings. The Company evaluates
hedge effectiveness at inception and on an ongoing basis, and ineffective portions of changes in the fair value of cash flow hedges
and net investment hedges are recognized in earnings following the date when ineffectiveness was identified. Derivative
instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with the change included in
earnings.
Comprehensive Income: Comprehensive income consists of two components, net income and other comprehensive income.
Other comprehensive income refers to revenue, expenses and gains and losses that under GAAP are recorded as an element of
stockholders’ equity but are excluded from earnings. The Company’s other comprehensive income primarily consists of foreign
currency translation adjustments from those subsidiaries where the local currency is the functional currency including gains and
losses on net investment hedges, unrealized gains and losses on cash flow hedges, as well as unrealized gains and losses on
retirement-related benefit plans.
66
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Noncontrolling Interests and Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests: Noncontrolling interests represent the portion of profit or
loss, net assets and comprehensive income that is not allocable to McKesson Corporation. Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests includes recurring compensation that McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of
McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson Europe”), formerly known as Celesio AG, under the domination and profit and loss transfer
agreement. Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests also includes third-party equity interests in the Company’s
consolidated entities including Vantage Oncology Holdings, LLC (“Vantage”) and ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP
(“ClarusONE”), which was established between McKesson and Walmart, Inc in 2017. Noncontrolling interests with redemption
features, such as put rights, that are not solely within the Company’s control are considered redeemable noncontrolling interests.
Redeemable noncontrolling interests are presented outside of stockholders’ equity in the Company’s consolidated balance sheets.
Refer to Financial Note 9, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” for more information.
Share-Based Compensation: The Company accounts for all share-based compensation transactions at fair value. The share-
based compensation expense, for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest, is recognized on a straight-line basis
over the requisite service period. The share-based compensation expense recognized is classified in the consolidated statements of
operations in the same manner as cash compensation paid to the Company’s employees.
Loss Contingencies: The Company is subject to various claims, including, but not limited to, claims with customers and
vendors, pending and potential legal actions for damages, investigations relating to governmental laws and regulations and other
matters arising out of the normal conduct of its business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, the
Company records a liability in the amount of its best estimate for the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to
a particular contingency is often difficult to predict and determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be
practicable based on the information available and the potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will
determine the ultimate resolution of the contingency. Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many
years, during which time relevant developments and new information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the
likelihood of potential loss and whether it is possible to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss. When a material
loss is reasonably possible or probable, but a reasonable estimate cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided. The
Company recognizes legal fees as incurred when the legal services are provided.
The Company reviews all contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess
whether a reasonable estimate of the loss or a range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a meaningful
estimate of loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on negotiations with or decisions by
third parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system and other interested parties.
Restructuring Charges: Employee severance costs are generally recognized when payments are probable and amounts are
reasonably estimable. Costs related to contracts without future benefit or contract termination are recognized at the earlier of the
contract termination or the cease-use dates. Other exit-related costs are recognized as incurred.
Business Combinations: The Company accounts for business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting
whereby the identifiable assets and liabilities of the acquired business, as well as any noncontrolling interest in the acquired
business, are recorded at their estimated fair values as of the date that the Company obtains control of the acquired business. Any
purchase consideration in excess of the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related
expenses and related restructuring costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed. For intangible
assets, the Company typically uses a method that is a form or variation of the income approach, whereby a forecast of future cash
flows attributable to the asset are discounted to present value using a risk-adjusted discount rate. Some of the more significant
estimates and assumptions inherent in the income approach include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows, the
discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows and the assessment of the asset’s expected useful life.
67
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
Leases: In the first quarter of 2020, the Company adopted amended guidance for leases using the modified retrospective
method and recorded a cumulative-effect adjustment to opening retained earnings on the date of adoption. Under the amended
guidance, entities are required to recognize operating lease liabilities and operating lease right-of-use (“ROU”) assets on the
balance sheet for all leases with terms longer than 12 months and to provide enhanced disclosures on key information of leasing
arrangements.
The Company elected the transition package of practical expedients provided within the amended guidance, which eliminates
the requirements to reassess lease identification, lease classification and initial direct costs for leases which commenced before
April 1, 2019. The Company also elected not to separate lease from non-lease components for all leases and to exclude short-term
leases with an initial term of 12 months or less from its consolidated balance sheets.
Upon adoption of this amended guidance, the Company recorded $2.2 billion of operating lease liabilities, $2.1 billion of
operating lease ROU assets and a cumulative-effect adjustment of $69 million to opening retained earnings. The adjustment to
opening retained earnings included impairment charges of $89 million, net of tax to the ROU assets primarily related to previously
impaired long-lived assets at the retail pharmacies in the Company’s United Kingdom (“U.K.”) and Canadian businesses, partially
offset by derecognition of existing deferred gain on the Company’s sale-leaseback transaction related to its former corporate
headquarters building. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated
statements of operations and cash flows.
Refer to Financial Note 13, “Leases,” for more information.
Derivatives and Hedging: In the first quarter of 2020, the Company prospectively adopted amended guidance that allows it to
include the Secured Overnight Financing Rate Overnight Index Swap Rate as a benchmark interest rate for hedge accounting
purposes. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material effect on the Company’s consolidated financial
statements.
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income: In the first quarter of 2020, the Company adopted amended guidance that allows
for a reclassification of only those amounts related to the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “2017 Tax Act”) to retained earnings
thereby eliminating the stranded tax effects. Previous guidance required that deferred tax liabilities and assets be adjusted for a
change in tax laws with the effect included in income from continuing operations in the reporting period that includes the
enactment date. The Company elected not to reclassify the stranded tax effects within accumulated other comprehensive loss to
retained earnings. The adoption of this amended guidance did not affect the Company’s consolidated financial statements.
Premium Amortization of Purchased Callable Debt Securities: In the first quarter of 2020, the Company adopted amended
guidance on a modified retrospective basis that shortens the amortization period for certain callable debt securities held at a
premium. The amended guidance requires the premium of callable debt securities to be amortized to the earliest call date but does
not require an accounting change for securities held at a discount as they would still be amortized to maturity. The adoption of this
amended guidance did not affect the Company’s consolidated financial statements.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements Not Yet Adopted
Income Taxes: In December 2019, amended guidance was issued with the intent to simplify various aspects related to
accounting for income taxes.  The guidance eliminates certain exceptions related to the approach for intraperiod tax allocation, the
methodology for calculating income taxes in an interim period and the recognition of deferred tax liabilities for outside basis
differences. The guidance also simplifies and clarifies certain other aspects of accounting for income taxes. The guidance is
effective for the Company in the first quarter of 2022 and early adoption is permitted. The Company is currently evaluating the
impact of this amended guidance on its consolidated financial statements.
68
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Intangibles - Goodwill and Other - Internal-Use Software: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued for a customer’s
accounting for implementation and other upfront costs incurred in a cloud computing arrangement that is a service contract. The
amended guidance aligns the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred in a cloud computing arrangement that is
a service contract with the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs in a cloud computing arrangement that has a software
license. Upon adoption, the Company will begin capitalizing eligible implementation costs for cloud computing arrangement
service contracts and recognizing the expense over the service period. The amended guidance is effective for the Company either
on a retrospective or prospective basis in the first quarter of 2021. The Company will adopt this guidance prospectively in the first
quarter of 2021 and adoption of this guidance will not have a material impact on its financial statements or disclosures.
Compensation - Retirement Benefits - Defined Benefit Plans: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued for defined benefit
pension or other postretirement plans. The amended guidance requires the Company to disclose the weighted-average interest
crediting rates for cash balance plans and other plans with promised interest crediting rates, and an explanation of reasons for
significant gains and losses related to changes in the benefit obligation for the period. The amended guidance also requires the
Company to remove disclosures on the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income expected to be recognized as
components of net periodic benefit costs over the next fiscal year. The amended guidance is effective for the Company on a
retrospective basis in the first quarter of 2021. The adoption of this amended guidance will not have a material effect in the
consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, balance sheets or cash flows of the Company. This amended
guidance will result in changes in disclosures.
Fair Value Measurement: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued to remove, modify and add disclosure requirements
on fair value measurements. The amended guidance removes disclosure requirements for transfers between Level 1 and Level 2
measurements and valuation processes for Level 3 measurements but adds new disclosure requirements including changes in
unrealized gains or losses in other comprehensive income related to recurring Level 3 measurements. The amended guidance is
effective for the Company in the first quarter of 2021. Certain requirements will be applied prospectively while other changes will
be applied retrospectively upon the effective date. The adoption of this amended guidance will not have a material effect in the
consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, balance sheets or cash flows of the Company. This amended
guidance will result in changes in disclosures.
Financial Instruments - Credit Losses: In June 2016, amended guidance was issued which will change the impairment model
for most financial assets from one based on current losses to a forward-looking model based on expected losses. This model will
replace the existing incurred credit loss model, that generally requires a loss to be incurred before it is recognized. The forward-
looking model will require the Company to consider historical experience, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable
forecasts that affect the collectability of the reported amount in estimating credit losses and is expected to result in earlier
recognition of allowances for credit losses. The amended guidance requires financial assets that are measured at amortized cost be
presented at the net amount expected to be collected. The allowance for credit losses is a valuation account that is deducted from
the amortized cost basis of financial assets. The guidance will also require enhanced disclosures. The amended guidance is effective
for the Company in the first quarter of 2021 and any impact will be applied through a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening
balance of retained earnings in the year of adoption. The adoption of this guidance will not have a material impact on the
Company’s financial statements or disclosures.
2.Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture
Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange
In the fourth quarter of 2017, the Company contributed the majority of its McKesson Technology Solutions businesses to form
a joint venture, Change Healthcare JV, under a contribution agreement between McKesson and Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”)
and others, including shareholders of Change. In exchange for the contribution, the Company initially owned approximately 70% of
the joint venture, with the remaining equity ownership of approximately 30% held by Change Healthcare Inc. The Change
Healthcare JV was jointly governed by McKesson and shareholders of Change. The initial investment in the Change Healthcare JV
represented the fair value of McKesson’s 70% equity interest in the joint venture upon closing of the transaction. In 2018, the
Company recorded a pre-tax gain of $37 million (after-tax gain of $22 million) in operating expenses upon the finalization of net
working capital and other adjustments. During 2018, it received $126 million in cash from Change representing the final settlement
of the net working capital and other adjustments.
69
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Initial Public Offering by Change Healthcare Inc.
On June 27, 2019, common stock and certain other securities of Change began trading on the NASDAQ (“IPO”). Change was
a holding company and did not own any material assets or have any operations other than its interest in the Change Healthcare JV.
On July 1, 2019, upon the completion of its IPO, Change received net cash proceeds of approximately $888 million. Change
contributed the proceeds from its offering of common stock of $609 million to the Change Healthcare JV in exchange for additional
membership interests of the Change Healthcare JV (“LLC Units”) at the equivalent of its offering price of $13 per share. The
proceeds from the concurrent offering of other securities of $279 million were used by Change to acquire certain securities of the
Change Healthcare JV that substantially mirror the terms of other securities included in the offering by Change. The Change
Healthcare JV, in return, used the majority of the IPO proceeds to repay a portion of the joint venture’s outstanding debt. As a
result, McKesson’s equity interest in the Change Healthcare JV was diluted from approximately 70% to approximately 58.5%
while Change owned approximately 41.5% of the outstanding LLC Units. Accordingly, in the second quarter of 2020, the Company
recognized a pre-tax dilution loss of $246 million ($184 million after-tax) primarily representing the difference between its
proportionate share of the IPO proceeds and the dilution effect on the investment’s carrying value. The Company’s proportionate
share of income or loss from this investment was subsequently reduced as immaterial settlements of stock option exercises occurred
after the IPO. These amounts were included in “Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture”
in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
In the second quarter of 2020, the Company recorded a pre-tax other-than-temporary impairment (“OTTI”) charge of $1.2
billion ($864 million after-tax) to its investment in the Change Healthcare JV, representing the difference between the carrying
value of the Company’s investment and the fair value derived from the corresponding closing price of Change’s common stock at
September 30, 2019. This charge was included in “Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint
Venture” in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
Equity Method Investment in the Change Healthcare Joint Venture
The Company’s investment in the joint venture has been accounted for using the equity method of accounting on a one-month
reporting lag. The Company’s accounting policy has been to disclose any intervening events of the joint venture in the lag period
that could materially affect its condensed consolidated financial statements. Effective April 1, 2019, the Change Healthcare JV
adopted the amended revenue recognition guidance. In the first quarter of 2020, the Company recorded its proportionate share of
the joint venture’s adoption impact of the amended revenue recognition guidance of approximately $80 million, net of tax, in the
Company’s opening retained earnings.
The Company recorded its proportionate share of loss from its investment in the Change Healthcare JV of $119 million, $194
million and $248 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018. The Company’s proportionate share of income or loss from this investment
includes transaction and integration expenses incurred by the Change Healthcare JV and basis differences between the joint venture
and McKesson including amortization of fair value adjustments primarily representing incremental intangible amortization and
removal of profit associated with the recognition of deferred revenue. The proportionate share of loss from the joint venture
recorded in 2018 was partially offset by a provisional tax benefit of $76 million recognized by the Change Healthcare JV primarily
due to a reduction in the future applicable tax rate related to the December 2017 enactment of the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
These amounts were recorded under the caption “Equity Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint
Venture” in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations.
70
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Separation of the Change Healthcare JV
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed the previously announced separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV.
The separation was affected through the split-off of PF2 SpinCo, Inc. (“SpinCo”), a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company that
held all of the Company’s interest in the Change Healthcare JV, to certain of the Company’s stockholders through an exchange offer
(“Split-off”), followed by the merger of SpinCo with and into Change, with Change surviving the merger (“Merger”).
In connection with the Split-off, on March 9, 2020, the Company distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of common
stock of SpinCo to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares of McKesson
common stock which now are held as treasury stock on the Company’s consolidated balance sheet as of March 31, 2020. Refer to
Financial Note 22, “Stockholders' Equity,” for more information. Following consummation of the exchange offer, on March 10,
2020, SpinCo was merged with and into Change Healthcare, and each share of SpinCo common stock converted into one share of
Change common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being paid in lieu of fractional shares of Change common stock. The
Split-off and the Merger are intended to be generally tax-free transactions for U.S. federal income tax purposes. Following the
Split-off, the Company does not beneficially own any of Change’s outstanding securities. In the fourth quarter of 2020, the
Company recognized an estimated gain of $414 million related to the transaction which is included under the caption “Equity
Earnings and Charges from Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” in the Company’s consolidated statements of
operations. The estimated gain was calculated as follows:
(In millions, except per shar e data)
Fair value of McKesson common stock accepted (15.4 million shares at $131.97 per share on March 9, 2020) $ 2,036
Investment in the Change Healthcare JV at exchange date (2,096)
Reversal of deferred tax liability 521
Release of accumulated other comprehensive attributable to the joint venture (24)
Less: Transaction costs incurred (23)
Estimated net gain on split-off of the Change Healthcare JV $ 414
At March 31, 2019, the Company’s carrying value of this investment was $3.5 billion. The carrying value included equity
method intangible assets and goodwill which caused the Company’s investment basis to exceed its proportionate share of the
Change Healthcare JV’s book value of net assets by approximately $4.2 billion at March 31, 2019.
Related Party Transactions
In connection with the formation of the Change Healthcare JV, McKesson, the Change Healthcare JV and certain shareholders
of Change entered into various ancillary agreements, including transition services agreements (“TSA”), a transaction and advisory
fee agreement (“Advisory Agreement”), a tax receivable agreement (“TRA”) and certain other agreements. Fees incurred or earned
from the Advisory Agreement were not material for 2020, 2019 and 2018. Fees incurred or earned from the TSA were $22 million
in 2020, $60 million in 2019 and $91 million in 2018. The Advisory Agreement was terminated in 2020.
In 2019, the Company renegotiated the terms of the TRA which resulted in the extinguishment and derecognition of the $90
million noncurrent liability payable to the shareholders of Change. In exchange for the shareholders of Change agreeing to
extinguish the liability, the Company agreed to an allocation of certain tax amortization that had the effect of reducing the amount
of a distribution from the Change Healthcare JV that would otherwise have been required to be made to the shareholders of
Change. As a result of the renegotiation, McKesson was relieved from any potential future obligations associated with the
noncurrent liability and recognized a pre-tax credit of $90 million ($66 million after-tax) in operating expenses in its consolidated
statement of operations in 2019. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had no outstanding payable balance to the shareholders
of Change under the TRA.
Revenues recognized and expenses incurred under commercial agreements with the Change Healthcare JV were not material
during the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, receivables due from the Change Healthcare
JV were not material.
71
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Under the agreement executed in 2019 between the Change Healthcare JV, McKesson, Change, and certain subsidiaries of the
Change Healthcare JV, McKesson has the ability to adjust the manner in which certain depreciation or amortization deductions are
allocated among Change Healthcare Inc. and McKesson. McKesson exercised its right under the agreement and allocated certain
depreciation and amortization deductions to Change for the tax year ended March 31, 2019 and estimated certain depreciation and
amortization deductions for the tax year ended March 31, 2020. These allocated depreciation and amortization deductions may
change as certain events occur, including the filing of the Change Healthcare JV tax return for the tax year ended March 31, 2020.
After McKesson’s separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV, the aforementioned TRA agreement requires the
Change Healthcare JV to pay McKesson 85% of the net cash tax savings realized, or deemed to be realized, by Change resulting
from the depreciation or amortization allocated to Change by McKesson. The receipt of any payments from the Change
Healthcare JV under the TRA is dependent upon Change benefiting from this depreciation or amortization in future tax return
filings. This creates uncertainty over the amount, timing and probability of the gain recognized. As such, the Company accounts for
the TRA as a gain contingency, with no receivable recognized as of March 31, 2020.
Concurrent with the IPO in July 2019, Change Healthcare Inc. appointed two of the Company’s executive officers as well as
McKesson’s former chief executive officer to its Board of Directors. These appointments had no impact on the equity method of
accounting the Company applied to its investment in the Change Healthcare JV. Effective as of the time of the Merger, these
individuals resigned from the Board of Directors of Change. Aside from the divestiture transaction discussed above, there were no
material transactions with Change Healthcare Inc.
3.    Held for Sale
Assets and liabilities that have met the classification as held for sale were $906 million and $683 million as of March 31, 2020.
These amounts primarily consist of the majority of the Company’s German pharmaceutical wholesale business described below.
German Wholesale Joint Venture
On December 12, 2019, the Company announced that it had entered into an agreement (the “Contribution Agreement”) with a
third-party intending to contribute the majority of its German wholesale business to create a joint venture in which McKesson will
have a non-controlling interest. This business is within the Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. The agreement
is subject to regulatory approvals and is expected to close within the second half of 2021. The transaction does not meet the criteria
to be reported as a discontinued operation as it does not constitute a significant strategic business shift. As of March 31, 2020, $842
million of assets, and $656 million of liabilities were classified as “Assets held for sale” and “Liabilities held for sale” in the
consolidated balance sheet.
As part of the transaction, during 2020 the Company recorded charges totaling $275 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to
remeasure the disposal group to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell. This amount is included in operating
expenses in the consolidated statements of operations for the year ended March 31, 2020. The Company’s measurement of the fair
value of the disposal group was based on the total consideration received by the Company as outlined in the Contribution
Agreement. Certain components of the total consideration included fair value measurements that fall within Level 3 of the fair
value hierarchy.
72
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The total assets and liabilities of the German wholesale joint venture that are classified as held for sale on the Company’s
consolidated balance sheet as of March 31, 2020, are as follows:
(In millions) March 31, 2020
Assets  
Current Assets  
Receivables, net $ 548
Inventories, net 478
Long-term assets 88
Remeasurement of assets of business held for sale to fair value less cost to sell (1) (272)
Total Assets held for sale $ 842
  
Liabilities  
Current Liabilities  
Drafts and accounts payable $ 450
Other accrued liabilities 40
Long-term liabilities 166
Total Liabilities held for sale $ 656
(1)Includes the ef fect of approximately $3 million  of cumulative foreign currency translation adjustment.
4.    Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges
The Company recorded pre-tax restructuring, impairment and related charges of $268 million, $597 million and $567 million
in 2020, 2019 and 2018. These charges are included under the caption “Restructuring, impairment and related charges” within
operating expenses in the consolidated statements of operations. There were no material restructuring initiatives announced during
2020.
Fiscal 2019 Initiatives
On April 25, 2018, the Company announced a strategic growth initiative intended to drive long-term incremental profit growth
and to increase operational efficiency. The initiative consists of multiple growth priorities and plans to optimize the Company’s
operating models and cost structures primarily through centralization, cost management and outsourcing of certain administrative
functions.
As part of the growth initiative, the Company committed to implement certain actions including a reduction in workforce,
facility consolidation and store closures. This set of initiatives was substantially complete by the end of 2020. The Company
recorded pre-tax charges of $15 million ($12 million after-tax) and $135 million ($122 million after-tax) in 2020 and 2019. Any
remaining charges primarily consist of exit-related costs.
As previously announced on November 30, 2018, the Company relocated its corporate headquarters, effective April 1, 2019,
from San Francisco, California to Irving, Texas to improve efficiency, collaboration and cost competitiveness. The Company
anticipates that the relocation will be complete by January 2021. As a result, the Company recorded pre-tax charges of $44 million
($32 million after-tax) and $33 million ($24 million after-tax) in 2020 and 2019, primarily representing employee retention
expenses, asset impairments and accelerated depreciation. The Company expects to record total pre-tax charges of approximately
$80 million to $130 million, of which $77 million of pre-tax charges were recorded to date. The estimated remaining charges
primarily consist of lease and other exit-related costs and employee-related expenses including retention.
73
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
During the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company committed to additional programs to continue its operating model and cost
optimization efforts. The Company continues to implement centralization of certain functions and outsourcing through an expanded
arrangement with a third-party vendor to achieve operational efficiency. The programs also include reorganization and
consolidation of business operations, related headcount reductions, the further closures of retail pharmacy stores in Europe and
closures of other facilities. The Company expects to incur total charges of approximately $300 million to $350 million for these
programs, of which pre-tax charges of $72 million ($55 million after-tax) and $163 million ($127 million after-tax) were recorded
in 2020 and 2019, primarily representing employee severance, accelerated depreciation expense and project consulting fees. We
anticipate these additional programs will be substantially completed by the end of 2021. The estimated remaining charges primarily
consist of facility and other exit costs and employee-related costs.
Restructuring, impairment and related charges for the Company’s fiscal 2019 initiatives for the year ended March 31, 2020
consisted of the following:
 Year Ended March 31, 2020
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
SolutionsEuropean
Pharmaceutical
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions Other  Corporate Total
Severance and employee-
related costs, net $ 3$ 1$ 2 $ 1 $ 33 $ 40
Exit and other-related costs (1)— 11 19 1 44 75
Asset impairments and
accelerated depreciation — 5 1 — 10 16
Total $ 3$ 17$ 22 $ 2 $ 87 $ 131
(1) Exit and other -related costs primarily include project consulting fees.
Restructuring, impairment and related charges for the Company’s fiscal 2019 initiatives for the year ended March 31, 2019
consisted of the following:
 Year Ended March 31, 2019
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
Solutions  European
Pharmaceutical
Solutions  Medical-
Surgical
Solutions Other  Corporate Total
Severance and employee-
related costs, net $ 50 $ 33 $ 19$ 16 $ 36$ 154
Exit and other-related costs (1)7 3 20 57 57 144
Asset impairments and
accelerated depreciation 6 5 3 18 1 33
Total $ 63 $ 41 $ 42$ 91 $ 94$ 331
(1) Exit and other -related costs primarily include lease and other contract exit costs associated with closures of facilities and retail pharmacy
stores as well as project consulting fees.
74
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the activity related to the restructuring liabilities associated with the fiscal 2019 initiatives for
the year ended March 31, 2020:
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
Solutions  European
Pharmaceutical
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions Other Corporate Total
Balance, March 31, 2019 (1)$ 31 $ 38 $ 15 $ 29$ 37 $ 150
Restructuring charges
recognized 3 17 22 2 87 131
Non-cash charges —  (5) (1) — (10) (16)
Cash payments (13) (26) (16) (20) (61) (136)
Other 1 — (2) (4) (14) (19)
Balance, March 31, 2020 (2)$ 22 $ 24 $ 18 $ 7$ 39 $ 110
(1) As of March 31, 2019 , the total reserve balance was $150 millio n of which $117 millio n was recorded  in other accrued liabilities and $33
million  was recorded in other noncurrent liabilities.
(2) As of March 31, 2020 , the total reserve balance was $110 millio n of which $99 millio n was recorded  in other accrued liabilities and $11
million  was recorded in other noncurrent liabilities.
Fiscal 2018 McKesson Europe Plan
In the second quarter of 2018, the Company committed to a restructuring plan, which primarily consisted of the closures of
underperforming retail pharmacy stores in the U.K. and a reduction in workforce. Under this plan, the Company expected to record
total pre-tax charges of approximately $90 million to $130 million for its European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, of which
$92 million of pre-tax charges were recorded through the end of 2019. The plan was substantially completed in 2020 and additional
charges and payments in 2020 were not material. In 2019 and 2018, the Company recorded pre-tax charges of $18 million ($16
million after-tax) and $74 million ($67 million after-tax) in operating expenses primarily representing employee severance and
lease exit costs. It made cash payments of $32 million and $10 million during 2019 and 2018, primarily related to severance. The
reserve balances as of March 31, 2020 and 2019 were $4 million and $19 million, recorded in other accrued liabilities in the
Company’s consolidated balance sheets.
Other Plans
There were no material restructuring, impairment and related charges for other plans recorded during 2020, 2019 and 2018.
The restructuring liabilities for other plans as of March 31, 2020 and 2019 were $43 million and $68 million.
Long-Lived Asset Impairments
McKesson Europe
In 2020, the Company recorded pre-tax charges of $82 million ($66 million after-tax) to impair certain long-lived and
intangible assets within the Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. These charges related primarily to intangible
assets associated with pharmacy licenses within the U.K retail business due to a decline in estimated future cash flows driven by
additional U.K. government reimbursement reductions communicated in the third quarter of 2020. The Company used a
combination of an income approach (a DCF method) and a market approach to estimate the fair value of the long-lived and
intangible assets. The fair value of the intangible assets is considered a Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of
unobservable inputs developed using company specific information.
75
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In 2019, the Company recorded pre-tax charges of $210 million ($172 million after-tax) to impair certain long-lived assets
(primarily pharmacy licenses) for its U.K. retail business primarily driven by government reimbursement reductions and
competitive pressures in the U.K. In 2018, the Company recorded pre-tax charges of $446 million ($410 million after-tax) to impair
the carrying value of certain intangible assets (primarily customer relationships and pharmacy licenses), store assets and capitalized
software assets due to continuing declines in estimated future cash flows in its European businesses including consideration of
significant government reimbursement reductions in its U.K. retail business. In 2019 and 2018, the Company used an income
approach (a DCF method) or a combination of an income approach and a market approach to estimate the fair value of the long-
lived assets. The fair value of the intangible assets is considered a Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of
unobservable inputs developed using company specific information.
Rexall Health
In 2020, the Company performed an interim impairment test of long-lived and intangible assets for its Rexall Health retail
business due to the decline in the estimated future cash flows primarily driven by lower than expected growth in both prescription
volume and sales of non-prescription goods. As a result, the Company recognized a charge of $30 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to
impair certain long-lived and intangible assets, primarily customer relationships. The Company utilized an income approach (a
DCF method) for estimating the fair value of the long-lived and intangible assets. The fair value of these assets is considered a
Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company specific information.
In 2019 and 2018, the Company recorded charges of $35 million and $33 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair certain
intangible assets (primarily customer relationships) for its Rexall Health retail business. The impairments were primarily the result
of the decline in estimated future cash flows for this business. The estimated cash flow projections were negatively affected by
lower projected overall growth rate from the ongoing impact of government regulations in 2019 and significant generics
reimbursement reductions across Canada and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces in 2018. The Company utilized an
income approach (a DCF method) for estimating the fair value of long-lived assets. The fair value of the intangible assets is
considered a Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company specific
information.
Refer to Financial Note 19, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on nonrecurring fair value measurements.
5.Business Acquisitions and Divestitures
During 2020, the Company did not complete any material acquisitions. During 2020 and 2019, the Company did not complete
any material divestitures aside from the separation of the Change Healthcare JV, as described in more detail in Financial Note 2,
“Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture.”
Acquisitions
2019 Acquisition
Medical Specialties Distributors LLC (“MSD”)
On June 1, 2018, the Company completed its acquisition of MSD for the net purchase consideration of $784 million, which
was funded from cash on hand. MSD is a leading national distributor of infusion and medical-surgical supplies as well as a provider
of biomedical services to alternate site and home health providers. The financial results of MSD have been included in the
Company’s consolidated statements of operations within its Medical-Surgical Solutions segment since the acquisition date.
The fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date were finalized upon completion of the
measurement period in the first quarter of 2020. The final purchase price allocation included acquired identifiable intangibles of
$326 million primarily representing customer relationships with a weighted average life of 18 years.
76
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the final recording of the fair value of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed for this
acquisition as of the acquisition date as well as adjustments made during the measurement period.
(In millions)Amounts
Previously
Recognized as of
Acquisition Date
(Provisional as
Adjusted) (1) FY20
Measurement
Period
AdjustmentsAmounts
Recognized as
of the
Acquisition
Date (2)
Receivables $ 113 $ (1) $ 112
Other current assets, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired 72 (1) 71
Goodwill 381 7 388
Intangible assets 326 — 326
Other long-term assets 55 1 56
Current liabilities (72) — (72)
Other long-term liabilities (91) (6) (97)
Net assets acquired, net of cash and cash equivalents $ 784 $ — $ 784
(1) Provisional amounts as of March 31, 2019 .
(2) Final amounts as of May 31, 2019.
2018 Acquisitions
RxCrossroads
On January 2, 2018, the Company completed its acquisition of RxCrossroads for the net purchase consideration of $720
million, which was funded from cash on hand. The financial results of RxCrossroads have been included in the consolidated
statements of operations within the Company’s U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment since the acquisition date.
The fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date were finalized upon completion of the
measurement period. As of December 31, 2018, the final amounts of fair value recognized for assets acquired and liabilities
assumed as of the acquisition date, excluding goodwill and intangibles, were $129 million and $57 million. Approximately $386
million of the final purchase price allocation was assigned to goodwill, which reflects the expected future benefits from certain
synergies and intangible assets that do not qualify for separate recognition. The final purchase price allocation included acquired
identifiable intangibles of $262 million primarily representing customer relationships and trade names with a weighted average life
of 14 years.
CoverMyMeds LLC (“CMM”)
On April 3, 2017, the Company completed its acquisition of CMM for the net purchase consideration of $1.3 billion, which
was funded from cash on hand. The fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date were finalized
upon completion of the measurement period in the first quarter of 2019. The financial results of CMM have been included in the
Company’s consolidated statements of operations within Other since the acquisition date.
Pursuant to the agreement, McKesson may pay up to an additional $160 million of contingent consideration based on CMM’s
financial performance for 2018 and 2019. As a result, the Company recorded a liability for this remaining contingent consideration
at its estimated fair value of $113 million as of the acquisition date in its consolidated balance sheet. The contingent consideration
was estimated using a Monte Carlo simulation, which utilized Level 3 inputs under the fair value measurement and disclosure
guidance, including estimated financial forecasts. The contingent liability was re-measured at fair value at each reporting date until
the liability was extinguished and changes in fair value were recorded in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations. The
initial fair value of this contingent consideration was a non-cash investing activity. Pursuant to the agreement, the Company paid
additional contingent consideration of $69 million and $68 million in May 2019 and May 2018. As of March 31, 2020 and 2019,
the related liability was nil and $69 million.
77
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Other
During 2018, the Company also completed acquisitions of intraFUSION, Inc. (“intraFUSION”), BDI Pharma, LLC (“BDI”)
and Uniprix Group (“Uniprix”) for net cash consideration of $485 million, which was funded from cash on hand. The fair value of
assets acquired and liabilities assumed of intraFUSION, BDI and Uniprix as of the acquisition dates were finalized upon
completion of the measurement period. As of September 30, 2018, the final amounts of fair value recognized for the assets acquired
and liabilities assumed for these acquisitions as of the acquisition dates, excluding goodwill and intangibles, were $292 million and
$160 million. Approximately $246 million of the final purchase price allocation was assigned to goodwill, which reflects the
expected future benefits of certain synergies and intangible assets that do not qualify for separate recognition. The final purchase
price allocation included acquired identifiable intangibles of $118 million primarily representing customer relationships. The
financial results of intraFUSION and BDI have been included within the Company’s U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment since the acquisition dates. The financial results of Uniprix have been included within Other since the acquisition date.
Other Acquisitions
During the three years presented, the Company also completed a number of other de minimis acquisitions within its operating
segments. Financial results for the Company’s business acquisitions have been included in the Company’s consolidated financial
statements since their respective acquisition dates. Purchase prices for business acquisitions have been allocated based on estimated
fair values at the respective acquisition dates.
Goodwill recognized for business acquisitions is generally not expected to be deductible for tax purposes. However, if the
assets of another company are acquired, the goodwill may be deductible for tax purposes.
Divestiture
Fiscal 2018
Enterprise Information Solutions
On August 1, 2017, the Company entered into an agreement with a third party to sell its Enterprise Information Solutions
(“EIS”) business included in Other for $185 million, subject to adjustments for net debt and working capital. On October 2, 2017,
the transaction closed upon satisfaction of all closing conditions including the termination of the waiting period under U.S. antitrust
laws. McKesson received net cash proceeds of $169 million after $16 million of assumed net debt by the third party. The Company
recognized a pre-tax gain of $109 million ($30 million after-tax) upon the disposition of this business in the third quarter of 2018 in
operating expenses.
6.Share-Based Compensation
The Company provides share-based compensation to its employees, officers and non-employee directors, including restricted
stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based stock units (“PSUs”, formerly referred to as total shareholder return units or “TSRUs”),
performance-based restricted stock units (“PeRSUs”), stock options and an employee stock purchase plan (“ESPP”) (collectively,
“share-based awards”). Most of the share-based awards are granted in the first quarter of each fiscal year.
Compensation expense for the share-based awards is recognized for the portion of awards ultimately expected to vest. The
Company estimates the number of share-based awards that will ultimately vest primarily based on historical experience. The
estimated forfeiture rate established upon grant is re-assessed throughout the requisite service period and is adjusted when actual
forfeitures occur. The actual forfeitures in future reporting periods could be higher or lower than current estimates.
Compensation expense is classified in the consolidated statements of operations or capitalized in the consolidated balance
sheets in the same manner as cash compensation paid to the Company’s employees. No share-based compensation expenses were
capitalized as part of the cost of an asset in 2020 and 2019. No material amounts were capitalized in 2018.
78
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Impact on Net Income
The components of share-based compensation expense and related tax benefits are as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019  2018
Restricted stock unit awards (1)$ 104 $ 75 $ 46
Stock options 7 12 14
Employee stock purchase plan 8 8 9
Share-based compensation expense 119 95 69
Tax benefit for share-based compensation expense (2) (18) (12) (28)
Share-based compensation expense, net of tax $ 101 $ 83 $ 41
(1) Includes compensation expense recognized for RSUs, PSUs and PeRSUs.
(2) Income tax benefit is computed using the tax rates of applicable tax jurisdictions. Additionally , a portion of pre-tax compensation expense is
not tax-deductible. Income tax expense for 2020  and 2019  included discrete income tax expense of $2 million and $4 million. 2018  included
a discrete income tax benefit of $8 million  related to the adoption of the amended accounting guidance on share-based compensation.
Stock Plans
In July 2013, the Company’s stockholders approved the 2013 Stock Plan to replace the 2005 Stock Plan. Under these stock
plans, the Company may issue restricted stock, RSUs, PSUs, PeRSUs, stock options and other share-based awards to selected
employees, officers and non-employee directors. The 2013 Stock Plan reserves 30 million shares plus unused reserved shares under
the 2005 Stock Plan. As of March 31, 2020, 20 million shares remain available for future grant under the 2013 Stock Plan.
Restricted Stock Unit Awards
RSUs entitle the holder to receive a specified number of shares of the Company’s common stock which vest over a period of
generally three to four years as determined by the Compensation Committee at the time of grant. The fair value of the award is
determined based on the market price of the Company’s common stock on the grant date and the related compensation expense is
recognized over the vesting period on a straight-line basis.
Non-employee directors receive an annual grant of RSUs, which vest immediately and are expensed upon grant. The director
may elect to receive the underlying shares immediately or defer receipt of the shares if they meet director stock ownership
guidelines. The shares will be automatically deferred for those directors who do not meet the director stock ownership guidelines.
At March 31, 2020, approximately 72,000 RSUs for the Company’s directors are vested.
PSUs are conditional upon the attainment of market and performance objectives over a specified period. The number of vested
PSUs is assessed at the end of a three-year performance period upon attainment of meeting certain earnings per share targets,
average return on invested capital and for certain participants, total shareholder return relative to a peer group of companies and for
special PSUs granted in 2019 meeting certain cumulative operating profit metrics. The Company uses the Monte Carlo simulation
model to measure the fair value of the total shareholder return portion of the PSUs. The earnings per share portion of the PSUs is
measured at the grant date market price. PSUs have a requisite service period of generally three years. Expense is attributed to the
requisite service period on a straight-line basis based on the fair value of the PSUs, adjusted for the performance modifier at the end
of each reporting period. For PSUs that are designated as equity awards, the fair value is measured at the grant date. For PSUs that
are eligible for cash settlement and designated as liability awards, the Company re-measures the fair value at the end of each
reporting period and adjusts a corresponding liability in its consolidated balance sheets for changes in fair value.
79
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
PeRSUs are awards for which the number of RSUs awarded is conditional upon the attainment of one or more performance
objectives over a specified period. The Company did not grant any PeRSUs during the year ended March 31, 2020. The
Compensation Committee approves the target number of PeRSUs representing the base number of RSUs that could be awarded if
performance goals are attained. PeRSUs are accounted for as variable awards until the performance goals are reached at which time
the grant date is established. Total compensation expense for PeRSUs is determined by the product of the number of shares eligible
to be awarded and expected to vest, and the market price of the Company’s common stock, at the inception of the requisite service
period. During the performance period, the compensation expense for PeRSUs is re-computed using the market price and the
performance modifier at the end of a reporting period. At the end of the performance period, if the goals are attained, the awards are
granted and classified as RSUs and accounted for on that basis. The Company recognizes compensation expense for these awards
on a straight-line basis over the requisite aggregate service period of generally four years.
The weighted-average assumptions used in the Monte Carlo valuations are as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
 2020  2019 2018
Expected stock price volatility 30% 31% 29%
Expected dividend yield 1.3% 0.9% 0.8%
Risk-free interest rate 2.2% 2.6% 1.5%
Expected life (in years) 3 3 3
The following table summarizes activity for restricted stock unit awards (RSUs, PSUs and PeRSUs) during 2020:
(In millions, except per shar e data) Shares  Weighted-
Average
Grant Date Fair
Value Per Share
Nonvested, March 31, 2019 2  $ 142.77
Granted 1  129.90
Cancelled —  134.28
Vested —  158.08
Nonvested, March 31, 2020 3  $ 135.57
The following table provides data related to restricted stock unit award activity:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019 2018
Total fair value of shares vested $ 67 $ 59 $ 156
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to
nonvested restricted stock unit awards not yet recognized, pre-tax$ 155 $ 119 $ 97
Weighted-average period in years over which restricted stock unit
award cost is expected to be recognized 3 2 2
80
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Stock Options
Stock options are granted with an exercise price at no less than the fair market value and those options granted under the stock
plans generally have a contractual term of seven years and follow a four-year vesting schedule.
Compensation expense for stock options is recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period and is based on
the grant-date fair value for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest. The Company uses the Black-Scholes
options-pricing model to estimate the fair value of its stock options. Once the fair value of an employee stock option is determined,
current accounting practices do not permit it to be changed, even if the estimates used are different from actual.
Weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the fair value of employee stock options were as follow: (1) 
  Years Ended March 31,
  2019  2018
Expected stock price volatility (2) 26% 25%
Expected dividend yield (3) 0.9% 0.8%
Risk-free interest rate (4) 2.8% 1.7%
Expected life (in years) (5) 4.6 4.5
(1) The Company did not grant any stock options during the year ended March 31, 2020 .
(2) The computat ion of expected volatility was based on a combination of the historical volatility of the Company’ s common stock and implied
market volati lity. The Company believes this market-based input provides a reasonable estimate of its future stock price movements and is
consistent with employee stock option valuation considerations.
(3) Expected dividend yield is based on historical experience and investors’  current expectations.
(4) The risk-free interest rate for periods within the expected life of the option is based on the constant maturity U.S. Treasury rate in effect at the
grant date.
(5) The expected life of the options is based primarily on historical employee stock option exercises and other behavioral data and reflects the
impact of changes in the contractual life of current option grants compared to the Company’ s historical grants.
The following is a summary of stock options outstanding at March 31, 2020:
  Options Outstanding Options Exercisable
Range of Exercise
Prices  Number of
Options
Outstanding
at Year End
(In millions)Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Life (Years)Weighted-
Average
Exercise PriceNumber of
Options
Exercisable at
Year End
(In millions)Weighted-
Average
Exercise Price
$118.41–$178.13 1 4 $ 148.36 — $ 148.62
178.14–237.86 1 2 198.25 1 199.88
   2   1  
81
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes stock option activity during 2020:
(In millions, except per shar e data) SharesWeighted-
Average
Exercise
PriceWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term (Years) Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value (2)
Outstanding, March 31, 2019 3 $ 166.72 3  $ 4
Granted — —    
Cancelled — 171.39    
Exercised (1) 113.34    
Outstanding, March 31, 2020 2 $ 180.48 3  $ 1
Vested and expected to vest (1)2 $ 180.52 3  $ 1
Vested and exercisable, March 31, 2020 2 189.28 2  1
(1) The number of options expected to vest takes into account an estimate of expected forfeitures.
(2) The intrinsic value is calculated as the difference between the period-end market price of the Company’ s common stock and the exercise
price of “in-the-money” options.
The following table provides data related to stock option activity:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data) 2020 2019  2018
Weighted-average grant date fair value per stock option $ — $ 34.98 $ 34.24
Aggregate intrinsic value on exercise $ 17 $ 16 $ 60
Cash received upon exercise $ 66 $ 29 $ 77
Tax benefits realized related to exercise $ 4 $ 4 $ 22
Total fair value of stock options vested $ 16 $ 16 $ 20
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to unvested stock
options not yet recognized, pre-tax $ 6 $ 15 $ 15
Weighted-average period in years over which stock option compensation cost
is expected to be recognized 2 2 2
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
The Company has an ESPP under which 21 million shares have been authorized for issuance. The ESPP allows eligible
employees to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock through payroll deductions. The deductions occur over three-month
purchase periods and the shares are then purchased at 85% of the market price at the end of each purchase period. Employees are
allowed to terminate their participation in the ESPP at any time during the purchase period prior to the purchase of the shares. The
15% discount provided to employees on these shares is included in compensation expense. The shares related to funds outstanding
at the end of a quarter are included in the calculation of diluted weighted average shares outstanding. These amounts have not been
significant for all the years presented. The Company recognizes costs for employer matching contributions as ESPP expense over
the relevant purchase period. Shares issued under the ESPP were not material in 2020, 2019, and 2018. At March 31, 2020, 3
million shares remain available for issuance.
82
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
7.Other Income, Net
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019  2018
Interest income $ 49 $ 39 $ 48
Equity in earnings, net (1)36 43 32
Gain from sale of equity investment (2)— 56 43
Actuarial losses from pension plans (3)(127) — —
Other, net 54 44 7
Total $ 12 $ 182 $ 130
(1) Primarily recorded within the Company’ s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
(2) Amount represented a pre-tax gain from the sale of an equity investment to a third party included in Other during 2019 and in our
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment during 2018.
(3) Includes $116 million from the termination of the U.S. defined benefit pension plan and $11 million related to a settlement from the
executive benefit retirement plan for a recently retired executive. Refer to Financial Note 17 , “Pension Benefits .”
8.Income Taxes
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019  2018
Income from continuing operations before income taxes     
U.S. $ 216 $ 1,512 $ 1,175
Foreign 928 (902) (936)
Total income from continuing operations before income taxes $ 1,144 $ 610 $ 239
Income tax expense (benefit) related to continuing operations consists of the following:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019  2018
Current   
Federal $ 170 $ (20) $ 577
State 48 35 33
Foreign 142 152 205
Total current 360 167 815
   
Deferred   
Federal (204) 223 (767)
State (105) 44 17
Foreign (33) (78) (118)
Total deferred (342) 189 (868)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 18 $ 356 $ (53)
The Company recorded income tax expense of $18 million and $356 million in 2020 and 2019, and income tax benefit of $53
million related to continuing operations in 2018.
The Company’s reported income tax expense rates were 1.6% and 58.4% in 2020 and 2019 and an income tax benefit rate of
22.2% in 2018. Fluctuations in the Company’s reported income tax rates are primarily due to the impact of the Change Healthcare
joint venture divestiture in 2020, the 2017 Tax Act in 2018, the impact of nondeductible impairment charges, and varying
proportions of income attributable to foreign countries that have income tax rates different from the U.S. rate.
83
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate
of 21% for 2020 and 2019 and 31.6% for 2018 to income before income taxes is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019  2018
Income tax expense at federal statutory rate $ 240 $ 128 $ 75
State income taxes, net of federal tax benefit (41) 70 50
Tax effect of foreign operations (81) (86) (146)
Unrecognized tax benefits and settlements (7) 20 454
Non-deductible goodwill 7 357 585
Share-based compensation 2 4 (8)
Net tax benefit on intellectual property transfer — (42) (178)
Tax-free gain on investment exit (1)(87) — —
Impact of change in U.S. tax rate on temporary differences — (81) (1,324)
Transition tax on foreign earnings — (5) 457
Capital loss carryback (19) — —
Other, net (2) 4 (9) (18)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 18 $ 356 $ (53)
(1) Refer to Financial Note 2, “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture ,” for additio nal informati on regarding the separatio n of the
Change Healthcare JV .
(2) The Company’ s effective tax rates were impacted by other favorable U.S. federal permanent differences including research and development
credits of $7 million , $7 million  and $11 million  in 2020 , 2019  and 2018 .
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed the previously announced separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV
as described in Financial Note 2, “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture.” The Company’s reported income tax expense
rate for 2020 was favorably impacted by this transaction given that it was intended to generally be a tax-free split-off for U.S.
federal income tax purposes. In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Company recognized an estimated gain for financial reporting
purposes of $414 million (pre-tax and after-tax) related to the separation transaction.
The Company’s reported income tax expense rate for 2020 was unfavorably impacted by non-cash pre-tax charges of $275
million (pre-tax and after-tax) to remeasure the carrying value of assets and liabilities held for sale related to the expected formation
of a new German wholesale joint venture within the Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. Refer to Financial
Note 3, “Held for Sale,” for more information.
The Company’s reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was unfavorably impacted by non-cash pre-tax charges of $1.8
billion (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill for its European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, given
that these charges are generally not deductible for tax purposes. Its reported income tax benefit rate for 2018 was unfavorably
impacted by non-cash charges of $1.7 billion (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill, given that generally
no tax benefit was recognized for these charges. Refer to Financial Note 14, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” for more
information.
During 2019, the Company sold software between wholly-owned legal entities within the McKesson group that are based in
different tax jurisdictions. The transferor entity recognized a gain on the sale of assets that was not subject to income tax in its local
jurisdiction; such gain was eliminated upon consolidation. An entity based in the U.S. was the acquirer of the software and is
entitled to amortize the purchase price of the assets for tax purposes. In accordance with the adopted amended accounting guidance
on income taxes, a discrete tax benefit of $42 million was recognized in the second quarter of 2019 with a corresponding increase
to a deferred tax asset for the future tax amortization.
84
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On December 19, 2016, the Company sold various software relating to its technology businesses between wholly owned legal
entities within the McKesson group that are based in different tax jurisdictions. The transferor entity recognized a gain on the sale
of assets that was not subject to income tax in its local jurisdiction; such gain was eliminated upon consolidation. A McKesson
entity based in the U.S. was the recipient of the software and is entitled to amortize the fair value of the assets for book and tax
purposes. The tax benefit associated with the amortization of these assets is recognized over the tax lives of the assets. As a result,
the Company recognized a net tax benefit of $178 million in 2018. The Company no longer recognized the tax benefit associated
with this amortization in continuing operations upon adoption of the amended guidance related to intra-entity transfer of an asset
other than inventory in 2020 or 2019.
Deferred tax balances consisted of the following:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019
Assets    
Receivable allowances $ 72 $ 70
Compensation and benefit related accruals 331 377
Net operating loss and credit carryforwards 828 885
Lease obligations 482 —
Other 109 216
Subtotal 1,822 1,548
Less: valuation allowance (833) (870)
Total assets 989 678
Liabilities    
Inventory valuation and other assets (1,947) (2,016)
Fixed assets and systems development costs (202) (170)
Intangibles (531) (513)
Change Healthcare equity investment — (885)
Lease right-of-use assets (449) —
Other (56) (34)
Total liabilities (3,185) (3,618)
Net deferred tax liability $ (2,196) $ (2,940)
    
Long-term deferred tax asset $ 59 $ 58
Long-term deferred tax liability (2,255) (2,998)
Net deferred tax liability $ (2,196) $ (2,940)
The Company assesses the available positive and negative evidence to determine whether deferred tax assets are more likely
than not to be realized. As a result of this assessment, valuation allowances have been recorded on certain deferred tax assets in
various tax jurisdictions. The valuation allowances were approximately $833 million and $870 million in 2020 and 2019 and
primarily relate to net operating and capital losses incurred in certain tax jurisdictions for which no tax benefit was recognized. The
decrease in the valuation allowance of $37 million included $30 million of expense related to foreign losses incurred in 2020, for
which no benefit was recognized, offset by the remeasurement of foreign loss carryforwards and their related valuation allowance
of $67 million.
The Company has federal, state and foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $75 million, $3.3 billion and $1.9 billion at
March 31, 2020. Federal and state net operating losses will expire at various dates from 2021 through 2041. Substantially all its
foreign net operating losses have indefinite lives. In addition, the Company has foreign capital loss carryforwards of $739 million
with indefinite lives.
85
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the activity related to the Company’s gross unrecognized tax benefits for the last three years:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019  2018
Unrecognized tax benefits at beginning of period $ 1,052 $ 1,183 $ 486
Additions based on tax positions related to prior years 20 78 47
Reductions based on tax positions related to prior years (168) (234) (124)
Additions based on tax positions related to current year 82 68 778
Reductions based on settlements (8) (13) (7)
Reductions based on the lapse of the applicable statutes of limitations (13) (25) —
Exchange rate fluctuations (7) (5) 3
Unrecognized tax benefits at end of period $ 958 $ 1,052 $ 1,183
As of March 31, 2020, the Company had $958 million of unrecognized tax benefits, of which $763 million would reduce
income tax expense and the effective tax rate, if recognized. The decrease in unrecognized tax benefits in 2020 compared to 2019 is
primarily attributable to the favorable resolution of an outstanding California tax refund claim which decreased unrecognized tax
benefits by $91 million. The decrease in unrecognized tax benefits in 2019 compared to 2018 is primarily attributable to a
$171 million decrease, with a corresponding increase in taxes payable, due to the issuance of new tax regulations. During the next
twelve months, the Company does not expect any material reduction in its unrecognized tax benefits. However, this may change as
it continues to have ongoing negotiations with various taxing authorities throughout the year.
The Company reports interest and penalties on income taxes as income tax expense. It recognized income tax expense of $23
million and $33 million in 2020 and 2019 and an income tax benefit of $1 million in 2018, representing interest and penalties, in its
consolidated statements of operations. As of March 31, 2020 and 2019, it accrued $91 million and $68 million cumulatively in
interest and penalties on unrecognized tax benefits.
The Company files income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, various U.S. state jurisdictions and various foreign
jurisdictions. During the three months ended March 31, 2020, the Company signed the Revenue Agent’s Report from the U.S.
Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) relating to their audit of the fiscal years 2013 through 2015. During the third quarter of 2018, the
Company signed the Revenue Agent’s Report from the U.S. IRS relating to their audit of the fiscal years 2010 through 2012. The
Company is generally subject to audit by taxing authorities in various U.S. states and in foreign jurisdictions for fiscal years 2013
through the current fiscal year.
Undistributed earnings of the Company’s foreign operations of approximately $5 billion were considered indefinitely
reinvested. Following enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the repatriation of cash to the United States is generally no longer taxable for
federal income tax purposes. However, the repatriation of cash held outside the United States could be subject to applicable foreign
withholding taxes and state income taxes. The Company may remit foreign earnings to the United States to the extent it is tax
efficient to do so. It does not expect the tax impact from remitting these earnings to be material.
9.    Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
The Company’s redeemable noncontrolling interests primarily relate to its consolidated subsidiary, McKesson Europe. Under
the December 2014 domination and profit and loss transfer agreement (the “Domination Agreement”), the noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe are entitled to receive an annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per share. As a result,
during 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Company recorded a total attribution of net income to the noncontrolling shareholders of
McKesson Europe of $42 million, $45 million and $43 million. All amounts were recorded in net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations and the corresponding liability balance was
recorded in other accrued liabilities in the Company’s consolidated balance sheets.
86
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Under the Domination Agreement, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe have a right to put (“Put Right”) their
noncontrolling shares at €22.99 per share, increased annually for interest in the amount of five percentage points above a base rate
published by the German Bundesbank semi-annually, less any compensation amount or guaranteed dividend already paid by
McKesson with respect to the relevant time period (“Put Amount”). The exercise of the Put Right will reduce the balance of
redeemable noncontrolling interests. During 2020 and 2019, there were no material exercises of the Put Right. During 2018, the
Company paid $50 million to purchase 1.9 million shares of McKesson Europe through the exercises of the Put Right by the
noncontrolling shareholders, which decreased the carrying value of redeemable noncontrolling interests by $53 million. The
balance of redeemable noncontrolling interests is reported as the greater of its carrying value or its maximum redemption value at
each reporting date. The redemption value is the Put Amount adjusted for exchange rate fluctuations each period. At March 31,
2020 and 2019, the carrying value of redeemable noncontrolling interests of $1.40 billion and $1.39 billion exceeded the maximum
redemption value of $1.22 billion and $1.23 billion. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company owned approximately 77% of
McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares. In April 2020, the Company paid $46 million to purchase 1.8 million shares of
McKesson Europe through the exercises of the Put Right by the noncontrolling shareholders, which increased the Company’s
ownership of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares to 78%.
Appraisal Proceedings
Subsequent to the Domination Agreement’s registration, certain noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe initiated
appraisal proceedings (“Appraisal Proceedings”) with the Stuttgart Regional Court (the “Court”) to challenge the adequacy of the
Put Amount, annual recurring compensation amount, and/or the guaranteed dividend. During the pendency of the Appraisal
Proceedings, such amount will be paid as specified currently in the Domination Agreement. On September 19, 2018, the Court
ruled that the Put Amount shall be increased by €0.51 resulting in an adjusted Put Amount of €23.50. The annual recurring
compensation amount and/or the guaranteed dividend remain unadjusted. Noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe
appealed this decision. McKesson Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA also appealed the decision. If upon final resolution of the
appeal an upwards adjustment is ordered, the Company would be required to make certain additional payments for any shortfall to
all McKesson Europe noncontrolling shareholders who previously received amounts under the Domination Agreement.
Noncontrolling Interests
Noncontrolling interests represent third-party equity interests in the Company’s consolidated entities primarily related to
ClarusONE and Vantage, which were $217 million and $193 million at March 31, 2020 and 2019 in the Company’s consolidated
balance sheets. During 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Company allocated a total of $178 million, $176 million and $187 million of net
income to noncontrolling interests.
Changes in redeemable noncontrolling interests and noncontrolling interests for the years ended March 31, 2020 and 2019
were as follows:
(In millions)Noncontrolling
Interests  Redeemable
Noncontrolling
Interests
Balance, March 31, 2018 $ 253 $ 1,459
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 176 45
Other comprehensive loss —  (66)
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities —  (45)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (184) —
Other (52) —
Balance, March 31, 2019 193 1,393
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 178 42
Other comprehensive income —  3
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities —  (42)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (154) —
Other —  6
Balance, March 31, 2020 $ 217 $ 1,402
87
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
There were no material changes in the Company’s ownership interests related to redeemable noncontrolling interests during
2020 and 2019. The effect of changes in its ownership interests related to redeemable noncontrolling interests on its equity of $3
million resulting from exercises of Put Right was recorded as a net increase to McKesson’s stockholders’ paid-in capital during
2018. Net income attributable to McKesson was $900 million, $34 million and $70 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
10.Earnings per Common Share
Basic earnings per common share are computed by dividing net income by the weighted average number of common shares
outstanding during the reporting period. Diluted earnings per common share are computed similar to basic earnings per common
share except that the former reflects the potential dilution that could occur if dilutive securities or other obligations to issue
common stock were exercised or converted into common stock.
The computations for basic and diluted earnings per common share are as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e amounts) 2020  2019 2018
Income from continuing operations $ 1,126 $ 254 $ 292
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (220) (221) (230)
Income from continuing operations attributable to McKesson 906 33 62
Income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax (6) 1 5
Net income attributable to McKesson $ 900 $ 34 $ 67
  
Weighted average common shares outstanding:   
Basic 181 196 208
Effect of dilutive securities:   
Restricted stock units 1 1 1
Diluted 182 197 209
  
Earnings (loss) per common share attributable to McKesson: (1)  
Diluted   
Continuing operations $ 4.99 $ 0.17 $ 0.30
Discontinued operations (0.04) — 0.02
Total $ 4.95 $ 0.17 $ 0.32
Basic   
Continuing operations $ 5.01 $ 0.17 $ 0.30
Discontinued operations (0.03) — 0.02
Total $ 4.98 $ 0.17 $ 0.32
(1) Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
Potentially dilutive securities include outstanding stock options, restricted stock units and performance-based and other
restricted stock units. Approximately 2 million, 3 million and 2 million potentially dilutive securities for 2020, 2019 and 2018 were
excluded from the computations of diluted net earnings per common share, as they were anti-dilutive.
88
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
11.    Receivables, Net
 March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019
Customer accounts $ 17,201 $ 14,941
Other 3,014 3,584
Total 20,215 18,525
Allowances (265) (279)
Net $ 19,950 $ 18,246
Other receivables primarily include amounts due from suppliers. The allowances are primarily for estimated uncollectible
accounts.
12.    Property, Plant and Equipment, Net
 March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019
Land $ 151 $ 172
Building, machinery, equipment and other 4,043 4,154
Total property, plant and equipment 4,194 4,326
Accumulated depreciation (1,829) (1,778)
Property, plant and equipment, net $ 2,365 $ 2,548
13.Leases
Lessee
The Company leases facilities and equipment primarily under operating leases. The Company recognizes lease expense on a
straight-line basis over the term of the lease, taking into account, when applicable, lessor incentives for tenant improvements,
periods where no rent payment is required and escalations in rent payments over the term of the lease. Remaining terms for facility
leases generally range from one to fifteen years, while remaining terms for equipment leases generally range from one to five years.
Most real property leases contain renewal options (typically for five-year increments). Generally, the renewal option periods are not
included within the lease term as the Company is not reasonably certain to exercise that right at lease commencement. The
Company’s lease agreements do not contain any material residual value guarantees or material restrictive covenants.
ROU assets and operating lease liabilities are recognized at the lease commencement date. ROU assets represent the
Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and operating lease liabilities represent its obligation to make lease
payments arising from the lease. Operating lease liabilities are recognized based on the present value of the future lease payments
over the lease term, discounted at the Company’s incremental borrowing rate as the implicit rate in the lease is not readily
determinable for most of the Company’s leases. The Company estimates the discount rate as its incremental borrowing rate based
on qualitative factors including Company specific credit rating, lease term, general economics and the interest rate environment.
For existing leases that commenced prior to the adoption of the amended leasing guidance, the Company determined the discount
rate on April 1, 2019 using the full lease term. Operating lease liabilities are recorded under the captions “Current portion of
operating lease liabilities” and “Long-Term Operating Lease Liabilities,” and the corresponding lease assets are recorded under the
caption “Operating Lease Right-of-Use Assets” in the Company’s consolidated balance sheet. Finance lease assets are included in
property, plant and equipment, net and finance lease liabilities are included in the Current portion of long-term debt and Long-Term
Debt in the Company’s consolidated balance sheet.
89
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Supplemental balance sheet information related to leases was as follows:
(In millions, except lease term and discount rate) March 31, 2020
Operating leases
Operating Lease Right-of-Use Assets $ 1,886
Current portion of operating lease liabilities $ 354
Long-Term Operating Lease Liabilities 1,660
        Total operating lease liabilities $ 2,014
Finance Leases
Property, Plant and Equipment, net $ 180
Current portion of long-term debt $ 15
Long-Term Debt 151
         Total finance lease liabilities $ 166
Weighted Average Remaining Lease Term (Years)
         Operating leases 7.7
         Finance leases 12.1
Weighted Average Discount Rate
         Operating leases 3.03%
         Finance leases 2.86%
The components of lease cost were as follows:
(In millions)Year Ended
March 31, 2020
Short-term lease cost $ 29
Operating lease cost 459
 
Finance lease cost:  
     Amortization of right-of-use assets 14
     Interest on lease liabilities 5
Total finance lease cost 19
 
Variable lease cost (1)125
Sublease income (33)
Total lease cost (2)$ 599
(1) These amounts include payments for maintenance, taxes, payments affected by the consumer price index and other similar metrics and
payments contingent on usage.
(2) These amounts were primarily recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statement of operations.
Rent expense under operating leases was $576 million and $568 million in 2019 and 2018.
90
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Supplemental cash flow information related to leases was as follows:
(In millions)Year Ended
March 31, 2020
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ (377)
Operating cash flows from finance leases (3)
Financing cash flows from finance leases (18)
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations:
Operating leases (1)$ 2,378
Finance leases 166
(1) These amounts include  the transition adjustment for the adoption of the amended leasing guidance discussed in Financial Note 1, “Significant
Accounting Policies .”
Maturities of lease liabilities as of March 31, 2020 were as follows:
(In millions)Operating
Leases  Finance Leases Total
2021 $ 398 $ 19 $ 417
2022 371 19 390
2023 310 18 328
2024 252 17 269
2025 213 16 229
Thereafter 730 110 840
Total lease payments (1)2,274 199 2,473
Less imputed interest (260) (33) (293)
      Present value of lease liabilities $ 2,014 $ 166 $ 2,180
(1) Total lease payments have not been reduced by minimum sublease income of $178 million  due under future noncancelable subleases.
As of March 31, 2020, the Company entered into additional leases primarily for facilities that have not yet commenced with
future lease payments of $149 million that are not reflected in the table above. These operating leases will commence between 2021
and 2024 with noncancelable lease terms of 2 to 15 years.
As previously disclosed in the Company’s 2019 Annual Report and under the previous lease accounting, the minimum lease
payments required under operating leases were as follows as of March 31, 2019:
(In millions)Noncancelable
Operating
Leases
2020 $ 454
2021 397
2022 343
2023 290
2024 236
Thereafter 936
Total minimum lease payments (1) (2)$ 2,656
(1) Amount includes future minimum lease payments for the sale-leaseback transaction of $49 million .
(2) Total minimum lease payments have not been reduced by minimum sublease income of $133 million due under future noncan celable
subleases.
91
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Lessor
The Company primarily leases certain owned equipment, that are classified as direct financing or sales-type leases, to
physician practices. As of March 31, 2020, the total lease receivable was $272 million with a weighted average remaining lease
term of approximately seven years. Interest income from these leases was not material for the year ended March 31, 2020.
14.    Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net
Goodwill
Changes in the carrying amount of goodwill were as follows:
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
Solutions  European
Pharmaceutical
Solutions  Medical-
Surgical
Solutions Other  Total
Balance, March 31, 2018 $ 4,110 $ 1,850 $ 2,070$ 2,894 $ 10,924
Goodwill acquired 17 52 360 13 442
Acquisition accounting, transfers
and other adjustments 13 (5) 21 6 35
Impairment charges —  (1,776) — (21) (1,797)
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net (62) (121) — (63) (246)
Balance, March 31, 2019 4,078 —  2,451 2,829 9,358
Goodwill acquired —  62 — 14 76
Acquisition accounting, transfers
and other adjustments 1 4 7 — 12
Other changes/disposals (1) —  (5) — (6)
Impairment charges —  —  — (2) (2)
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net (11) (3) — (64) (78)
Balance, March 31, 2020 $ 4,067 $ 63 $ 2,453$ 2,777 $ 9,360
Goodwill Impairment Charges
The Company evaluates goodwill for impairment on an annual basis each year and at an interim date, if indicators of potential
impairment exist. On October 1, 2019, the Company voluntarily changed its annual goodwill impairment testing date from
January 1 to October 1 to better align with the timing of the Company’s annual long-term planning process. Accordingly,
management determined that the change in accounting principle is preferable under the circumstance. This change has been applied
prospectively from October 1, 2019 as retrospective application is deemed impracticable due to the inability to objectively
determine the assumptions and significant estimates used in earlier periods without the benefit of hindsight. This change was not
material to the Company’s consolidated financial statements as it did not delay, accelerate, or avoid any potential goodwill
impairment charge.
Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating segment or one
level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial information is available and segment
management regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
92
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The fair value of the reporting unit was determined using a combination of an income approach based on a DCF model and a
market approach based on appropriate valuation multiples observed for the reporting unit’s guideline public companies. Fair value
estimates result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on estimates and
assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management as of the measurement date. Any material changes in key
assumptions, including failure to improve operations of certain retail pharmacy stores, additional government reimbursement
reductions, deterioration in the financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by
market participants within the industry, or other unanticipated events and circumstances, may affect such estimates. The discount
rates are the weighted average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing weighted by the
percentage of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital. The unsystematic risk premium is an input factor used in
calculating discount rate that specifically addresses uncertainty related to the reporting unit’s future cash flow projections. Fair
value assessments of the reporting unit are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs
developed using company specific information.
Goodwill charges listed below were recorded under the caption, “Goodwill impairment charges” in operating expenses in the
consolidated statements of operations. Most of the goodwill impairment for these reporting units were generally not deductible for
income tax purposes.
Fiscal 2020
The impairment testing performed in 2020 did not indicate any material impairment of goodwill.
Fiscal 2019
(In millions, except rates)       
Quarter
Ended Reporting Unit Segment Discount Rate Terminal
Growth Rate Goodwill
Impairment(1) 
June 2018 PD  European Pharmaceutical Solutions 8.0% 1.25% $ 238(2) 
June 2018 RP  European Pharmaceutical Solutions 8.5% 1.25% 251(3) 
June 2018 PD  European Pharmaceutical Solutions 8.0% 1.25% 81(3) 
March 2019 RP  European Pharmaceutical Solutions 10.0% 1.25% 465(4) 
March 2019 PD  European Pharmaceutical Solutions 9.0% 1.25% 741(4) 
   Total    $ 1,776 
(1)Represents pre-tax and after-tax amounts, except for an aggregate $20 million of tax charges related to the March 2019 Retail Pharmacy
impairment. Total goodwill impairment for 2019 also includes $21 million  related to the Company’ s Rexall Health business within Other
recorded in the third quarter of 2019.
(2)Prior to implementing its new segment reporting structure in the first quarter of 2019, the Company’ s European operations were considered a
single reporting unit. Follo wing the change in reportable segments, its European Pharmaceutical Soluti ons segment was divided into two
distinct reporting units, Retail Pharmacy (“RP”), form erly Consumer Solutions, and Pharmaceutical Distribution (“PD”), formerly Pharmacy
Solutions, for the purposes of goodwill impairment testing. This change required performance of a goodwill impairment test for these two new
reporting units which resulted in a goodwill impairment char ge as PD’ s estimated fair value was lower than its reassigned carrying value.
(3)Both RP and PD projected  a decline in the estimated future cash flows primarily triggered by additional U.K. government actions which were
announced on June 29, 2018. An interim goodwill impairment test for these reporting units identified that their carrying values exceeded their
estimated fair value and resulted in an impairment char ge.
(4)As a result of the annual goodwill impairment test, the carrying values of the PD and RP reporting units exceeded their estimated fair value
which require d the Company to record impairment charges for the reporting units. These additional impairments were primarily due to
declines in the reporting units’  estimated future cash flows and the selection of higher discount rates. The declines in estimated future cash
flows were primarily attributed to additional government reimbursement reductions and competitive pressures within the U.K. The risk of
successfully achieving certain business initiatives was the primary factor in the use of a higher discount rate. As of March 31, 2019 the entire
remaining goodwill balances of both reporting units were impaired.
93
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fiscal 2018
(In millions, except rates)       
Quarter
Ended  Reporting Unit Segment (3)Discount Rate Terminal
Growth Rate Goodwill
Impairment(1) 
September
2017  McKesson Europe (2) European Pharmaceutical
Solutions 7.5% 1.25% $ 350(4) 
March 2018 McKesson Europe European Pharmaceutical
Solutions 8.0% 1.25% 933(5) 
March 2018 Rexall  Other 10.0% 2.00% 455(6) 
   Total    $ 1,738 
(1)Represents pre-tax and after -tax amounts.
(2)This reporting unit was divided into two reporting units in the first quarter of 2019 upon a change in segment reporting structure. See above
for more information.
(3)The impairment charges recorded in 2018 were attributable to the former McKesson Distribution Solutions segment. The segment reporting
structure which included McKesson Distribution Solutions was reorganized in the first quarter of 2019.  The segments presented above for
2018 reflect the revised segment reporting structure.
(4)The reporting  unit projected a decline in its estimated future cash flows primarily triggered by government reimbursement reductions in its
retail business in the U.K. Accordingly , the Company performed an interim one-step goodwill impairmen t test prior to its annual impairment
test. As a result, the Com pany determined that the carrying value of this reporting unit exceeded its estimated fair value and recorded a
goodwill impairment char ge.
(5)As a result of the Compan y’s annual impairment test, it was determined that the carrying value of the reporting unit further exceeded its
estimated fair value and recorded a goodwill impairment charge. This reporting unit had a further decline in its estimated future cash flows
driven by weakening script growth outlook in the Company’ s U.K. business and by a more competitive environment in France.
(6)As a result of the Company ’s annual impairment test, it was determined that the carrying value of the reporting unit exceeded its estimated fair
value and recorded a goodwill impairment charge. The impairment was the result of a decline in estimated future cash flows primarily driven
by significant  generics reimbursement reductions across Canada and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces which could only be
partially mitigated through the business’  cost saving efforts. As of March 31, 2018, the entire remaini ng goodwill balance related to the
Company’ s acquisition of Rexall Health was impaired.
Refer to Financial Note 19, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on these nonrecurring fair value measurements.
As of March 31, 2020, accumulated goodwill impairment losses were $3.1 billion in the Company’s European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment and $478 million in Other. As of March 31, 2019, accumulated goodwill impairment losses were $3.1 billion in
the Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and $476 million in Other.
Intangible Assets
Information regarding intangible assets is as follows:
March 31, 2020 March 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions)Weighted
Average
Remaining
Amortization
Period
(Years) Gross
Carrying
Amount Accumulated
Amortization Net
Carrying
AmountGross
Carrying
Amount Accumulated
AmortizationNet
Carrying
Amount
Customer relationships 11  $ 3,650 $ (1,950) $ 1,700 $ 3,818 $ (1,801)$ 2,017
Service agreements 10  994 (480) 514 1,017 (430) 587
Pharmacy licenses 26  492 (232) 260 513 (209) 304
Trademarks and trade names 13  808 (242) 566 887 (232) 655
Technology 3  175 (111) 64 141 (94) 47
Other 5  273 (221) 52 288 (209) 79
Total   $ 6,392 $ (3,236) $ 3,156 $ 6,664 $ (2,975)$ 3,689
94
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Amortization expense of intangible assets was $462 million, $485 million and $503 million for 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Estimated annual amortization expense of intangible assets is as follows: $451 million, $351 million, $251 million, $236 million
and $233 million for 2021 through 2025, and $1.6 billion thereafter. All intangible assets were subject to amortization as of
March 31, 2020 and 2019.
Refer to Financial Note 4, “Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges,” for more information on intangible asset
impairment charges recorded in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
15.Debt and Financing Activities
Long-term debt consisted of the following:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
U.S. Dollar notes (1) (2) 
3.65% Notes due November 30, 2020 $ 700 $ 700
4.75% Notes due March 1, 2021 323 323
2.70% Notes due December 15, 2022 400 400
2.85% Notes due March 15, 2023 400 400
3.80% Notes due March 15, 2024 1,100 1,100
7.65% Debentures due March 1, 2027 167 167
3.95% Notes due February 16, 2028 600 600
4.75% Notes due May 30, 2029 400 400
6.00% Notes due March 1, 2041 282 282
4.88% Notes due March 15, 2044 411 411
Foreign currency notes (1) (3) 
Floating Rate Euro Notes due February 12, 2020 (4)— 280
0.63% Euro Notes due August 17, 2021 662 673
1.50% Euro Notes due November 17, 2025 659 670
1.63% Euro Notes due October 30, 2026 552 560
3.13% Sterling Notes due February 17, 2029 557 586
  
Lease and other obligations 174 43
Total debt 7,387 7,595
Less: Current portion 1,052 330
Total long-term debt $ 6,335 $ 7,265
(1) These notes are unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company .
(2) Interest on these notes is payable semi-annually .
(3) Interest on these foreign currency notes is payable annually , except the 2020 Floating Rate Euro Notes.
(4) Interest on these notes is payable quarterly .
Long-Term Debt
The Company’s long-term debt includes both U.S. dollar and foreign currency-denominated borrowings. At March 31, 2020
and March 31, 2019, $7.4 billion and $7.6 billion of total debt was outstanding, of which $1.1 billion and $330 million was
included under the caption “Current portion of long-term debt” in the Company’s consolidated balance sheets.
95
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Debt Offerings
On November 30, 2018, the Company completed a public offering of 3.65% Notes due November 30, 2020 (the “2020 Notes”)
in a principal amount of $700 million and 4.75% Notes due May 30, 2029 (the “2029 Notes”) in a principal amount of $400
million. Interest on the 2020 Notes and 2029 Notes is payable semi-annually on May 30th and November 30th of each year,
commencing on May 30, 2019. The Company utilized the net proceeds from these notes of $1.1 billion, net of discounts and
offering expenses, for general corporate purposes.
Tender Offers and Early Repayments
In 2018, the Company paid $1.4 billion to redeem the $1.2 billion principal amount of its outstanding (i) 7.50% Notes due
2019, (ii) 4.75% Notes due 2021, (iii) 7.65% Debentures due 2027, (iv) 6.00% Notes due 2041 and (v) 4.88% Notes due 2044
(collectively referred to herein as the “Tender Offer Notes”), premiums of $112 million and $22 million of interest. The Company
recorded a pre-tax loss on debt extinguishment of $122 million ($78 million after-tax) in connection with the redemption of the
Tender Offer Notes.
Repayments at Maturity
In 2020, the Company repaid at maturity its €250 million Floating Rate Euro Notes due February 12, 2020. In 2019, the
Company repaid at maturity its $1.1 billion 2.28% notes due March 15, 2019. In 2018, the Company repaid at maturity its €500
million 4.50% Euro-denominated bonds due April 26, 2017 and its $500 million 1.40% notes due March 15, 2018.
Each note, which constitutes a “Series”, is an unsecured and unsubordinated obligation of the Company and ranks equally with
all of the Company’s existing and, from time-to-time, future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness outstanding. Each Series
is governed by materially similar indentures and officers’ certificates. Upon required notice to holders of notes with fixed interest
rates, the Company may redeem those notes at any time prior to maturity, in whole or in part, for cash at redemption prices. In the
event of the occurrence of both (1) a change of control of the Company and (2) a downgrade of a Series below an investment grade
rating by each of Fitch Inc., Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. and Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services within a specified period, an
offer must be made to purchase that Series from the holders at a price equal to 101% of the then outstanding principal amount of
that Series, plus accrued and unpaid interest to, but not including, the date of repurchase. The indenture and the related officers’
certificate for each Series, subject to the exceptions and in compliance with the conditions as applicable, specify that the Company
may not consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of its assets, incur liens, or enter into sale-leaseback transactions
exceeding specific terms, without the lenders’ consent. The indentures also contain customary events of default provisions.
Other Information
Scheduled principal payments of long-term debt are $1.1 billion in 2021, $704 million in 2022, $813 million in 2023, $1.1
billion in 2024, $16 million in 2025 and $3.7 billion thereafter.
Revolving Credit Facilities
In the second quarter of 2020, the Company entered into a syndicated $4 billion five-year senior unsecured credit facility (the
“2020 Credit Facility”), which has a $3.6 billion aggregate sublimit of availability in Canadian dollars, British pound sterling and
Euro. The 2020 Credit Facility matures in September 2024 and had no borrowings during 2020 and no amounts outstanding as of
March 31, 2020. The remaining terms and conditions of the 2020 Credit Facility are substantially similar to those previously in
place under the $3.5 billion five-year senior unsecured revolving credit facility (the “Global Facility”), which was scheduled to
mature in October 2020. The Global Facility was terminated in connection with the execution of the 2020 Credit Facility in
September 2019 and had no borrowings during the six months ended September 30, 2019 and the year ended March 31, 2018, and
had no amounts outstanding as of March 31, 2019.
Borrowings under the 2020 Credit Facility bear interest based upon the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”), Canadian
Dealer Offered Rate for credit extensions denominated in Canadian dollars, a prime rate, or alternative overnight rates as
applicable, plus agreed margins. The 2020 Credit Facility contains a financial covenant which obligates the Company to maintain a
debt to capital ratio of no greater than 65% and other customary investment grade covenants. If the Company does not comply with
these covenants, its ability to use the 2020 Credit Facility may be suspended and repayment of any outstanding balances under the
2020 Credit Facility may be required. At March 31, 2020, the Company was in compliance with all covenants.
96
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company also maintains bilateral credit facilities primarily denominated in Euros with a committed amount of $12 million
and an uncommitted amount of $166 million as of March 31, 2020. Borrowings and repayments were not material in 2020 and
2019 and amounts outstanding under these credit lines were not material as of March 31, 2020 and 2019.
Commercial Paper
The Company maintains a commercial paper program to support its working capital requirements and for other general
corporate purposes. Under the program, the Company can issue up to $4.0 billion in outstanding commercial paper notes. During
2020 and 2019, it borrowed $21.4 billion and $37.3 billion and repaid $21.4 billion and $37.3 billion under the program. At
March 31, 2020 and 2019, there were no commercial paper notes outstanding.
16.    Variable Interest Entities
The Company evaluates its ownership, contractual and other interests in entities to determine if they are VIEs, if it has a
variable interest in those entities and the nature and extent of those interests. These evaluations are highly complex and involve
management judgment and the use of estimates and assumptions based on available historical information, among other factors.
Based on its evaluations, if the Company determines it is the primary beneficiary of such VIEs, it consolidates such entities into its
financial statements.
Consolidated Variable Interest Entities
The Company consolidates a VIE when it has the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the VIE’s
economic performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of the VIE and, as a result, is considered
the primary beneficiary of the VIE. It consolidates certain single-lessee leasing entities where it, as the lessee, has the majority risk
of the leased assets due to its minimum lease payment obligations to these leasing entities. As a result of absorbing this risk, the
leases provide the Company with the power to direct the operations of the leased properties and the obligation to absorb losses or
the right to receive benefits of the entity. Consolidated VIEs do not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated
statements of operations and cash flows. Total assets and liabilities included in its consolidated balance sheets for these VIEs were
$695 million and $82 million at March 31, 2020 and $896 million and $64 million at March 31, 2019.
Investments in Unconsolidated Variable Interest Entities
The Company is involved with VIEs which it does not consolidate because it does not have the power to direct the activities
that most significantly impact their economic performance and thus is not considered the primary beneficiary of the entities. Its
relationships include equity method investments and lending, leasing, contractual or other relationships with the VIEs. The
Company’s most significant relationships are with oncology and other specialty practices. Under these practice arrangements, it
generally owns or leases all of the real estate and equipment used by the affiliated practices and manages the practices’
administrative functions. It also has relationships with certain pharmacies in Europe with whom it may provide financing, have
equity ownership and/or a supply agreement whereby it supplies the vast majority of the pharmacies’ purchases. The Company’s
maximum exposure to loss (regardless of probability) as a result of all unconsolidated VIEs was $1.4 billion at March 31, 2020 and
$1.1 billion at March 31, 2019, which primarily represents the value of intangible assets related to service agreements, equity
investments and lease and loan receivables. This amount excludes the customer loan guarantees discussed in Financial Note 20,
“Financial Guarantees and Warranties.” The Company believes there is no material loss exposure on these assets or from these
relationships.
17.Pension Benefits
The Company maintains a number of qualified and nonqualified defined benefit pension plans and defined contribution plans
for eligible employees.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
Eligible U.S. employees who were employed by the Company as of December 31, 1995 are covered under the Company-
sponsored defined benefit retirement plan. In 1997, the plan was amended to freeze all plan benefits as of December 31, 1996.
Benefits for the defined benefit retirement plan are based primarily on age of employees at date of retirement, years of creditable
service and the average of the highest 60 months of pay during the 15 years prior to the plan freeze date. The Company also has
defined benefit pension plans for eligible employees outside of the U.S., as well as an unfunded nonqualified supplemental defined
benefit plan for certain U.S. executives.
97
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On May 23, 2018, the Company’s Board of Directors approved the termination of its frozen U.S. defined benefit pension plan
(“Plan”). During the first quarter of 2020, the Company offered the option of receiving a lump sum payment to certain participants
with vested qualified Plan benefits in lieu of receiving monthly annuity payments. Approximately 1,300 participants elected to
receive the settlement, and lump sum payments of approximately $49 million were made from plan assets to these participants in
June 2019. The benefit obligation settled approximated payments to plan participants and a pre-tax settlement charge of $17 million
($12 million after-tax) was recorded during the first quarter of 2020. During the second quarter of 2020, the Company transferred
the remainder of the Plan’s pension obligation to a third-party insurance provider by purchasing annuity contracts for
approximately $280 million which was fully funded directly by plan assets. The third-party insurance provider assumed the
obligation to pay future pension benefits and provide administrative services on November 1, 2019. As a result, the remaining
previously recorded unrecognized losses in accumulated other comprehensive loss for this Plan were recognized as expense and a
pre-tax settlement charge of approximately $105 million ($78 million after-tax) was recorded in other income (expense), net, in the
Company’s consolidated statements of operations during the second quarter of 2020. As of March 31, 2020 and 2019, this defined
benefit pension plan had an accumulated comprehensive loss of approximately nil and $121 million.
During the third quarter of 2020, a cash payment of $114 million was made to settle a participant’s liability from the executive
benefit retirement plan. As a result, a majority of the remaining recorded unrecognized losses in accumulated other comprehensive
loss for this Plan were recognized as expense and a pre-tax settlement charge of approximately $11 million ($8 million after-tax)
was recorded in other income (expense), net, in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations. As of March 31, 2020 and
2019, this plan had an accumulated comprehensive loss of approximately $1 million and $12 million.
The Company’s non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans cover eligible employees located predominantly in Norway, the United
Kingdom, Germany, and Canada. Benefits for these plans are based primarily on each employee’s final salary, with annual
adjustments for inflation. The obligations in Norway are largely related to the state-regulated pension plan which is managed by the
Norwegian Public Service Pension Fund (“SPK”). According to the terms of the SPK, the plan assets of state regulated plans in
Norway must correspond very closely to the pension obligation calculated using the principles codified in Norwegian law. In the
U.K., the Company has subsidiaries that participate in a joint pension plan. The pension obligation in Germany is unfunded with
the exception of the contractual trust arrangement used to fund pensions of McKesson Europe’s Management Board.
Defined benefit plan assets and obligations are measured as of the Company’s fiscal year-end. The net periodic expense for the
Company’s pension plans is as follows:
U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Service cost - benefits earned during the year $ — $ — $ 3 $ 16 $ 15 $ 15
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation 6 14 14 19 21 22
Expected return on assets (4) (16) (19) (22) (23) (26)
Amortization of unrecognized actuarial loss and
prior service costs 2 5 6 6 4 5
Curtailment/settlement loss 127 4 2 — 1 1
Net periodic pension expense $ 131 $ 7 $ 6 $ 19 $ 18 $ 17
The projected unit credit method is utilized in measuring net periodic pension expense over the employees’ service life for the
pension plans. Unrecognized actuarial losses exceeding 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the market value of
assets are amortized straight-line over the average remaining future service period of active employees.
98
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the changes in benefit obligations and plan assets for the Company’s pension plans is as follows:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019
Change in benefit obligations  
Benefit obligation at beginning of period (1)$ 439 $ 485 $ 990 $ 1,035
Service cost — — 16 15
Interest cost 6 14 19 21
Actuarial loss (gain) 20 4 (36) 35
Benefits paid (179) (64) (43) (36)
Annuity Premium Transfer (276) — — —
Expenses paid — — — (1)
Acquisitions — — 2 1
Foreign exchange impact and other — — (52) (80)
Benefit obligation at end of period (1) $ 10 $ 439 $ 896 $ 990
 
Change in plan assets  
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of period $ 322 $ 335 $ 642 $ 687
Actual return on plan assets 27 12 3 18
Employer and participant contributions 116 39 28 23
Benefits paid (179) (64) (43) (36)
Annuity Premium Transfer (276) — — —
Expenses paid — — (1) (1)
Foreign exchange impact and other (10) — (35) (49)
Fair value of plan assets at end of period $ — $ 322 $ 594 $ 642
 
Funded status at end of period $ (10)$ (117) $ (302)$ (348)
 
Amounts recognized on the balance sheet  
Assets $ — $ 7 $ 49 $ 20
Current liabilities (2)(1) (115) (162) (13)
Long-term liabilities (9) (9) (189) (355)
Total $ (10)$ (117) $ (302)$ (348)
(1) The benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation.
(2) Current liabilities includes $151 millio n reclas sified from long-te rm liabilities to assets held for sale in 2020 in conjunction with the
Company’ s German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture as discussed in Financial Note 3 , “Held for Sale ”.
99
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table provides the projected benefit obligation, accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets for
all the Company’s pension plans, including accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets:
U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
March 31,  March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019  2020  2019
Projected benefit obligation $ 10 $ 439 $ 896 $ 990
Accumulated benefit obligation 10 439 856 949
Fair value of plan assets — 322 594 642
Amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (pre-tax) consist of:
U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
March 31,  March 31,
(In millions) 2020  2019  2020  2019
Net actuarial loss $ 1 $ 133 $ 149 $ 186
Prior service credit — — (3) (4)
Total $ 1 $ 133 $ 146 $ 182
Other changes in accumulated other comprehensive income (pre-tax) were as follows:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Net actuarial loss (gain) $ (3) $ 8$ (15) $ (24) $ 42$ (11)
Prior service credit — — — — — (2)
Amortization of:       
Net actuarial loss (129) (9) (8) (6) (5) (6)
Prior service credit (cost) — — — — — —
Foreign exchange impact and other — — — (6) (12) 19
Total recognized in other comprehensive loss
(income) $(132) $ (1)$ (23) $ (36) $ 25$ —
The Company expects to amortize $5 million of actuarial loss for the pension plans from stockholders’ equity to pension
expense in 2021. The comparable 2020 amount was $8 million of actuarial loss. In addition, the Company recognized $127 million
in actuarial losses for the pension plans to stockholders’ equity in 2020 as a result of $116 million from the termination of the U.S.
defined benefit pension plan and $11 million from the settlement from the executive benefit retirement plan for a recently retired
executive.
Projected benefit obligations related to the Company’s unfunded U.S. plans were $10 million and $124 million at
March 31, 2020 and 2019. Pension obligations for its unfunded plans are based on the recommendations of independent actuaries.
Projected benefit obligations relating to the Company’s unfunded non-U.S. plans were $298 million and $293 million at
March 31, 2020 and 2019. Funding obligations for its non-U.S. plans vary based on the laws of each non-U.S. jurisdiction.
Expected benefit payments for the Company’s pension plans are as follows: $36 million, $35 million, $36 million, $36 million
and $38 million for 2021 to 2025 and $208 million for 2026 through 2030. Expected benefit payments are based on the same
assumptions used to measure the benefit obligations and include estimated future employee service. Expected contributions to be
made for the Company’s pension plans are $33 million for 2021.
100
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the net periodic pension expense and the actuarial present value of benefit
obligations were as follows:
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Net periodic pension expense    
Discount rates 3.66% 3.83% 3.55% 2.03% 2.35% 2.34%
Rate of increase in compensation N/A (1) N/A (1)4.00 2.93 3.13 2.72
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 4.00  5.25 6.25 3.01 3.71 4.03
Benefit obligation    
Discount rates 3.08% 3.65% 3.69% 2.03% 2.13% 2.35%
Rate of increase in compensation N/A (1) N/A (1)N/A (1)2.93 3.18 2.59
(1) This assumption is no longer needed in actuarial valuations as U.S. plans are frozen or have fixed benefits for the remaining active
participants.
The Company’s defined benefit pension plan liabilities are valued using a discount rate based on a yield curve developed from
a portfolio of high quality corporate bonds rated AA or better whose maturities are aligned with the expected benefit payments of
its plans. For March 31, 2020, the Company’s U.S. defined benefit liabilities are valued using a weighted average discount rate of
3.08%, which represents a decrease of 57 basis points from its 2019 weighted-average discount rate of 3.65%. The Company’s non-
U.S. defined benefit pension plan liabilities are valued using a weighted-average discount rate of 2.03%, which represents a
decrease of 10 basis points from its 2019 weighted average discount rate of 2.13%.
Plan Assets
Investment Strategy: The overall objective for U. S. pension plan assets was to generate long-term investment returns
consistent with capital preservation and prudent investment practices, with a diversification of asset types and investment strategies.
Periodic adjustments were made to provide liquidity for benefit payments and to rebalance plan assets to their target allocations.
In September 2018, a new investment allocation strategy was put in place to protect the funded status of the U.S. plan assets
subsequent to Board approval of U.S. pension plan termination. As of March 31, 2020, no assets remained related to the U.S.
pension plan. The target allocation for U.S. plan assets at March 31, 2019 was 100% fixed income investments including cash and
cash equivalents. Fixed income investments include corporate bonds, government securities, mortgage-backed securities, asset-
backed securities, other directly held fixed income investments, and fixed income commingled funds. The real estate investments
were in a commingled real estate fund.
For non-U.S. plan assets, the investment strategies are subject to local regulations and the asset/liability profiles of the plans in
each individual country. Plan assets of the non-U.S. plans are broadly invested in a manner appropriate to the nature and duration of
the expected future retirement benefits payable under the plans. Plan assets are primarily invested in high-quality corporate and
government bond funds and equity securities. Assets are properly diversified to avoid excessive reliance on any particular asset,
issuer or group of undertakings so as to avoid accumulations of risk in the portfolio as a whole.
The Company develops the expected long-term rate of return assumption based on the projected performance of the asset
classes in which plan assets are invested. The target asset allocation was determined based on the liability and risk tolerance
characteristics of the plans and at times may be adjusted to achieve overall investment objectives.
101
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fair Value Measurements: The fair value hierarchy has three levels based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine fair
value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2
refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs and Level 3 includes fair values estimated using significant
unobservable inputs. The following tables represent the Company’s pension plan assets as of March 31, 2020 and 2019, using the
fair value hierarchy by asset class:
U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
March 31, 2020  March 31, 2020
(In millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Cash and cash equivalents$ — $ — $ — $ — $ 13 $ — $ — $ 13
Equity securities:        
Common and preferred
stock — — — — — — — —
Equity commingled
funds — — — — 53 75 — 128
Fixed income securities:        
Government securities — — — — 6 139 — 145
Corporate bonds — — — — 14 17 — 31
Mortgage-backed
securities — — — — — — — —
Asset-backed securities
and other — — — — — — — —
Fixed income
commingled funds — — — — 107 101 — 208
Other:        
Real estate funds — — — — 3 2 3 8
Other — — — — 19 — — 19
Total $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 215 $ 334 $ 3 $ 552
Assets held at NAV
practical expedient (1)       
Equity commingled
funds   —    8
Fixed income
commingled funds   —    —
Real estate funds   —    —
Other   —    34
Total plan assets   $ —   $ 594
102
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
March 31, 2019 March 31, 2019
(In millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Cash and cash equivalents$ 11 $ — $ — $ 11 $ 6 $ — $ — $ 6
Equity securities:        
Common and preferred
stock — — — — — — — —
Equity commingled
funds — — — — 62 82 — 144
Fixed income securities:       
Government securities — 33 — 33 4 135 — 139
Corporate bonds — 273 — 273 8 18 — 26
Mortgage-backed
securities — — — — — — — —
Asset-backed securities
and other — 5 — 5 — — — —
Fixed income
commingled funds — — — — 125 110 6 241
Other:        
Real estate funds — — — — 2 3 — 5
Other — — — — 21 — 3 24
Total $ 11 $ 311 $ — $ 322 $ 228 $ 348 $ 9 $ 585
Assets held at NAV
practical expedient (1)       
Equity commingled
funds    —    8
Fixed income
commingled funds   —    —
Real estate funds    —    —
Other    —    49
Total plan assets  $ 322  $ 642
(1) Equity commingled funds, fixed income commingled  funds, real estate funds and other investments for which fair value is measured using
the NAV per share as a practical expedient are not leveled within the fair value hierarchy and are included as a reconciling item to total
investments.
Cash and cash equivalents - Cash and cash equivalents include short-term investment funds that maintain daily liquidity and
aim to have constant unit values of $1.00. The funds invest in short-term fixed income securities and other securities with debt-like
characteristics emphasizing short-term maturities and high credit quality. Directly held cash and cash equivalents are classified as
Level 1 investments. Cash and cash equivalents include money market funds and other commingled funds, which have daily net
asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1 investments.
Common and preferred stock - This investment class consists of common and preferred shares issued by U.S. and non-U.S.
corporations. Common shares are traded actively on exchanges and price quotes are readily available. Preferred shares may not be
actively traded. Holdings of common shares are generally classified as Level 1 investments.
Equity commingled funds - Some equity investments are held in commingled funds, which have daily net asset values derived
from quoted prices for the underlying securities in active markets; these are classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
Fixed income securities - Government securities consist of bonds and debentures issued by central governments or federal
agencies; corporate bonds consist of bonds and debentures issued by corporations; mortgage-backed securities consist of debt
obligations secured by a mortgage or pool of mortgages; and asset-backed securities primarily consist of debt obligations secured
by an asset or pool of assets other than mortgages. Inputs to the valuation methodology include quoted prices for similar assets in
active markets, and inputs that are observable for the asset, either directly or indirectly, for substantially the full term of the asset.
Multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible, enabling cross-provider price validations.
Fixed income securities are generally classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
103
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fixed income commingled funds - Some fixed income investments are held in exchange traded or commingled funds, which
have daily net asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1, 2 or 3 investments.
Real estate funds - The value of the real estate funds is reported by the fund manager and is based on a valuation of the
underlying properties. Inputs used in the valuation include items such as cost, discounted future cash flows, independent appraisals
and market based comparable data. The real estate funds are classified as Level 1, 2, or 3 investments.
Other - At March 31, 2020 and 2019, this includes $29 million and $35 million of plan asset value relating to the SPK. In
principle, the SPK is organized as a pay-as-you-go system guaranteed by the Norwegian government as it holds no Company-
owned assets to back the pension liabilities. The Company pays a pension premium used to fund the plan, which is paid directly to
the Norwegian government who establishes an account for each participating employer to keep track of the financial status of the
plan, including managing the contributions and the payments. Further, the investment return credited to this account is determined
annually by the SPK based on the performance of long-term government bonds.
The activity attributable to Level 3 plan assets was insignificant in the years ended March 31, 2020 and 2019.
Multiemployer Plans
The Company contributes to a number of multiemployer pension plans under the terms of collective-bargaining agreements
that cover union-represented employees in the U.S. In 2017, it also contributed to the Pensjonsordningen for Apoteketaten
(“POA”), a mandatory multiemployer pension scheme for its pharmacy employees in Norway, managed by the association of
Norwegian Pharmacies.
The risks of participating in these multiemployer plans are different from single-employer pension plans in the following
aspects: (i) assets contributed to the multiemployer plan by one employer may be used to provide benefits to employees of other
participating employers; (ii) if a participating employer stops contributing to the plan, the unfunded obligations of the plan may be
borne by the remaining participating employers; and (iii) if the Company chooses to stop participating in some of its multiemployer
plans, the Company may be required to pay those plans an amount based on the underfunded status of the plan, referred to as a
withdrawal liability. Actions taken by other participating employers may lead to adverse changes in the financial condition of a
multiemployer benefit plan and the Company’s withdrawal liability and contributions may increase.
Contributions and amounts accrued for U.S. Plans were not material for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018.
Contributions to the POA for non-U.S. Plans exceeding 5% of total plan contributions were $17 million, $27 million and $16
million in 2020, 2019 and 2018. Based on actuarial calculations, the Company estimates the funded status for its non-U.S. Plans to
be approximately 76% as of March 31, 2020. No amounts were accrued for liability associated with the POA as the Company has
no intention to withdraw from the plan.
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company has a contributory retirement savings plan (“RSP”) for U.S. eligible employees. Eligible employees may
contribute to the RSP up to 75% of their eligible compensation on a pre-tax or post-tax basis not to exceed IRS limits. The
Company makes matching contributions in an amount equal to 100% of the employee’s first 3% of pay contributed and 50% for the
next 2% of pay contributed. The Company also may make an additional annual matching contribution for each plan year to enable
participants to receive a full match based on their annual contribution. The Company also contributed to non-U.S. plans that are
available in certain countries. Contribution expenses for the RSP and non-U.S. plans were $102 million, $92 million and $82
million for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018.
Postretirement Benefits
The Company maintains a number of postretirement benefits, primarily consisting of healthcare and life insurance (“welfare”)
benefits, for certain eligible U.S. employees. Eligible employees consist of those who retired before March 31, 1999 and those who
retired after March 31, 1999, but were an active employee as of that date, after meeting other age-related criteria. It also provides
postretirement benefits for certain U.S. executives. Defined benefit plan obligations are measured as of the Company’s fiscal year-
end. The net periodic (credit) expense for the Company’s postretirement welfare benefits was not material for the years ended
March 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018. The benefit obligation at March 31, 2020 and 2019 was $65 million and $73 million.
104
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
18.    Hedging Activities
In the normal course of business, the Company is exposed to interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations. At
times, the Company limits these risks through the use of derivatives such as cross-currency swaps, foreign currency forward
contracts and interest rate swaps. In accordance with the Company’s policy, derivatives are only used for hedging purposes. It does
not use derivatives for trading or speculative purposes.
Foreign currency exchange risk
The Company conducts its business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of its foreign subsidiaries,
including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a material
adverse impact on the Company’s financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. The Company is also exposed to foreign
currency exchange rate risk related to its foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional
currencies. The Company has certain foreign currency exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and
cross-currency swaps. These forward contracts and cross-currency swaps are generally used to offset the potential income statement
effects from intercompany loans and other obligations denominated in non-functional currencies. These programs reduce but do not
entirely eliminate foreign currency exchange rate risk.
Non-Derivative Instruments Designated as Hedges
At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had €1.7 billion and €1.95 billion of Euro-denominated notes designated as non-
derivative net investment hedges. These hedges are utilized to hedge portions of the Company’s net investments in non-U.S.
subsidiaries against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S. dollar. For all
notes that are designated as net investment hedges and meet effectiveness requirements, the changes in carrying value of the notes
attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in foreign currency translation adjustments in accumulated other comprehensive
loss in the consolidated statement of stockholders’ equity where they offset foreign currency translation gains and losses recorded
on the Company’s net investments. To the extent foreign currency denominated notes designated as net investment hedges are
ineffective, changes in carrying value attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in earnings. In December 2019, the
Company prospectively de-designated from net investment hedges €250 million of its Euro-denominated notes which matured in
February 2020.
At March 31, 2019, the Company also had £450 million British pound sterling-denominated notes designated as non-derivative
net investment hedges. On September 30, 2019, the Company de-designated its £450 million British pounding sterling-
denominated notes prospectively from net investment hedges as the hedging relationship ceased to be effective.
Gains or losses from net investment hedges recorded in other comprehensive income were gains of $39 million and $259
million in 2020 and 2019 and a loss of $268 million in 2018. Ineffectiveness on the Company’s non-derivative net investment
hedges during 2020 resulted in gains of $34 million which were recorded in earnings in other income (expense), net in the
consolidated statements of operations. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s net investment hedges for the years ended
March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Derivatives Designated as Hedges
At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges with a total gross
notional amount of $1.5 billion Canadian dollars. Under the terms of the cross-currency swap contracts, the Company agrees with
third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in one currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at specified
intervals and to exchange principal in one currency for principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-upon
notional amounts. These swaps are utilized to hedge portions of the Company’s net investments denominated in Canadian dollars
against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S. dollar. The changes in the
fair value of these derivatives attributable to the changes in spot currency exchange rates and differences between spot and forward
interest rates are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive loss in the consolidated statement of stockholders’ equity where
they offset foreign currency translation gains and losses recorded on the Company’s net investments denominated in Canadian
dollars. To the extent cross-currency swaps designated as hedges are ineffective, changes in carrying value attributable to the
change in spot rates are recorded in earnings. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s net investment hedges for the years
ended March 31, 2020 and 2019.
105
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
At March 31, 2019, the Company also had cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges with a total gross
notional amount of £932 million British pound sterling. In 2020, the Company terminated these swaps due to ineffectiveness in its
British pound sterling hedging program that arose due to 2019 impairments of goodwill and certain long-lived assets in its U.K.
businesses. Proceeds from the termination of these swaps totaled $84 million and resulted in a settlement gain of $34 million in
2020. This gain was recorded in earnings in other income (expense), net.
Gains or losses from the Company’s cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges recorded in other
comprehensive income were gains of $76 million and $53 million in 2020 and 2019 and losses of $7 million in 2018. There was no
ineffectiveness in the Company’s hedges for the years ended March 31, 2020 and 2019. These cross-currency swaps will mature
between November 2020 and November 2024.
On September 30, 2019, the Company entered into a number of cross-currency swaps designated as fair value hedges with total
notional amounts of £450 million British pound sterling. Under the terms of the cross-currency swap contracts, the Company
agreed with third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in British pound sterling for floating interest payments in U.S. dollars
based on three-month LIBOR plus a spread. These swaps are utilized to hedge the changes in the fair value of the underlying £450
million British pound sterling notes resulting from changes in benchmark interest rates and foreign exchange rates. The changes in
the fair value of these derivatives, which are designated as fair value hedges, and the offsetting changes in the fair value of the
hedged notes are recorded in earnings. Gains from these fair value hedges recorded in earnings were $6 million in 2020, largely
offsetting the losses recorded in earnings related to the hedged notes. The swaps will mature in February 2023.
At March 31, 2019, the Company had a forward contract to hedge the U.S. dollar against cash flows denominated in Canadian
dollars with a total gross notional amount of $81 million, which was designated as a cash flow hedge. The contract matured in
March 2020.
From time to time, the Company also enters into cross-currency swaps to hedge intercompany loans denominated in non-
functional currencies. For our cross-currency swap transactions, we agree with third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in
one currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at specified intervals and to exchange principal in one currency for
principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-upon notional amounts. These cross-currency swaps are designed to
reduce the income statement effects arising from fluctuations in foreign exchange rates and have been designated as cash flow
hedges. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had cross-currency swaps with total gross notional amounts of approximately
$2.9 billion, which are designated as cash flow hedges. These swaps will mature between April 2020 and January 2024.
For forward contracts and cross-currency swaps that are designated as cash flow hedges, the effective portion of changes in the
fair value of the hedges is recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income and reclassified into earnings in the same period in
which the hedged transaction affects earnings. Changes in fair values representing hedge ineffectiveness are recognized in current
earnings. Gains or losses from cash flow hedges recorded in other comprehensive income were gains of $98 million and $28
million in 2020 and 2019 and losses of $30 million in 2018. Gains or losses reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive
income and recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statements of operations were not material in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s cash flow hedges for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges
Derivative instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with the change in
value included in earnings.
The Company has a number of forward contracts to hedge the Euro against cash flows denominated in British pound sterling
and other European currencies. At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the total gross notional amounts of these contracts were $29 million
and $28 million. These contracts will mature through December 2020 and none of these contracts were designated for hedge
accounting. Changes in the fair values for contracts not designated as hedges are recorded directly into earnings in operating
expenses. Changes in the fair values were not material in 2020, 2019 and 2018. Gains or losses from these contracts are largely
offset by changes in the value of the underlying intercompany obligations.
106
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In 2020, the Company also entered into a number of forward contracts and swaps to offset a portion of the earnings impacts
from the ineffectiveness of net investment hedges discussed above. These contracts matured through January 2020 and none of
these contracts were designated for hedge accounting. In December 2019, the Company entered into a series of forward contracts
with a total notional amount of €250 million to offset the earnings impact from its Euro-denominated notes. These contracts and the
notes against which they are offsetting matured in February 2020 and were not designated for hedge accounting. Changes in the fair
value for contracts not designated as hedges are recorded directly in earnings. In 2020, losses of $44 million were recorded in
earnings in other income (expense), net, which offsets the ineffectiveness on the Company’s non-derivative net investment hedges
noted above.
Information regarding the fair value of derivatives on a gross basis is as follows:
 
Balance Sheet
CaptionMarch 31, 2020 March 31, 2019
 Fair Value of
DerivativeU.S.
Dollar
NotionalFair Value of
DerivativeU.S.
Dollar
Notional (In millions) Asset Liability Asset Liability
Derivatives designated for hedge
accounting   
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other $ —$ —$ — $ 17$ —$ 81
Cross-currency swaps
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other/Other
accrued liabilities 112 19 1,279 — 18 —
Cross-currency swaps (non-
current)Other Noncurrent
Assets/Liabilities 182 — 3,313 91 33 5,283
Total $ 294$ 19 $ 108$ 51
Derivatives not designated for
hedge accounting   
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other $ 2$ —$ 24 $ —$ —$ 14
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Other accrued
liabilities — — 5 — — 14
Total $ 2$ — $ —$ —
Refer to Financial Note 19, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on these recurring fair value measurements.
19.Fair Value Measurements
Fair value is defined as the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction
between market participants at the measurement date. There is a three-level hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs used in determining
fair value by their reliability and preferred use, as follows:
Level 1 - Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
Level 2 - Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for similar assets and liabilities, quoted prices for identical or
similar assets or liabilities in inactive markets, or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by
observable market data.
Level 3 - Valuations based on inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and unobservable.
At March 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying amounts of cash, certain cash equivalents, restricted cash, marketable securities,
receivables, drafts and accounts payable, short-term borrowings and other current liabilities approximated their estimated fair
values because of the short maturity of these financial instruments.
107
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The fair value of the Company’s commercial paper was determined using quoted prices in active markets for identical
liabilities, which are considered Level 1 inputs.
The Company’s long-term debt is carried at amortized cost. The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of these liabilities
were $7.4 billion and $7.8 billion at March 31, 2020 and $7.6 billion and $7.9 billion at March 31, 2019. The estimated fair value
of its long-term debt was determined using quoted market prices in a less active market and other observable inputs from available
market information, which are considered to be Level 2 inputs, and may not be representative of actual values that could have been
realized or that will be realized in the future.
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis
Cash and cash equivalents at March 31, 2020 and 2019 included investments in money market funds of $2.0 billion and $1.2
billion, which are reported at fair value. The fair value of money market funds was determined using quoted prices for identical
investments in active markets, which are considered to be Level 1 inputs under the fair value measurements and disclosure
guidance. The carrying value of all other cash equivalents approximates their fair value due to their relatively short-term nature.
Fair values for the Company’s marketable securities were not material at March 31, 2020 and 2019.
Fair values of the Company’s forward foreign currency contracts were determined using observable inputs from available
market information. Fair values of the Company’s cross-currency swaps were determined using quoted foreign currency exchange
rates and other observable inputs from available market information. These inputs are considered Level 2 under the fair value
measurements and disclosure guidance, and may not be representative of actual values that could have been realized or that will be
realized in the future. Refer to Financial Note 18, “Hedging Activities,” for fair value and other information on the Company’s
foreign currency derivatives including forward foreign currency contracts and cross-currency swaps.
There were no transfers between Level 1, Level 2 or Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy during the years ended March 31, 2020
and 2019.
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
At March 31, 2020, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis included long-lived assets for the Company’s
European Pharmaceuticals Solutions segment and the Rexall Health business within Other. Refer to Financial Note 4,
“Restructuring, Impairment and Related Charges” for more information.
At March 31, 2019, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis primarily consisted of goodwill and long-lived assets
for the Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
Goodwill
Fair value assessments of the reporting unit and the reporting unit's net assets, which are performed for goodwill impairment
tests, are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company specific
information. The Company considered a market approach as well as an income approach (a DCF model) to determine the fair value
of the reporting unit.
Refer to Financial Note 14, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” for more information regarding goodwill impairment
charges recorded for certain reporting units during 2019 and 2018.
Long-lived Assets
The Company utilizes multiple approaches including the DCF model and market approaches for estimating the fair value of
intangible assets. The future cash flows used in the analysis are based on internal cash flow projections from its long-range plans
and include significant assumptions by management. Accordingly, the fair value assessment of the long-lived assets is considered a
Level 3 fair value measurement.
The Company measures certain long-lived and intangible assets at fair value on a nonrecurring basis when events occur that
indicate an asset group may not be recoverable. If the carrying amount of an asset group is not recoverable, an impairment charge is
recorded to reduce the carrying amount by the excess over its fair value.
Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
There were no liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis at March 31, 2020 and 2019.
108
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
20.Financial Guarantees and Warranties
Financial Guarantees
The Company has agreements with certain of its customers’ financial institutions, mainly in Canada and Europe, under which
it has guaranteed the repurchase of its customers’ inventory or its customers’ debt in the event these customers are unable to meet
their obligations to those financial institutions. For the Company’s inventory repurchase agreements, among other requirements,
inventories must be in resalable condition and any repurchase would be at a discount. The inventory repurchase agreements mostly
relate to certain Canadian customers and generally range from one to two years. Customers’ debt guarantees generally range from
one to 10 years and are primarily provided to facilitate financing for certain customers. The majority of the Company’s customers’
debt guarantees are secured by certain assets of the customer. At March 31, 2020, the maximum amounts of inventory repurchase
guarantees and customers’ debt guarantees were $274 million and $129 million, of which the Company has not accrued any
material amounts. The expirations of these financial guarantees are as follows: $222 million, $17 million, $13 million, $32 million
and $10 million from 2021 through 2025 and $109 million thereafter.
At March 31, 2020, the Company’s banks and insurance companies have issued $170 million of standby letters of credit and
surety bonds, which were issued on the Company’s behalf primarily related to its customer contracts and in order to meet the
security requirements for statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations and its workers’ compensation and
automotive liability programs.
The Company’s software license agreements generally include certain provisions for indemnifying customers against liabilities
if its software products infringe a third party’s intellectual property rights. To date, the Company has not incurred any material costs
as a result of such indemnification agreements and has not accrued any liabilities related to such obligations.
In conjunction with certain transactions, primarily divestitures, the Company may provide routine indemnification agreements
(such as retention of previously existing environmental, tax and employee liabilities) whose terms vary in duration and often are not
explicitly defined. Where appropriate, obligations for such indemnifications are recorded as liabilities. Because the amounts of
these indemnification obligations often are not explicitly stated, the overall maximum amount of these commitments cannot be
reasonably estimated. Other than obligations recorded as liabilities at the time of divestiture, the Company has historically not made
material payments as a result of these indemnification provisions.
Warranties
In the normal course of business, the Company provides certain warranties and indemnification protection for its products and
services. For example, the Company provides warranties that the pharmaceutical and medical-surgical products it distributes are in
compliance with the U.S. Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and other applicable laws and regulations. It has received the same
warranties from its suppliers, which customarily are the manufacturers of the products. In addition, the Company has indemnity
obligations to its customers for these products, which have also been provided from its suppliers, either through express agreement
or by operation of law. Accrued warranty costs were not material to the consolidated balance sheets.
21.Commitments and Contingent Liabilities
In addition to commitments and obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business, the Company is subject to a variety of
claims and legal proceedings, including claims from customers and vendors, pending and potential legal actions for damages,
governmental investigations and other matters. The Company and its affiliates are parties to the legal claims and proceedings
described below. The Company is vigorously defending itself against those claims and in those proceedings. Significant
developments in those matters are described below. If the Company is unsuccessful in defending, or if it determines to settle, any of
these matters, it may be required to pay substantial sums, be subject to injunction and/or be forced to change how it operates its
business, which could have a material adverse impact on its financial position or results of operations.
109
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Unless otherwise stated, the Company is unable to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss for the matters
described below. Often, it is not reasonably possible for the Company to determine that a loss is probable for a claim, or to
reasonably estimate the amount of loss or a range of loss, because of the limited information available and the potential effects of
future events and decisions by third parties, such as courts and regulators, that will determine the ultimate resolution of the claim.
Many of the matters described are at preliminary stages, raise novel theories of liability or seek an indeterminate amount of
damages. It is not uncommon for claims to be resolved over many years. The Company reviews loss contingencies at least
quarterly, to determine whether the loss probability has changed and whether it can make a reasonable estimate of the possible loss
or range of loss. When the Company determines that a loss from a claim is probable and reasonably estimable, it records a liability
in the amount of its estimate for the ultimate loss. The Company also provides disclosure when it is reasonably possible that a loss
may be incurred or when it is reasonably possible that the amount of a loss will exceed its recorded liability.
I. Litigation and Claims Involving Distribution of Controlled Substances
The Company and its affiliates are defendants in many cases asserting claims related to distribution of controlled substances.
They are named as defendants along with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors, pharmaceutical manufacturers and retail
pharmacy chains. The plaintiffs in these actions include state attorneys general, county and municipal governments, hospitals,
Indian tribes, pension funds, third-party payors and individuals. These actions have been filed in state and federal courts throughout
the United States, and in Puerto Rico and Canada. They seek monetary damages and other forms of relief based on a variety of
causes of action, including negligence, public nuisance, unjust enrichment, civil conspiracy, as well as alleging violations of the
Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (“RICO”), state and federal controlled substances laws and other statutes.
Since December 5, 2017, nearly all such cases pending in federal district courts have been transferred for consolidated pre-trial
proceedings to a multi-district litigation (“MDL”) in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Ohio captioned In
re: National Prescription Opiate Litigation, Case No. 17-md-2804. At present, there are approximately 2,800 cases under the
jurisdiction of the MDL court. In suits filed against the Company by Cuyahoga County, Ohio, and Summit County, Ohio, the
parties finalized a settlement agreement on December 26, 2019. Under the terms of the agreement, the Company did not admit
liability and expressly denied wrongdoing, and paid the counties a total of $82 million on January 9, 2020. This charge was
recorded in operating expenses for the year ended March 31, 2020.
Three cases involving McKesson that were previously part of the federal MDL were remanded to other federal courts. On
January 14, 2020, the Judicial Panel on Multidistrict Litigation finalized its Conditional Remand Order, ordering that the cases
against the three largest distributors brought by Cabell County, West Virginia and the City of Huntington, West Virginia be
remanded to the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of West Virginia and a trial date has been scheduled for October 19,
2020. On February 5, 2020, the case brought by the City and County of San Francisco was remanded to the U.S. District Court for
the Northern District of California and the case brought by the Cherokee Nation was remanded to the U.S. District Court for the
Eastern District of Oklahoma.
The Company is also named in approximately 385 similar state court cases pending in 36 states plus Puerto Rico. These
include actions filed by 27 state attorneys general, and some by or on behalf of individuals, including wrongful death lawsuits and
putative class action lawsuits brought on behalf of children with neonatal abstinence syndrome due to alleged exposure to opioids
in utero. Trial dates have been set in several of these state cases. Trial was previously set to begin in March 2020 in the Supreme
Court of New York, Suffolk County for a case brought by the New York attorney general and two New York county governments,
but the trial was indefinitely postponed in light of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The Company has been involved in discussions with the objective of achieving broad resolution of opioid-related claims
brought by governmental entities. For example, on October 21, 2019, four state attorneys general announced certain terms of a
proposed framework for the potential settlement of those opioid claims which they indicated they would find acceptable. The
proposed framework would have expected the three largest U.S. pharmaceutical distributors to pay an aggregate amount of up to
$18.0 billion over 18 years, with up to approximately $6.9 billion over 18 years expected from the Company, with any finally-
determined amount being subject to adjustment based on various contingencies, including sufficient resolution with States, political
subdivisions and other governmental entities nationwide. The proposed framework also would have required the three distributors,
including the Company, to adopt changes to anti-diversion programs and to participate in a program involving the distribution of
certain medication used to treat opioid use disorder. Discussions with attorneys general and other parties continue. If the negotiating
parties are able to agree on potential terms for a broad resolution, those potential terms would need to be agreed to by numerous
other state and local governments before an agreement could be finalized.
110
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Because of the novelty of the claims asserted and the complexity of litigation involving numerous parties across multiple
jurisdictions, and the added uncertainty introduced by the economic and other implications of the COVID-19 pandemic, the
Company has determined that liability is not probable, and is not able to reasonably estimate a loss or range of loss. To be viable, a
broad settlement arrangement would require participation of numerous parties and the resolution of many complex issues. The
scope and terms of any settlement framework, including the financial terms, have not been determined. Because of the many
uncertainties associated with any potential settlement arrangements, the significance of unresolved elements of a potential
settlement and the uncertainty of the scope of potential participation by plaintiffs, the Company has not reached a point where
settlement is probable, and as such has not recognized any liability related to any potential settlement framework as of March 31,
2020. The Company believes that it has valid defenses to the claims pending against it and intends to vigorously defend against all
such claims. An adverse judgment or negotiated resolution in any of these matters could have a material adverse impact on the
Company’s financial position, cash flows or liquidity, or results of operations.
The Company and certain of its current and former directors and officers were defendants in a consolidated shareholder
derivative action in the Northern District of California captioned In re McKesson Corporation Derivative Litigation, No. 4:17-cv-
1850. The consolidated complaint alleged claims of breach of fiduciary duty, waste, and insider trading purportedly on behalf of the
Company. The Company was named as a nominal defendant. The consolidated complaint alleged that the defendants violated their
fiduciary duties by causing, allowing, or otherwise failing to prevent the purported conduct underlying the Company's previously
disclosed agreement with the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), Department of Justice (DOJ), and various United States
Attorneys' offices to settle potential administrative and civil claims relating to investigations about the Company's suspicious order
reporting practices for controlled substances. The consolidated complaint sought unspecified damages, restitution, disgorgement,
attorneys' fees, and other equitable relief. The Company and certain of its current and former directors and officers were also
defendants in a similar consolidated shareholder derivative action in the Delaware Court of Chancery captioned In re McKesson
Corporation Stockholder Derivative Litigation, No. 2017-0736. On May 25, 2018, the court stayed further proceedings in this
matter in favor of the In re McKesson Corporation Derivative Litigation action. The parties reached an agreement to resolve these
shareholder derivative actions. The court in the In re McKesson Corporation Derivative Litigation action issued a final judgment
and order approving the settlement on April 22, 2020. Under that agreement: (i) insurance carriers will pay the Company $175
million, less $44 million in attorneys’ fees and expenses awarded by the court to plaintiffs’ counsel; and (ii) the Company will
implement certain corporate governance enhancements that will remain in effect for at least four years. On April 24, 2020, pursuant
to the terms of the settlement agreement, the parties to the In re McKesson Corporation Stockholder Derivative Litigation action
pending in the Delaware Court of Chancery filed a stipulation dismissing that action with prejudice. No cash payment has yet been
received by the Company.
On August 8, 2018, the Company was served with a qui tam complaint pending in the United States District Court for the
District of Massachusetts alleging that the Company violated the federal False Claims Act and various state false claims acts due to
the alleged failure of the Company and other defendants to report providers who were engaged in diversion of controlled
substances. United States ex rel. Manchester v. Purdue Pharma, L.P., et al., Case No. 1-16-cv-10947. On August 22, 2018, the
United States filed a motion to dismiss. The relator died, and on February 25, 2019 the court entered an order staying the matter
until a proper party can be substituted, and providing that if no party is substituted within 90 days of February 25, 2019, the case
would be dismissed. In April 2019, the widow of the relator filed a motion to substitute their daughter as the relator; the United
States and defendants opposed this substitution request. The motion remains pending and the case remains stayed.
In December 2019, the Company was served with two qui tam complaints filed by the same two relators alleging violations of
the federal False Claims Act, the California False Claims Act, and the California Unfair Business Practices statute based on alleged
predicate violations of the Controlled Substances Act and its implementing regulations, United States ex rel. Kelley, 19-cv-2233,
and State of California ex rel. Kelley, CGC-19-576931. The complaints seek relief including treble damages, civil penalties,
attorney fees, and costs in unspecified amounts.
111
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
II. Other Litigation and Claims
On May 17, 2013, the Company was served with a complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District
of California by True Health Chiropractic Inc., alleging that McKesson sent unsolicited marketing faxes in violation of the
Telephone Consumer Protection Act of 1991 (“TCPA”), as amended by the Junk Fax Protection Act of 2005 or JFPA, True Health
Chiropractic Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation, et al., No. CV-13-02219 (HG). Plaintiffs seek statutory damages
from $500 to $1,500 per violation plus injunctive relief. True Health Chiropractic later amended its complaint, adding McLaughlin
Chiropractic Associates as an additional named plaintiff and McKesson Technologies Inc. as a defendant. Both plaintiffs alleged
that defendants violated the TCPA by sending faxes that did not contain notices regarding how to opt out of receiving the faxes. On
July 16, 2015, plaintiffs filed a motion for class certification. On August 22, 2016, the court denied plaintiffs’ motion. On July 17,
2018, the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit Court affirmed in part and reversed in part the district court’s denial
of class certification and remanded the case to the district court for further proceedings. On August 13, 2019, the court granted
plaintiffs’ renewed motion for class certification. After class notice and the opt-out period, 9,490 fax numbers remain in the class,
representing 48,769 faxes received. On March 5, 2020, McKesson moved to decertify the class and moved for summary judgment
on plaintiffs’ claim for treble damages. Plaintiffs’ moved for summary judgment on the same day. The hearing for these motions is
scheduled for May 21, 2020.
On December 29, 2017, two investment funds holding shares in Celesio AG filed a complaint against McKesson Europe
Holdings (formerly known as “Dragonfly GmbH & Co KGaA”), a subsidiary of the Company, in a German court in Stuttgart,
Germany, Polygon European Equity Opportunity Master Fund et al. v. McKesson Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA, No. 18 O
455/17. On December 30, 2017, four investment funds, which had allegedly entered into swap transactions regarding shares in
Celesio AG that would have enabled them to decide whether to accept McKesson Europe Holdings’s takeover offer in its
acquisition of Celesio AG, filed a complaint, Davidson Kempner International (BVI) Ltd. et al. v. McKesson Europe Holdings
GmbH & Co. KGaA, No.16 O 475/17. The complaints allege that the public tender offer document published by McKesson Europe
in its acquisition of Celesio AG incorrectly stated that McKesson Europe’s acquisition of convertible bonds would not be treated as
a relevant acquisition of shares for the purposes of triggering minimum pricing considerations under Section 4 of the German
Takeover Offer Ordinance. On May 11, 2018, the court in Polygon dismissed the claims against McKesson Europe. Plaintiffs
appealed this ruling and, on December 19, 2018, the Higher Regional Court (Oberlandesgericht) of Stuttgart confirmed the full
dismissal of the Polygon matter. On February 4, 2019, plaintiffs filed a complaint against denial of leave to appeal with the Federal
Court of Justice (Bundesgerichtshof). On March 15, 2019, the lower court in Davidson similarly dismissed the case. Plaintiffs
appealed this ruling and, on October 9, 2019, the Higher Regional Court (Oberlandesgericht) of Stuttgart confirmed the full
dismissal of the Davidson matter. On November 13, 2019, plaintiffs filed a complaint against denial of leave to appeal with the
Federal Court of Justice (Bundesgerichtshof).
On March 5, 2018, the Company’s subsidiary, RxC Acquisition Company (d/b/a RxCrossroads), was served with a qui tam
complaint filed in July 2017 in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Illinois by a relator against RxC
Acquisition Company, among others, alleging that UCB, Inc., provided illegal “kickbacks” to providers, including nurse educator
services and reimbursement assistance services provided through RxC Acquisition Company, in violation of the Anti-Kickback
Statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false claims statutes. United States ex rel. CIMZNHCA, LLC v. UCB, Inc., et al.,
No. 17-cv-00765. The complaint seeks treble damages, civil penalties, and further relief. The United States and the states named in
the complaint have declined to intervene in the suit. On December 17, 2018, the United States filed a motion to dismiss the
complaint in its entirety; this motion was denied on April 15, 2019. On June 7, 2019, the court denied the United States’ motion for
reconsideration. On July 8, 2019, the United States appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit seeking
interlocutory review of the denial of its motion for reconsideration of the denial of the motion to dismiss the complaint. On
September 3, 2019, the United States District Court for the Southern District of Illinois stayed the district court proceedings
pending the appeal. The court set a trial date of April 5, 2021.
On April 16, 2013, the Company’s subsidiary, U.S. Oncology, Inc. (“USON”), was served with a third amended qui tam
complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by two relators, purportedly on behalf of the
United States, 21 states and the District of Columbia, against USON and five other defendants, alleging that USON solicited and
received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false
claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified amounts,
United States ex rel. Piacentile v. Amgen Inc., et al., CV 04-3983 (SJ). Previously, the United States declined to intervene in the
case as to all allegations and defendants except for Amgen. On September 30, 2013, the court granted the United States’ motion to
dismiss the claims pled against Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USON’s motion to dismiss the claims pled
against it, with leave to amend. On November 16, 2018, the relators filed a fourth amended complaint.
112
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On June 17, 2014, U.S. Oncology Specialty, LP (“USOS”) was served with a fifth amended qui tam complaint filed in the
United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by a relator alleging that USOS, among others, solicited and
received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the federal False Claims Act, and various state
false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified
amounts, United States ex rel. Hanks v. Amgen, Inc., et al., CV-08-03096 (SJ). These claims are based on the same grounds as the
Piacentile action referenced above. Previously, the United States declined to intervene in the case as to all allegations and
defendants except for Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USOS’s motion to dismiss and gave the relator leave to
file another action after the Piacentile action is no longer pending. The relator appealed this order to the United States Court of
Appeals for the Second Circuit; the parties are awaiting the Court’s decision.
On April 3, 2018, a second amended qui tam complaint was filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of
New York by a relator, purportedly on behalf of the United States, 30 states, the District of Columbia, and two cities against
McKesson Corporation, McKesson Specialty Care Distribution Corporation, McKesson Specialty Distribution LLC, McKesson
Specialty Care Distribution Joint Venture, L.P., Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation, Oncology Therapeutics Network
Joint Venture, L.P., US Oncology, Inc. and US Oncology Specialty, L.P., alleging that from 2001 through 2010 the defendants
repackaged and sold single-dose syringes of oncology medications in a manner that violated the federal False Claims Act and
various state and local false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit,
all in unspecified amounts, United States ex rel. Omni Healthcare Inc. v. McKesson Corporation, et al., 12-CV-06440 (NG). The
United States and the named states have declined to intervene in the case. On October 15, 2018, the Company filed a motion to
dismiss the complaint as to all named defendants. On February 4, 2019, the court granted the motion to dismiss in part and denied it
in part, leaving the Company and Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation as the only remaining defendants in the case. On
December 9, 2019, the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York ordered the unsealing of another complaint
filed by the same relator, alleging the same misconduct and seeking the same relief with respect to US Oncology, Inc., purportedly
on behalf of the same government entities, United States ex rel. Omni Healthcare, Inc. v. US Oncology, Inc., 19-cv-05125. The
United States and the named states declined to intervene in the case.
The Company is a defendant in an amended complaint filed on June 15, 2018 in a case pending in the United States District
Court for the Southern District of Illinois alleging that the Company’s subsidiary, McKesson Medical-Surgical Inc., among others,
violated the Sherman Act by restraining trade in the sale of safety and conventional syringes and safety IV catheters. Marion
Diagnostic Center, LLC v. Becton, Dickinson, et al., No. 18:1059. The action is filed on behalf of a purported class of purchasers,
and seeks treble damages and further relief, all in unspecified amounts. On July 20, 2018, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss.
On November 30, 2018, the district court granted the motion to dismiss, and dismissed the complaint with prejudice. On December
27, 2018, plaintiffs appealed the order to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit. On March 5, 2020, the United
States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit vacated the district court’s order, and ruled that dismissal was appropriate on
alternative grounds. The case was remanded to the district court to allow the plaintiffs an opportunity to amend their complaint.
On September 25, 2018, plaintiffs filed a complaint in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania
alleging that the Company and its subsidiary, McKesson Medical-Surgical Inc., among others, violated the Sherman Act by
restraining trade in the sale of generic drugs. Marion Diagnostic Center, LLC v. McKesson Corporation, et al., No. 2:18-cv-4137.
On June 26, 2019, the court granted the Company’s motion to dismiss and authorized plaintiffs to seek leave to amend the claims
against the Company. On March 11, 2020, the Company received a complaint alleging that the Company and other distributors
violated the Sherman Act by colluding with manufacturers to restrain trade in the sale of generic drugs. Reliable Pharmacy, et al. v.
Actavis Holdco US, et al., No. 2:19-cv-6044. The complaint seeks relief including treble damages, disgorgement, attorney fees, and
costs in unspecified amounts. On the same date, the plaintiffs moved to amend the new complaint.
On December 12, 2018, the Company received a class action complaint in the United States District Court for the Northern
District of California, alleging that McKesson and two of its former officers, CEO John Hammergren and CFO James Beer,
violated the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by reporting profits and revenues from 2013 until early 2017 that were false and
misleading, due to an alleged undisclosed conspiracy to fix the prices of generic drugs. Evanston Police Pension Fund v. McKesson
Corporation, No. 3:18-06525. On February 8, 2019, the court appointed the Pension Trust Fund for Operating Engineers as the lead
plaintiff. On April 10, 2019, the lead plaintiff filed an amended complaint that added insider trading allegations against defendant
Hammergren.
113
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On May 21, 2019, Jean E. Henry, a purported Company shareholder, filed a shareholder derivative complaint in the Superior
Court of San Francisco, California against certain current and former officers and directors of the Company, and the Company as a
nominal defendant, alleging violations of fiduciary duties and waste of corporate assets with respect to an alleged conspiracy to fix
the prices of generic drugs, Henry v. Tyler, et al., CGC-19-576119. On May 23, 2019, the Company removed the case to the United
States District Court for the Northern District of California, Case No. 19-cv-02869. On August 26, 2019, the plaintiff filed an
amended complaint, removing all claims except for an alleged breach of fiduciary duty by the named current and former officers
and directors of the Company. On January 21, 2020, the United States District Court for the Northern District of California granted
the defendants’ motion to dismiss the complaint, and on February 20, 2020, the plaintiff filed an amended complaint.
In July 2015, The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company (“A&P”), a former customer of the Company, filed for reorganization
in bankruptcy under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code in the Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of New
York. In re The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al., Case No. 15-23007. A suit filed against the Company in this
bankruptcy case seeks to recover approximately $68 million in alleged preferential transfers. The Official Committee of Unsecured
Creditors on behalf of the bankruptcy estate of The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation
d/b/a McKesson Drug Co., Adv. Proc. No. 17-08264.
In October 2019, the Company’s subsidiary RelayHealth Corporation (“RelayHealth”) was served with three purported class
action complaints filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois. The complaints allege that
RelayHealth violated the Sherman Act by entering into an agreement with co-defendant Surescripts, LLC not to compete in the
electronic prescription routing market, and by conspiring with Surescripts, LLC to monopolize that market, Powell Prescription
Center, et al. v. Surescripts, LLC, et al., No. 1:19-cv-06627; Intergrated Pharmaceutical Solutions LLC v. Surescripts, LLC, et al.,
1:19-cv-06778; Falconer Pharmacy, Inc. v. Surescripts LLC, et al., No. 1:19-cv-07035. In November 2019, three similar
complaints were filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois. Kennebunk Village Pharmacy, Inc. v.
SureScripts, LLC, et al., 1:19-cv-7445; Whitman v. SureScripts, LLC et al., No. 1:19-cv-7448; BBK Global Corp. v. SureScripts,
LLC et al., 1:19-cv-7640. In December 2019, the six actions were consolidated in the Northern District of Illinois. The complaints
seek relief including treble damages, attorney fees, and costs.
III. Government Subpoenas and Investigations
From time to time, the Company receives subpoenas or requests for information from various government agencies. The
Company generally responds to such subpoenas and requests in a cooperative, thorough and timely manner. These responses
sometimes require time and effort and can result in considerable costs being incurred by the Company. Such subpoenas and
requests can lead to the assertion of claims or the commencement of civil or criminal legal proceedings against the Company and
other members of the health care industry, as well as to settlements of claims against the Company. The Company responds to these
requests in the ordinary course of business.
114
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
As an example of the type of subpoenas or requests the Company receives from time to time, in August 2015, the Company
was served with a Civil Investigative Demand by the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Southern District of New York relating to
certain business analytics tools offered to its customers. In May 2017 and August 2018, respectively, the Company was served
with two separate Civil Investigative Demands by the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of New York relating to the
certification the Company obtained for two software products under the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services’
Electronic Health Record Incentive Program. In September 2017, the Company received a request for information and documents
from a group of approximately 40 state attorneys general related to an investigation into the factors contributing to the increasing
number of opioid-related hospitalizations and deaths in the United States. The Company also received civil investigative demands,
subpoenas or requests for information from several other state attorneys general on the same issues. In January 2019, the Company
was served with a subpoena by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Inspector General, related to the
Company’s participation in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program. In April and June 2019, the United States Attorney’s Office for the
Eastern District of New York served grand jury subpoenas seeking documents related to the Company’s anti-diversion policies and
procedures and its distribution of Schedule II controlled substances. The Company believes the subpoenas are part of a broader
investigation by that office into pharmaceutical manufacturers’ and distributors’ compliance with the Controlled Substances Act and
related statutes. In July 2019, the Drug Enforcement Administration served an administrative inspection warrant on the Company’s
distribution center in West Sacramento, California seeking information about the Company’s compliance with the Controlled
Substances Act and related statutes. On November 12, 2019, the New York Department of Financial Services sent a Notice of Intent
to Commence Enforcement Action to McKesson Corporation and PSS World Medical, Inc. for alleged violations of the New York
Insurance Law and/or New York Financial Services Law, and seeking civil monetary penalties, in connection with manufacturing
and distributing opioids in New York. In January 2020, the United States Attorney’s Office for the District of Massachusetts served
a Civil Investigative Demand on the Company seeking documents related to certain discounts and rebates paid to physician practice
customers.
IV. Environmental Matters
Primarily as a result of the operation of the Company’s former chemical businesses, which were fully divested by 1987, the
Company is involved in various matters pursuant to environmental laws and regulations. The Company has received claims and
demands from governmental agencies relating to investigative and remedial actions purportedly required to address environmental
conditions alleged to exist at five sites where it, or entities acquired by it, formerly conducted operations and the Company, by
administrative order or otherwise, has agreed to take certain actions at those sites, including soil and groundwater remediation.
Based on a determination by the Company’s environmental staff, in consultation with outside environmental specialists and
counsel, the current estimate of the Company’s probable loss associated with the remediation costs for these five sites is $10
million, net of amounts anticipated from third parties. The $10 million is expected to be paid out between April 2020 and March
2050. The Company has accrued for the estimated probable loss for these environmental matters.
The Company has been designated as a Potentially Responsible Party (“PRP”) under the Superfund law for environmental
assessment and cleanup costs as the result of its alleged disposal of hazardous substances at 14 sites. With respect to these sites,
numerous other PRPs have similarly been designated and while the current state of the law potentially imposes joint and several
liabilities upon PRPs, as a practical matter, costs of these sites are typically shared with other PRPs. At one of these sites, the
United States Environmental Protection Agency has selected a preferred remedy with an estimated cost of approximately $1.38
billion. It is not certain at this point in time what proportion of this estimated liability will be borne by the Company. Accordingly,
the Company’s estimated probable loss at those 14 sites is approximately $22.5 million, which has been accrued for in the
consolidated balance sheets. However, it is possible that the ultimate costs of these matters may exceed or be less than the reserves.
V. Value Added Tax Assessments
The Company operates in various countries outside the United States which collect value added taxes (“VAT”). The
determination of the manner in which a VAT applies to our foreign operations is subject to varying interpretations arising from the
complex nature of the tax laws. The Company has received assessments for VAT which are in various stages of appeal. The
Company disagrees with these assessments and believes that it has a strong legal argument to defend its tax positions. Certain VAT
assessments relate to years covered by an indemnification agreement. Due to the complex nature of the tax laws, it is not possible to
estimate the outcome of these matters. However, based on currently available information, the Company believes the ultimate
outcome of these matters will not have a material adverse effect on its financial position, cash flows or results of operations.
115
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
VI. Other Matters
The Company is involved in various other litigation, governmental proceedings and claims, not described above, that arise in
the normal course of business. While it is not possible to determine the ultimate outcome or the duration of such litigation,
governmental proceedings or claims, the Company believes, based on current knowledge and the advice of counsel, that such
litigation, proceedings and claims will not have a material impact on the Company’s financial position or results of operations.
22.Stockholders' Equity
Each share of the Company’s outstanding common stock is permitted one vote on proposals presented to stockholders and is
entitled to share equally in any dividends declared by the Company’s Board of Directors (the “Board”).
In July 2019, the Company’s quarterly dividend was raised from $0.39 to $0.41 per common share for dividends declared on or
after such date by the Board. Dividends were $1.62 per share in 2020, $1.51 per share in 2019 and $1.30 per share in 2018. The
Company anticipates that it will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future
dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon the Company’s future earnings, financial condition,
capital requirements and other factors.
Share Repurchase Plans
Stock repurchases may be made from time-to-time in open market transactions, privately negotiated transactions, through
accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by any combination of such methods. The timing of any repurchases and the
actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including the Company’s stock price, corporate and
regulatory requirements, restrictions under the Company’s debt obligations and other market and economic conditions.
Information regarding the share repurchase activity over the last three years is as follows:
 Share Repurchases (1)
(In millions, except price per share data)Total
Number of
Shares
       Purchased (2) (3)Average Price
Paid Per Share  Approximate
Dollar Value of
Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased
Under the
Programs
Balance, March 31, 2017    $ 2,746
Shares repurchased 10.5$ 151.06 (1,650)
Balance, March 31, 2018    1,096
Shares repurchase plans authorized    
May 2018    4,000
Shares repurchased 13.5$ 130.72 (1,627)
Balance, March 31, 2019    3,469
Shares repurchased 13.9$ 138.94 (1,934)
Balance, March 31, 2020    $ 1,535
(1) This table does not include shares tendered to satisfy the exercise price in connection with cashless exerc ises of employee stock options or
shares tender ed to satisfy tax withholding obligations in connection with employee equity awards. It also excludes shares related to the
Company’ s Split-of f of the Change Healthcare JV  as described below .
(2) All of the shares purchased were part of the publicly announced programs.
(3) The number of shares purchased reflects rounding adjustments.
During the last three years, the Company’s share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions and ASR
programs with third party financial institutions.
116
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In 2018, the Company repurchased 3.5 million of the Company’s shares for $500 million through open market transactions at
an average price per share of $144.43. In June 2017, August 2017 and March 2018, the Company entered into three separate ASR
programs with third-party financial institutions to repurchase $250 million, $400 million and $500 million of the Company’s
common stock. As of March 31, 2018, it completed and received a total of 1.5 million shares under the June 2017 ASR program
and a total of 2.7 million shares under the August 2017 ASR program. In addition, the Company received 2.5 million shares
representing the initial number of shares due in March 2018 and an additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019. The
March 2018 ASR program was completed at an average price per share of $143.66 during the first quarter of 2019. The total
authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $1.1 billion at March 31, 2018.
In May 2018, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of the Company’s common stock. The total
authorization outstanding for repurchases of the Company’s common stock increased to $5.1 billion. During 2019, the Company
repurchased 10.4 million of the Company’s shares for $1.4 billion through open market transactions at an average price per share of
$132.14. In December 2018, the Company entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $250
million of the Company’s common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 2.1 million shares at
an average price per share of $117.98. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $3.5
billion at March 31, 2019.
In 2019, the Company retired 5.0 million or $542 million of its treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable
state law, these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with the Company’s
accounting policy, it allocates any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained
earnings. Accordingly, its retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during
2019.
In 2020, the Company repurchased 9.2 million of the Company’s shares for $1.3 billion through open market transactions at an
average price per share of $144.68.
During 2020, the Company entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $600 million of
the Company’s common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 4.7 million shares at an
average price per share of $127.68. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $1.5
billion at March 31, 2020.
On March 9, 2020, the Company completed the Split-off of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV. In connection with the
Split-off, the Company distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of SpinCo common stock, which held all of the Company’s
interests in the Change Healthcare JV, to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares
of McKesson stock, which are now held as treasury stock on the Company’s consolidated balance sheet. Following consummation
of the exchange offer, on March 10, 2020, SpinCo merged with and into Change Healthcare, Inc. with each share of SpinCo
common stock converted into one share of Change Healthcare, Inc. common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being
paid in lieu of fractional shares of Change common stock. See Note 2 , “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture,” for more
information.
117
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Information regarding other comprehensive income (loss) including noncontrolling interests and redeemable noncontrolling
interests, net of tax, by component is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
 (In millions) 2020  2019  2018
Foreign currency translation adjustments:(1)    
Foreign currency translation adjustments arising during period, net of income
tax expense of nil, nil and nil (2) (3)$ (151) $ (431) $ 804
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 (151) (431) 804
Unrealized gains (losses) on net investment hedges (4)    
Unrealized gains (losses) on net investment hedges arising during period, net of
income tax (expense) benefit of ($30), ($71), and $95 85 241 (180)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 85 241 (180)
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges:     
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges arising during period, net of
income tax (expense) benefit of ($12), ($4), and $9 86 24 (30)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 86 24 (30)
Changes in retirement-related benefit plans:     
Net actuarial gain (loss) and prior service credit (cost) arising during the period,
net of income tax (expense) benefit of ($8), $5, and ($2) (5)27 (51) 25
Amortization of actuarial loss, prior service cost and transition obligation, net of
income tax (expense) benefit of $1, nil, and ($2) (6)2 9 5
Foreign currency translation adjustments and other, net of income tax expense of
nil, nil and nil 6 10 (15)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of ($33), nil and
nil (7)94 — —
 129 (32) 15
   
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax $ 149 $ (198) $ 609
(1) Foreign currency translation adjustments primarily result from the conversion of non-U.S. dollar financial statements of the Company’ s
foreign subsidiary McKesson Europe into the Company’ s reporting currency , U.S. dollars.
(2) The 2020 net foreign currency translation losses of $151 million were primarily due to the weakening of the Euro and Canadian dollar
against the U.S. dollar , partially offset by the strengthening of the British pound sterling from April 1, 2019 to March 31, 2020. The 2019 net
foreign curren cy translation losses of $431 million were primarily due to the weakening of the Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian
dollar against the U.S. dollar from April 1, 2018 to March 31, 2019. The 2018 net foreign currency trans lation gains of $804 millio n were
primarily due to the streng thening of the Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar against the U.S. dollar from April 1, 2017 to
March 31, 2018.
(3) 2020 and 2018 include net foreign currency translation gains of $1 million  and $189 million  and 2019 includes net foreign currency
translation losses of $61 million  attributable to noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
(4) 2020, 2019 and 2018 include foreign currency gains of $39 million  and $259 million  and losses of $268 million  on the net investment hedg es
from the Euro and British pound sterling-denominated notes. 2020, 2019 and 2018 also include foreign currency gains of $76 million  and
$53 million  and losses of $7 million  on the net investment hedges from the cross-currency swaps.
(5) The 2020 net actuarial gain of $2 million and 2019 and 2018 net actuarial losses of $5 million and $4 million were attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
(6) Pre-tax amou nt was reclassified into cost of sales and operating expenses in the consolidated statements of operations. The related tax
expense was reclassified into income tax expense in the consolidated statements of operations.
(7) Primarily reflects a reclass ification of losses in 2020 upon the termination of the Plan from accumulated other comprehensive loss to other
income (expense), net in the Company’ s consolidated statement of operations.   
118
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Information regarding changes in the Company’s accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) by component are as
follows:
 Foreign Currency Translation
Adjustments    
(In millions)Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments,
Net of TaxUnrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Net
Investment
Hedges,
Net of TaxUnrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
Hedges,
Net of Tax Unrealized
Net Gains
(Losses) and
Other
Components
of Benefit
Plans, Net of
TaxTotal
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Balance at March 31, 2018 $ (1,258)$ (188)$ (61) $ (210)$ (1,717)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications (431) 241 24 (41) (207)
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other — — — 9 9
Other comprehensive income (loss) (431) 241 24 (32) (198)
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests (61) — — (5) (66)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson (370) 241 24 (27) (132)
Balance at March 31, 2019 (1,628) 53 (37) (237) (1,849)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications (151) 85 86 33 53
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other — — — 96 96
Other comprehensive income (loss) (151) 85 86 129 149
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests 1 — — 2 3
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson (152) 85 86 127 146
Balance at March 31, 2020 $ (1,780)$ 138$ 49 $ (110)$ (1,703)
23.Related Party Balances and Transactions
During the fourth quarter of 2018, a public benefit California foundation (“Foundation”) was established to provide opioid
education to patients, caregivers, and providers, address policy issues, and increase patient access to life-saving treatments. Certain
officers of the Company also serve as directors and officers of the Foundation. In March 2018, the Company made a pledge to the
Foundation and incurred a pre-tax charitable contribution expense of $100 million ($64 million after-tax) for 2018, which was
recorded under the caption, “Selling, distribution and administrative expenses,” in the consolidated statement of operations. The
Company had a pledge payable balance of $100 million to the Foundation as of March 31, 2018, which was included under the
caption “Other accrued liabilities” in its consolidated balance sheet. The pledge was fully paid in 2019. Additionally, during the
fourth quarter of 2020, the Company contributed $20 million to the McKesson Foundation, which supports the Company’s
employees and their community involvement efforts, with a special focus on cancer. A portion of this contribution was directed to
an emergency employee assistance fund administered by the Emergency Assistance Foundation, an independent nonprofit
organization, to provide support for employees impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic.
119
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
McKesson Europe has investments in pharmacies located across Europe that are accounted for under the equity method.
McKesson Europe maintains distribution arrangements with these pharmacies for the sale of related goods and services under
which revenues of $141 million, $137 million, and $154 million are included in the consolidated statements of operations for the
years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 and receivables related to these transactions included in the consolidated balance
sheets were not material as of March 31, 2020 and 2019.
In 2020 and 2019, the Company’s pharmaceutical sales to one of its equity method investees in the U.S. Pharmaceutical and
Specialty Solutions segment totaled $60 million and $34 million. Trade receivables related to these transactions from this investee
were not material as of March 31, 2020 and 2019.
Refer to Financial Note 2, “Investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture,” for information regarding related party balances
and transactions with Change Healthcare Inc. and Change Healthcare JV.
24.Segments of Business
The Company reports its financial results in three reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European
Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that are not
significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are included in Other. The factors for determining the
reportable segments include the manner in which management evaluates the performance of the Company combined with the
nature of the individual business activities. The Company evaluates the performance of its operating segments on a number of
measures, including revenues and operating profit before interest expense and income taxes. Assets by operating segment are not
reviewed by management for the purpose of assessing performance or allocating resources.
The Company’s U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment distributes pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related
products and also provides pharmaceutical solutions to life sciences companies in the United States.
The Company’s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and
retail customers and serves patients and consumers in 13 European countries through its own pharmacies and participating
pharmacies that operate under brand partnership and franchise arrangements.
The Company’s Medical-Surgical Solutions segment distributes medical-surgical supplies and provides logistics and other
services to healthcare providers in the United States.
Other primarily consists of the following:
•McKesson Canada which distributes pharmaceutical and medical products and operates Rexall Health retail pharmacies;
•McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions which provides innovative technologies that support retail pharmacies; and
•the Company’s investment in the Change Healthcare JV which was split-off from the Company in the fourth quarter of
2020.
Corporate includes income and expenses associated with administrative functions and projects, and the results of certain
investments. Corporate expenses, net are allocated to operating segments to the extent that these items are directly attributable.
120
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Financial information relating to the Company’s reportable operating segments and reconciliations to the consolidated totals is
as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Revenues    
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions (1)$ 183,341$ 167,763$ 162,587
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (1)27,390 27,242 27,320
Medical-Surgical Solutions (1)8,305 7,618 6,611
Other 12,015 11,696 11,839
Total Revenues $ 231,051$ 214,319$ 208,357
    
Operating profit (loss) (2)   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions (3)$ 2,767$ 2,697$ 2,535
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (4)(261) (1,978) (1,681)
Medical-Surgical Solutions 499 455 461
Other (5) (6) (7) (8) (595) 394 (107)
Total 2,410 1,568 1,208
Corporate Expenses, Net (9)(1,017) (694) (564)
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — — (122)
Interest Expense (249) (264) (283)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes $ 1,144$ 610$ 239
    
Depreciation and amortization (10)   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 228$ 238$ 210
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 235 257 296
Medical-Surgical Solutions 136 118 97
Other 187 214 237
Corporate 136 122 111
Total $ 922$ 949$ 951
    
Expenditures for long-lived assets (11)   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 94$ 88$ 126
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 95 85 104
Medical-Surgical Solutions 36 110 34
Other 61 68 42
Corporate 76 75 99
Total $ 362$ 426$ 405
    
Revenues, net by geographic area
United States $ 192,709$ 176,296$ 169,943
Foreign 38,342 38,023 38,414
Total Revenues $ 231,051$ 214,319$ 208,357
121
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
(1) Revenues from services represent less than 1% of the Compa ny’s U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty  Solutions segment’ s total revenues, less
than 10% of the Company’ s Europe an Pharmaceutical Solutions segment’ s total revenues and less than 2% of the Company’ s Medical-
Surgical Solutions segment’ s total revenues.
(2) Segment operating profit (loss) includes gross profit, net of operating expenses, as well as other income (expense), net, for the Company’ s
operating segments.
(3) The Company’ s U.S. Pharm aceutical and Specialty Solutions segment’ s operating profit for 2020 , 2019  and 2018  includes pre-tax credits of
$252 million , $210 million  and $99 million  ($186 million , $156 million  and $64 million  after-tax) related to the LIFO method of accounting
for inventories. Operating profit for 2020, 2019 and 2018 also includes $22 millio n, $202 millio n and $144 millio n of cash receipts for the
Company’ s share of antitru st legal settlements. In addition, operating profit for 2019 includes a pre-tax charge of $61 millio n ($45 millio n
after-tax) related to a customer bankruptcy and 2018 includes a pre-tax gain of $43 millio n ($26 millio n after-tax) from the sale of an equity
investment.
(4) European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment’ s operating loss for 2020 includes a charge of $275 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to remeasure
to fair value the assets and liabilities of the Company’ s German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture, and for 2020, 2019
and 2018 also includes pre-tax long-lived asset impai rment charges of $82 million , $210 million  and $446 million  ($66 million , $172 million
and $410 million  after-tax). Operating loss for 2019 and 2018 includes pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1.8 billion  and $1.3 billion
(pre-tax and after -tax).
(5) Operating loss for Other for 2020 includes a pre-tax impairment charge of $1.2 billion ($864 million after-tax) and a pre-tax dilution loss of
$246 millio n ($184 millio n after-tax) associated with the Company’ s investment in the Change Healthcare JV, along with an estimat ed gain
of $414 million  (pre-tax and after -tax) related to the split-of f of the Change Healthcare JV .
(6) Operating profit (loss) for Other for 2020, 2019 and 2018 includes pre-tax goodwill and long-lived asset impairment charges of $32 million ,
$56 million and $488 million (pre-tax and after-tax) recognized for the Company’ s Rexall Health retail business. The 2019 operating profit
for Other also includes a pre-tax gain from an escrow settlement of $97 millio n (pre-ta x and after-tax) representing certain indemnity and
other claims related to the Company’ s 2017 acquisitio n of Rexall Health. In addition, operating profit for 2019 includes pre-tax restructuring
and asset impairment charges of $91 million  ($86 million  after-tax), primarily associ ated with lease and other exit-related costs and a pre-tax
gain of $56 million  ($41 million  after -tax) recognized from the sale of an equity investment.
(7) Operating profit for Other for 2019 includes a pre-tax credit of $90 million ($66 million after-tax) for the derecognition of the TRA  liability
payable to the shareholder s of Change. Operating profit (loss) for Other also includes the Company’ s proportionate share of loss from the
Change Healthcare JV  of $119 million , $194 million  and $248 million  for 2020, 2019 and 2018.
(8) Operating loss for Other for 2018 includes a pre-tax gain of $109 million  ($30 million  after-tax) from the sale of the Company’ s EIS business
and a pre-tax credit of $46 million  ($30 million  after -tax) representing a reduction in its TRA  liability .
(9) Corporate expenses, net, for 2020 include pre-tax settlement charges of $122 million ($90 million after-tax) for the termination of the
Company’ s defined benefit pension plan and a settlement charge of $82 million  ($61 million  after-tax) related to opioid claims. Corporate
expenses, net, for 2019 include pre-tax restructuring and asset impairment charges of $94 million  ($70 million  after-tax) primarily associa ted
with employee severance and other exit-related costs.
(10) Amounts primarily consist of amortization of acquired intangible assets purchased in connection with business acquisitions and capitalized
software for internal use.
(11)Long-lived assets consist of property , plant and equipment.
122
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Segment assets and property, plant and equipment, net by geographic areas were as follows:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
Segment assets   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 34,927$ 32,310
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 9,499 7,829
Medical-Surgical Solutions 5,395 5,260
Other 7,944 11,006
Corporate 3,482 3,267
Total $ 61,247$ 59,672
   
Property, plant and equipment, net
United States $ 1,642$ 1,698
Foreign 723 850
Total $ 2,365$ 2,548
123
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
25.Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited)
The quarterly results of operations are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the entire year. Selected
quarterly financial information for the last two years is as follows:
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)First
QuarterSecond
Quarter  Third
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
Fiscal 2020     
Revenues $ 55,728$ 57,616 $ 59,172 $ 58,535
Gross Profit (1)2,787 2,867 3,033 3,336
Income (Loss) After Income Taxes:     
Continuing operations (1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6)$ 483$ (676) $ 247 $ 1,072
Discontinued operations (6) (1) (5) 6
Net Income (Loss) $ 477$ (677) $ 242 $ 1,078
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to McKesson
Corporation $ 423$ (730) $ 186 $ 1,021
Earnings (loss) Per Common Share Attributable
to McKesson Corporation (7)    
Diluted (8)    
Continuing operations $ 2.27$ (3.99) $ 1.06 $ 5.82
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.03) 0.03
Total $ 2.24$ (3.99) $ 1.03 $ 5.85
Basic     
Continuing operations $ 2.28$ (3.99) $ 1.06 $ 5.86
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.02) 0.03
Total $ 2.25$ (3.99) $ 1.04 $ 5.89
(1) Gross profit for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2020 includes pre-tax credits of $15 million , $33 million , $66 million  and $138
million  ($11 million , $25 million , $49 million  and $101 million  after -tax) related to the LIFO method of accounting for inventories.
(2) Financial results for the fourth quarter of 2020 include an estimated gain of $414 millio n (pre-ta x and after-tax) related to the split-of f of the
Change Healthcare JV. Financial results for the second quarter of 2020 include a pre-tax impairment charge of $1.2 billion  ($864 million
after-tax) and pre-tax dilution loss of $246 millio n ($184 millio n after-tax) associated with the Company’ s investment in the Change
Healthcare JV .
(3) Financial results for the third quarter of 2020 includes a charge of $282 millio n (pre-ta x and after-tax) to remeasure to fair value the assets
and liabilities of the Company’ s German wholesale business to be contributed to a joint venture, pre-tax long-lived asset impairment charges
of $64 millio n ($53 millio n after-tax) within the Company’ s European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, and goodwill and long-live d asset
impairment char ges of $32 million  (pre-tax and after -tax) recognized for the Company’ s Rexall Health retail business.
(4) Financial results for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2020 include the Company’ s proportionate share of income from the
Change Healthcare JV  of $4 million  and losses of $51 million , $28 million  and $44 million .
(5) Financial results for the second quarter of 2020 includes a pre-tax settlement charge of $105 million ($78 million after-tax) for the
termination of the Company’ s defined benefit pension plan.
(6) Financial results for the second quarter of 2020 includes a pre-tax settlement charge of $82 million ($61 million after-tax) related to opioid s
claims.
(7) Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(8) As a result of the Company ’s reported net loss for the second quarter of 2020, potentially dilutive securities were excluded from the per share
computations for that quarter due to their antidilutive ef fect.
 
124
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Concluded)
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
Fiscal 2019    
Revenues $ 52,607$ 53,075$ 56,208 $ 52,429
Gross Profit (1) (2)2,779 2,804 2,970 3,201
Income (Loss) after Income Taxes:    
Continuing operations (1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7)$ (81)$ 552$ 527 $ (744)
Discontinued operations 1 1 (1) —
Net Income (Loss) $ (80)$ 553$ 526 $ (744)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to McKesson
Corporation $ (138)$ 499$ 469 $ (796)
Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share Attributable
to McKesson Corporation (8)   
Diluted (9)   
Continuing operations $ (0.69)$ 2.51$ 2.41 $ (4.17)
Discontinued operations 0.01 — (0.01) —
Total $ (0.68)$ 2.51$ 2.40 $ (4.17)
Basic    
Continuing operations $ (0.69)$ 2.52$ 2.42 $ (4.17)
Discontinued operations 0.01 — (0.01) —
Total $ (0.68)$ 2.52$ 2.41 $ (4.17)
(1) Gross profit for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2019 includes pre-tax credits of $21 million , $22 million , $21 million  and $146
million  ($15 million , $17 million , $15 million  and $109 million  after -tax) related to the LIFO method of accounting for inventories.
(2) Gross profit for the first, third and fourth quarters of 2019 includes $35 millio n, $104 millio n, and $63 millio n of cash receipts for the
Company’ s share of antitrust legal settlements.
(3) Financial results for the first and fourth quarters of 2019 include goodwill impairment charges of $570 million and $1.2 billion (both pre-tax
and after -tax) within the Company’ s two reporting units within the European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
(4) Financial results for the first and fourth quarters of 2019 include pre-tax asset impairment charges of $20 million ($16 million after-tax) and
$190 million  ($156 million  after-tax) primarily for the Company’ s U.K. retail business. Financial results for the third quarter of 2019 include
asset impairment char ges of $35 million  (pre-tax and after -tax) for the Company’ s Rexall Health retail business.
(5) Financial results for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2019 include the Company’ s proportionate share of loss from the Change
Healthcare JV  of $56 million , $56 million , $50 million  and $32 million .
(6) Financial results for the first quarter of 2019 include a gain from an escrow settlement of $97 millio n (pre-ta x and after-tax) representing
certain indemnity and other claims related to the Company’ s 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health.
(7) Financial results for the second quarter of 2019 include a pre-tax credit of $90 million ($66 million after-tax) for the derecogn ition of the
TRA  liability payable to the shareholders of Change.
(8) Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(9) As a result of the Company’ s reported net loss for the first and fourth quarters of 2019, potentially dilutive  securities were excluded from the
per share computations for those quarters due to their antidilutive ef fect.
125
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, with the participation of other members of the Company’s
management, have evaluated the effectiveness of the Company’s “disclosure controls and procedures” (as such term is defined in
Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) as of the end of the period covered by this report and have concluded that our
disclosure controls and procedures are effective based on their evaluation of these controls and procedures as required by paragraph
(b) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15.
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management’s report on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Exchange Act
Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) and the related report of our independent registered public accounting firm are included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, under the headings, “Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting”
and “Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” and are incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Controls
There was no change in our internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation required by
paragraph (d) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15 that occurred during our fourth quarter of 2020 that has materially affected,
or is reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information.
None.
126
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information about our Directors is incorporated by reference from the discussion under Item 1 of our Proxy Statement for the
2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”) under the heading “Election of Directors.” Information about our
Executive Officers is incorporated by reference from the discussion in Part I of this report under the heading “Information about
our Executive Officers.” Information about our Audit Committee, including the members of the committee and our Audit
Committee Financial Expert, is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the headings “Audit Committee,” and “Audit
Committee Report” in our Proxy Statement.
Information about the Code of Conduct applicable to all employees, officers and directors can be found on our website,
www.mckesson.com, under the caption “Investors - Corporate Governance.” The Company’s Corporate Governance Guidelines
and Charters for the Audit, Compensation and Governance Committees can also be found on our website under the same caption.
The Company intends to post on its website required information regarding any amendment to, or waiver from, the Code of
Conduct that applies to our Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Controller and persons performing similar functions
within four business days after any such amendment or waiver.
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
Information with respect to this item is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the heading “Executive
Compensation” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
Information about security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is incorporated by reference from the
discussion under the heading “Principal Shareholders” in our Proxy Statement.
The following table sets forth information as of March 31, 2020 with respect to the plans under which the Company’s common
stock is authorized for issuance:
Plan Category
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)Number  of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rightsWeighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights (1) Number  of securities
remaining available for
futur e issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in the first
column)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 4.8 (2)$ 180.48 23.1 (3)
Equity compensation plans not approved by
security holders  — $ — —
(1) The weighted-average exercise price set forth in this column is calculated excluding outstanding restricted stock unit (“RSU”) awards, since
recipients are not required to pay an exercise price to receive the shares subject to these awards.
(2) Represents option and RSU awards outstanding under the following plans: (i) 1997 Non-Employee Directors’  Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan; (ii) the 2005 Stock Plan; and (iii) the 2013 Stock Plan.
(3) Represents 2,640,734  shares  available for purchase under the 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan and 20,423,484  shares  available for grant
under the 2013 Stock Plan.
The following are descriptions of equity plans that have been approved by the Company’s stockholders. The plans are
administered by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors, except for the portion of the 2013 Stock Plan and 2005
Stock Plan related to non-employee directors, which is administered by the Board of Directors or its Governance Committee.
127
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
2013 Stock Plan: The 2013 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 22, 2013 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 31, 2013. The 2013 Stock Plan permits the grant of awards in the form of stock options, stock
appreciation rights, restricted stock (“RS”), restricted stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based restricted stock units (“PeRSUs”),
performance shares and other share-based awards. The number of shares reserved for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan equals the
sum of (i) 30,000,000 shares, (ii) the number of shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date of
the 2013 Stock Plan, and (iii) the number of shares that become available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the
effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan. For any one share of common stock issued in connection with an RS, RSU, performance
share or other full share award, three and one-half shares shall be deducted from the shares available for future grants. Shares of
common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, including in respect of the payment of
applicable taxes, or shares repurchased on the open market with proceeds from the exercise of options shall not be returned to the
reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan. Shares withheld to satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting
of a full-share award shall be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan.
Stock options are granted at no less than fair market value and those options granted under the 2013 Stock Plan generally have
a contractual term of seven years. Options generally become exercisable in four equal annual installments beginning one year after
the grant date. The vesting of RS or RSUs is determined by the Compensation Committee at the time of grant. Beginning with
awards granted in fiscal year 2020, RS and RSUs generally vest over three years. RSUs granted under the PeRSU program vest
three years following the end of the performance period. The Company’s executive officers and other members of senior
management are annually granted performance awards called performance stock units (“PSUs”), which have a three-year
performance period and are payable in shares without an additional vesting period.
Non-employee directors may be granted an award on the date of each annual meeting of the stockholders for up to 5,000
RSUs, as determined by the Board. Such non-employee director award is fully vested on the date of the grant.
2005 Stock Plan: The 2005 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 25, 2005 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 27, 2005. The 2005 Stock Plan permits the granting of up to 42.5 million shares in the form of
stock options, RS, RSUs, PeRSUs, performance shares and other share-based awards. For any one share of common stock issued in
connection with an RS, RSU, performance share or other full-share award, two shares shall be deducted from the shares available
for future grants. Shares of common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, shares withheld to
satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting of a full-share award or shares repurchased on the open market with proceeds from the
exercise of options shall not be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2005 Stock Plan. Stock options
were granted at no less than fair market value and options granted under the 2005 Stock Plan generally have a contractual term of
seven years.
Following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, no further shares were made subject to award under the 2005 Stock Plan.
Shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan, and shares that become
available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, will be available for awards under
the 2013 Stock Plan.
1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and Deferral Plan: The 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity
Compensation and Deferral Plan was approved by the Company’s stockholders on July 30, 1997; however, stockholder approval of
the 2005 Stock Plan on July 27, 2005 had the effect of terminating the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan such that no new awards would be granted under the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan.
2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the “ESPP”): The ESPP is intended to qualify as an “employee stock purchase plan”
within the meaning of Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. In March 2002, the Board amended the ESPP to allow for
participation in the plan by employees of certain of the Company’s international and other subsidiaries. As to those employees, the
ESPP does not qualify under Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. Currently, 21.1 million shares have been approved by
stockholders for issuance under the ESPP.
The ESPP is implemented through a continuous series of three-month purchase periods (“Purchase Periods”) during which
contributions can be made toward the purchase of common stock under the plan.
128
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Each eligible employee may elect to authorize regular payroll deductions during the next succeeding Purchase Period, the
amount of which may not exceed 15% of a participant’s compensation. At the end of each Purchase Period, the funds withheld by
each participant will be used to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock. The purchase price of each share of the
Company’s common stock is 85% of the fair market value of each share on the last day of the applicable Purchase Period. In
general, the maximum number of shares of common stock that may be purchased by a participant for each calendar year is
determined by dividing $25,000 by the fair market value of one share of common stock on the offering date.
There currently are no equity awards outstanding that were granted under equity plans that were not submitted for approval by
the Company’s stockholders.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
Information with respect to certain transactions with directors and management is incorporated by reference from the Proxy
Statement under the heading “Related Party Transactions Policy and Transactions with Related Persons.” Information regarding
Director independence is incorporated by reference from the Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence.”
Additional information regarding certain related party balances and transactions is included in the Financial Review section of this
report and Financial Note 23, “Related Party Balances and Transactions” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this
report.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information regarding principal accountant fees and services is set forth under the heading “Ratification of Appointment of
Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company’s Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm for Fiscal 2021” in our Proxy Statement
and all such information is incorporated herein by reference.
129
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule.
 Page
(a)(1) Consolidated Financial Statements
 
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
 
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 57
 
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 58
 
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2020 and 2019 59
 
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 60
 
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 61
 
Financial Notes 62
 
(a)(2) Financial Statement Schedule
 
Schedule II-Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 131
 
All other schedules not included have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they
are required or because the required information, where material, is shown in the financial statements,
financial notes or supplementary financial information.
 
(a)(3) Exhibits submitted with this Annual Report on Form 10-K as filed with the SEC and those
incorporated by reference to other filings are listed on the Exhibit Index 132
 
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
None.
130
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SCHEDULE II
SUPPLEMENTARY CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
For the Years Ended March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
(In millions)
  Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning of
YearCharged to
Costs and
Expenses Charged to
Other
Accounts (3)Deductions
From
Allowance
Accounts (1)Balance at
End of
Year (2)
Year Ended March 31, 2020      
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 273 $ 91 $ (19)$ (93)$ 252
Other allowances 24 — — 6 30
 $ 297 $ 91 $ (19)$ (87)$ 282
      
Year Ended March 31, 2019      
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 187 $ 132 $ (1)$ (45)$ 273
Other allowances 39 — (15) — 24
 $ 226 $ 132 $ (16)$ (45)$ 297
      
Year Ended March 31, 2018      
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 243 $ 44 $ 13 $ (113)$ 187
Other allowances 42 — (3) — 39
 $ 285 $ 44 $ 10 $ (113)$ 226
      
 2020 2019 2018
(1)Deductions:    
 Written off $ (93) $ (45) $ (113)
 Credited to other accounts 6 — —
 Total $ (87) $ (45) $ (113)
    
(2)Amounts shown as deductions from current and non-current receivables
(current allowances are $265 million, $279 million and $216 million
at March 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018) $ 282 $ 297 $ 226
    
(3)Primarily represents reclassifications to other balance sheet accounts.    
131
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
EXHIBIT INDEX
The agreements included as exhibits to this report are included to provide information regarding their terms and not intended to
provide any other factual or disclosure information about the Company or the other parties to the agreements. The agreements may
contain representations and warranties by each of the parties to the applicable agreement that were made solely for the benefit of
the other parties to the applicable agreement, and;
•should not in all instances be treated as categorical statements of fact, but rather as a way of allocating the risk to one of
the parties if those statements prove to be inaccurate;
•may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material to you or other
investors; and
•were made only as of the date of the applicable agreement or such other date or dates as may be specified in the agreement
and are subject to more recent developments.
Accordingly, these representations and warranties may not describe the actual state of affairs as of the date they were made or
at any other time.
Exhibits identified under “Incorporated by Reference” in the table below are on file with the Commission and are incorporated
by reference as exhibits hereto.
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
2.1 Agreement of Contribution and Sale, dated as of June 28, 2016,
by and among McKesson Corporation, PF2 NewCo LLC, PF2
NewCo Intermediate Holdings, LLC, PF2 NewCo Holdings,
LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc., Change Healthcare, Inc., Change
Aggregator L.P. and H&F Echo Holdings, L.P.8-K 1-13252 2.1 July 5, 2016
2.2 Amendment No. 1 to Agreement Contribution and Sale, dated as
of March 1, 2017, by and among by and among Change
Healthcare LLC, Change Healthcare Intermediate Holdings,
LLC, Change Healthcare Holdings, LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc.,
Change Healthcare, Inc., a Delaware corporation, for itself and
in its capacity as Echo Representative, certain affiliates of The
Blackstone Group, L.P., certain affiliates of Hellman &
Friedman LLC, and McKesson Corporation, a Delaware
corporation.8-K 1-13252 2.1 March 7, 2017
2.3 Separation and Distribution Agreement by and between
McKesson Corporation, PF2 SpinCo, Inc., Change Healthcare
Inc., Change Healthcare LLC, Change Intermediate Holdings,
LLC and Change Healthcare Holdings, LLC (including form of
Tax Matters Agreement)8-K 1-13252 2.1 February 10, 2020
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Company, as filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on July
27, 2011.8-K 1-13252 3.1 August 2, 2011
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended
March 11, 20208-K 1-13252 3.1 March 13, 2020
4.1 Indenture, dated as of March 11, 1997, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The First National Bank of Chicago, as
trustee.10-K 1-13252 4.4 June 19, 1997
4.2 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 11, 1997, and related
Form of 2027 Note.S-4 333-30899 4.2 July 8, 1997
4.3 Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A., as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 March 5, 2007
132
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
4.4 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 28, 2011, to
the Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, among the Company,
as issuer, the Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
(formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A.), and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
and related Form of 2021 Note and Form of 2041 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 February 28, 2011
4.5 Indenture, dated as of December 4, 2012, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 December 4, 2012
4.6 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of December 4, 2012, and related
Form of 2022 Note.  8-K 1-13252 4.2 December 4, 2012
4.7 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 8, 2013, and related
Form of 2023 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 8, 2013
4.8 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 10, 2014, and related
Form of 2024 Note, and Form of 2044 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 10, 2014
4.9 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 17, 2017, and related
Form of 2021 Euro Note, Form of 2025 Euro Note, and Form of
2029 Sterling Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 17, 2017
4.10 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 12, 2018, and related
Form of 2026 Euro Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 13, 2018
4.11 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 16, 2018, and related
Form of 2028 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 21, 2018
4.12 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of November 30, 2018, and related
Form of 2020 Note and Form of 2029 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 November 30, 2018
4.13†Description of the Company’s Securities. — — — —
10.1*McKesson Corporation 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity
Compensation and Deferral Plan, as amended through January
29, 2003.10-K 1-13252 10.4 June 10, 2004
10.2*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Profit Sharing Investment
Plan, as amended and restated on January 29, 2003.10-K 1-13252 10.6 June 6, 2003
10.3*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Retirement Savings Plan,
as amended and restated effective July 30, 2019.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 October 30, 2019
10.4*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan II, as amended and restated as of October 28, 2004, and
Amendment No. 1 thereto effective July 25, 2007.10-K 1-13252 10.7 May 7, 2008
10.5*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan III, as amended and restated effective July 30, 2019.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 30, 2019
10.6*McKesson Corporation Executive Survivor Benefits Plan, as
amended and restated as of January 20, 2010.8-K 1-13252 10.1 January 25, 2010
10.7*McKesson Corporation Severance Policy for Executive
Employees, as amended and restated as of April 23, 2013.10-K 1-13252 10.11 May 7, 2013
10.8*†McKesson Corporation Change in Control Policy for Selected
Executive Employees, as amended and restated as set forth April
28, 2020 effective January 28, 2020.— — — —
10.9*McKesson Corporation Management Incentive Plan, effective
July 29, 2015.8-K 1-13252 10.1 July 31, 2015
10.10*Form of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation Management
Incentive Plan, effective May 26, 2015.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 July 29, 2015
133
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
10.11*McKesson Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended
and restated effective May 26, 2015, as amended effective
October 23, 2018.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 25, 2018
10.12*Forms of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan, effective May 24, 2016.10-K 1-13252 10.14 May 5, 2016
10.13*McKesson Corporation 2005 Stock Plan, as amended and
restated on July 28, 2010.10-Q 1-13252 10.4 July 30, 2010
10.14*Forms of (i) Statement of Terms and Conditions, (ii) Stock
Option Grant Notice and (iii), Restricted Stock Unit Agreement,
each as applicable to Awards under the McKesson Corporation
2005 Stock Plan.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 July 26, 2012
10.15*McKesson Corporation 2013 Stock Plan, as adopted on May 22,
2013.8-K 1-13252 10.1 August 2, 2013
10.16*†Forms of Statement of Terms and Conditions and Grant Notices
Applicable to Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation
2013 Stock Plan.— — — —
10.17Third Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Change Healthcare LLC, dated as of March 1,
2017.8-K 1-13252 10.1 March 7, 2017
10.18Form of Commercial Paper Dealer Agreement between
McKesson Corporation, as Issuer, and the Dealer.10-K 1-13252 10.19 May 5, 2016
10.19Credit Agreement, dated as of October 22, 2015, among the
Company and Certain Subsidiaries, as Borrowers, Bank of
America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A.
(acting through its Canada Branch), Citibank, N.A. and Barclays
Bank PLC, as Swing Line Lenders, Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association as L/C Issuer, Barclays Bank PLC, Citibank N.A.,
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Co-Syndication
Agents, Goldman Sachs Bank USA, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. as Co-
Documentation Agents, and The Other Lenders Party Thereto,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated,
Barclays Bank PLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman
Sachs Bank USA, J.P. Morgan Securities, LLC, The Bank of
Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC as
Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Book Runners.8-K 1-13252 10.1 October 23, 2015
10.20Amendment No. 2, dated January 30, 2014, and Amendment No.
1, dated November 15, 2013, to the Credit Agreement and the
Credit Agreement dated as of September 23, 2011, among the
Company and McKesson Canada Corporation, collectively, the
Borrowers, Bank of America, N.A. as Administrative Agent,
Bank of America, N.A. (acting through its Canada branch), as
Canadian Administrative Agent, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Co-Syndication
Agents, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as L/C Issuer,
The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, LTD., The Bank of Nova
Scotia and U.S. Bank National Association as Co-
Documentation Agents, and The Other Lenders Party Thereto,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Sole
Lead Arranger and Sole Book Manager.8-K 1-3252 10.1 February 5, 2014
10.21Credit Agreement dated as of September 25, 2019, among the
Company and certain subsidiaries, as borrowers, Bank of
America, N.A., as administrative agent, Barclays Bank PLC,
Citibank, N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, National Association,
Goldman Sachs Bank USA, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., and10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 30, 2019
HSBC Securities (USA) Inc., as co-syndication agents, the
lenders party thereto, the letter of credit issuers party thereto.
134
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
10.22*Form of Director and Officer Indemnification Agreement. 10-K 1-13252 10.27 May 4, 2010
10.23Description of Separation Letter between the Company and
Bansi Nagji, Executive Vice President and Chief Strategy and
Business Development Officer, dated March 17, 2020.8-K 1-13252 — March 23, 2020
10.24Tax Matters Agreement, by and between McKesson Corporation,
PF2 SpinCo, Inc., Change Healthcare Inc. and Change
Healthcare LLC, dated as of March 9, 20208-K 1-13252 10.1 March 13, 2020
21† List of Subsidiaries of the Registrant. — — — —
23† Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm,
Deloitte & Touche LLP.— — — —
31.1†Certification of Chief Executive Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
31.2†Certification of Chief Financial Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
32††Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
101†The following materials from the McKesson Corporation Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended March 31, 2020,
formatted in Extensible Business Reporting Language (XBRL):
(i) the Consolidated Statements of Operations, (ii) Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income, (iii) Consolidated
Balance Sheets, (iv) Consolidated Statements of Stockholders'
Equity, (v) Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, and (vi)
related Financial Notes.— — — —
104†Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as iXBRL and
contained in Exhibit 101).— — — —
________________
* Management contract or compensation plan or arrangement in which directors and/or executive officers are eligible to
participate.
† Filed herewith.
††Furnished herewith.
Registrant agrees to furnish to the Commission upon request a copy of each instrument defining the rights of security holders
with respect to issues of long-term debt of the registrant, the authorized principal amount of which does not exceed 10% of the total
assets of the registrant.
135
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
   MCKESSON CORPORATION
   
Date: May 22, 2020  /s/ Britt J. Vitalone
   Britt J. Vitalone
   Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated:
/s/ Brian S. Tyler /s/ Marie L. Knowles
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)Marie L. Knowles, Director
  
/s/ Britt J. Vitalone /s/ Bradley E. Lerman
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)Bradley E. Lerman, Director
  
/s/ Sundeep G. Reddy /s/ Maria Martinez
Sundeep G. Reddy
Senior Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)Maria Martinez, Director
  
/s/ Dominic J. Caruso /s/ Edward A. Mueller
Dominic J. Caruso, Director Edward A. Mueller, Director
  
/s/ N. Anthony Coles /s/ Susan R. Salka
N. Anthony Coles, M.D., Director Susan R. Salka, Director
  
/s/ M. Christine Jacobs /s/ Kenneth E. Washington
M. Christine Jacobs, Director Kenneth E. Washington, Director
  
/s/ Donald R. Knauss  
Donald R. Knauss, Director  
  
Date: May 22, 2020  
136
